Authors
Brian Takeshita
Number of Reviews
69

Title
Review for Mulan (1998)
You've got to love Disney.  No matter what they serve up, it is a guaranteed
success as long as it's animated.  Kids have to go see the movie.  Then they
have to get the toys.  Oh, the video came out?  Got to buy it, or risk
little Billy's temper tantrums for the next month.  All of this culminates
in the childhood equivalent of a pilgrimage to Mecca:  A visit to the Magic
Kingdom.  Stay at the Disneyland Hotel!  Buy a Disney t-shirt!  Eat an ice
cream Mickey Mouse on a stick!  It's both a vertical and horizontal monopoly
when you think about it.  Dale Carnegie should have had it so good.  What's
most amazing is that all this success is in spite of a severe lack of
originality.  You see, Disney animated features these days have two
components:  Theme and plot.  The theme changes with each new movie; the
plot does not.  The plot is a mold into which the characters of some ancient
fable are dropped, and try as they might to rise above the characters of
previous features, they are nearly always destined to do no more than the
same.  However, while the success of a Disney animated feature is generally
a given as far as box-office receipts, merchandising dollars, and glimmers
in the eyes of little children, critically they are as varied as anything
else that Hollywood has to offer.  Luckily, Disney's latest animated
offering, MULAN, manages to be engaging and refreshing, even while rife with
formula.
The film starts with the invasion of ancient China by the Huns, led by the
imposing Shan-Yu (Miguel Ferrer).  Soon, China's emperor (Pat Morita)
mobilizes his armies and decrees that one male from each family in the
country shall serve to fight in China's defense.  When the Fa family is
served notice, it is the elderly father, Fa Zhou (Soon-Tek Oh) who must
answer the call, as there are no other males in the household.  Fearing her
father will surely be killed in battle, Fa Mulan (Ming-Na Wen) disguises
herself as a man and sneaks off with the royal orders to join the Chinese army.
MULAN, based on a Chinese epic poem, is a classic tale of the triumph of the
ugly duckling.  Mulan herself is a disgrace to her loving family, as she has
a difficult time fitting into the traditional woman's role, and in a very
amusing scene where a matchmaker attempts to assess her value to a potential
husband, we see that "grace" is not one of her strong points.  Very early
on, we are presented with the high importance of bringing honor to one's
family, and by botching her chance at gaining the favor of the matchmaker,
Mulan fails at that task.  By leaving home to fight in her father's place,
she may not only spare his life, but bring honor, too.
As is the case with most Disney musicals, the songs are first rate and
pervasive throughout the film.  I'm not sure if they will get much airplay,
but at least one of the songs will no doubt receive recognition come Oscar
time.  Both Lea Salonga, who provides the singing voice for Mulan, and Donny
Osmond who sings for Shang, the captain of Mulan's army unit and obligatory
love interest, are more than competent, although Salonga's voice translates
much better to animation.  You have to hear it to understand.
Interestingly, the musical numbers which are so often done with big
flourishes are surprisingly muted in MULAN.  There is no significantly big
number, which is customary as the second or third song in a Disney film, but
this does not detract significantly from the rest of the movie.  It is,
however, an expectation which has been built by Disney's own formulaic
history, and some viewers may feel as if something is missing.
Artistically, the animators have chosen to adopt the more subdued pastels of
Chinese artwork, and although this may not live up to the vibrance so
associated with many of the other Disney works, it helps to contribute a
more authentic, and therefore more credible, nature to what otherwise may be
seen as a typically "Disneyfied" ethnic tale.  There are also a couple of
visually standout scenes, one involving the charge of Shan-Yu's Hun army,
which utilizes the same computer-enhanced imagery Disney animators have
employed since the chandelier in BEAUTY AND THE BEAST.  The other scene
worth mentioning is so quick you might miss it.  When Mulan resolves to take
her father's place, she dons her father's old battle armor, and unsheathes a
sword.  As she does so, you can see her reflection in the polished metal.
It just left me thinking, "That was really cool."
A wonderful range of performances delight the audience throughout the film,
varying from the straight, such as Soon-Tek Oh as Fa Zhou, to the comical,
such as Harvey Fierstein as Yao, a gruff, pugilistic member of Shang's
conscripted army.  Even more outrageous is Eddie Murphy as Mushu, the
diminutive guardian dragon sent to look after Mulan.  Although an obvious
attempt to relive the chemistry brought forth by Robin Williams in ALADDIN,
Murphy nevertheless distinguishes himself with his own winning performance.
I found the choice of B.D. Wong as Shang a little strange (you may remember
him as Martin Short's wedding planner assistant in THE FATHER OF THE BRIDE),
but they used Robbie Benson for the voice of the Beast in BEAUTY AND THE
BEAST, so I guess anything's possible.  In any event, Wong performs
admirably as well.
One character which provides a significant amount of humor is Grandmother
Fa.  She deserves recognition not only because of the levity she brings to
the movie, but also because she is voiced by two very remarkable people.
June Foray, who supplies Grandmother Fa's speaking voice, is a venerable
voice actress who may be best known for her work as Rocky the Squirrel and
Natasha Fatale (as in Boris and Natasha).  Marni Nixon, who provides
Grandmother Fa's singing voice, is the same vocalist who dubbed the voices
for Anna in THE KING AND I, Maria in WEST SIDE STORY, and Eliza in MY FAIR
LADY.  With this in mind, hearing Grandmother Fa is like listening to a
little piece of history.
MULAN is the latest Disney animated feature to get away from some of the
eurocentrism which for so long dominated Disney films.  In an effort to be
culturally sensitive (and to avoid a "Miss Saigon"-type debacle), Disney has
also wisely chosen to employ many Asian-American actors for both lead and
supporting roles.  In addition to the actors already mentioned, the cast
includes such ubiquitous talents as James Hong, Gedde Watanabe, James
Shigeta, and George Takei.  I guess Clyde Kusatsu wasn't available.
At a running time of slightly under an hour and a half, MULAN moves quickly
and provides solid entertainment for both children and, happily, adults.
This is the kind of Disney feature that makes you wonder what they will do
next, rather than hope that the next one is better.

Title
Review for As Good As It Gets (1997)
Jack Nicholson has a funny way of playing characters with very few
redeeming qualities, but whom you end up liking anyway.  In AS GOOD AS
IT GETS, the character in question is Melvin Udall, a successful
novelist with obsessive-compulsive disorder who seems bent on having
as little contact with people around him as possible, except when he
feels like being a royal pain in the you-know-where.  He's mean.  I
mean really mean.  The opening scene shows him shoving a little dog
down the trash chute of his Manhattan condominium.
Every day, Melvin eats at the same cafe, sits at the same table, and
gets served by the same waitress.  You can tell that this is his
favorite place to be a vicious nuisance, when his waitress Carol
(Helen Hunt) tells him he can just go sit in another section, and all
the other waitresses just cringe.  One day, Melvin makes a comment
that goes to far, and Carol, genuinely hurt, comes down on him like a
ton of bricks.  At that point we find that she is not only the only
person who can put up with him as a matter of course, but is also the
only person who can get to him, too.
Another person who often crosses Melvin's sights is Simon (Greg
Kinnear), an artist who lives on Melvin's floor.  Aside from the fact
that he lives near the terror of the city, Simon has the added benefit
of being gay, making him a prime target.  Simon's friend Frank (Cuba
Gooding, Jr.), also gay, does not fare much better.  When Simon walks
in on a pair of men robbing his apartment, he is brutally beaten and
sent to the hospital, and Frank, who has grown tired of seeing his
friend take the verbal abuse dished out by his neighbor, intimidates
Melvin into watching after Simon's dog while he convalesces.  This is
the same dog Melvin had earlier shoved down the garbage.
An interesting thing happens when Melvin takes this dog in:  Melvin
gets to like the dog, and the two develop an attachment which is the
catalyst to Melvin's softening up to the world around him.  It doesn't
happen overnight, but throughout the film, he bites his tongue here,
cares a little there, and most miraculously, falls in love.  One of
the best elements of this film is watching Melvin try to express
feelings which are not the usual negative ones he so often shares with
others.  He's traveling terra incognita here, and it shows.
Good performances are turned in by all principal players in this film,
especially by Nicholson and Hunt.  They play well off of each other
and have a genuine chemistry which makes it a pleasure to watch them
on screen.  Greg Kinnear, who is becoming known for his supporting
film roles, is also very good at playing the vulnerable Simon.  He
gives a short monologue about what it means for him to be an artist,
and delivers it with such inspiration and conviction that you actually
get to feel some of what he feels.  Cuba Gooding Jr. performs with a
hyped-up level of energy which contrasts nicely with that of Kinnear,
and comes through with a near constant comic performance.
The screenplay, by Mark Andrus and James L. Brooks, is clever,
touching, and funny.  The best part about it, however, is that it is
filled with characters we care about because they are actually
interesting.  Melvin is a man we can't quite figure out, but whose
mannerisms and quirky qualities capture our attention.  Carol is a
working woman living with her mother, trying to take care of a child
with a debilitating respiratory problem.  Simon is a man who is a
success in his circle of peers, but who is still not accepted by much
of society.  Combined with the talent of the actors, these characters
make the film.  The one noticeable area where the film is lacking,
however, is the absence of Cuba Gooding, Jr. through the second half.
His character makes an exit which is supposed to be temporary, but the
film ends before his return, leaving his relationship with Simon and
Melvin unresolved.  I would have liked to have seen more of his
character in general, in addition to a part in the film's conclusion.
There's one actor, who will probably not be recognized by any awards,
but who contributes greatly to many of the movie's best scenes and who
deserves mention.  This is that little dog.  He plays such a pivotal
role to Melvin's character development, actually serves to forward the
plot, and has some absolutely scene-stealing moments, that it is hard
to believe he is simply an animal.  Award or no, however, when even
the dog puts in a good performance, you know you've got an outstanding
movie.

Title
Review for Sphere (1998)
Barry Levinson's SPHERE is the latest in a long line of films based on
a novel by Michael Crichton.  In this one, Dustin Hoffman plays Norman
Goodman, a psychologist who deals with survivors of airplane crashes,
and that's what he thinks he's supposed to be doing when he is taken
via helicopter to a small fleet of research vessels off the coast of
Guam.  Upon arrival on one of the ships, however, he learns that
several of his professional acquaintances are also present, and that
their mission is not to deal with a plane crash, but rather with an
alien spacecraft resting on the bottom of the ocean.
During the Bush administration, Goodman wrote a standard operating
procedure for alien contact, specifying the small team of experts who
should be present.  They include a scientist named Beth Halperin
(Sharon Stone), an astrophysicist named Ted Fielding (Liev Schreiber),
and a mathematician named Harry Adams (Samuel L. Jackson), who come
under the supervision of Harold Barnes (Peter Coyote), who works for
an ultra-secret government agency.  The team descends a thousand feet
to the ocean floor, where they are housed in an underwater habitat
built by the Navy, located close to the spacecraft.  Upon entering the
spacecraft, they find a liquid-lustrous golden sphere which reflects
everything in the room except them, indicating that the curious object
possibly chooses what it reflects.  Is the sphere sentient?  Their
question is answered when it makes contact with them through the
computer terminals of their underwater habitat.  Soon, however,
disasters involving attacking jellyfish, flooding, fire, and a giant
squid seem to appear at the whimsy of the strange alien entity.
SPHERE starts out quite promising as it wraps the audience in the
intrigue of trying to find out where the spacecraft came from and what
the mysterious orb is supposed to be.  However, when the
action/thriller elements begin about halfway through the film, the
extension of this mystery only serves to confuse the viewer.  We are
given several twists of plot, keeping us guessing as to the origin of
the violence being wrought upon the investigating team.  Under other
circumstances, this might help to further the tension, but in this
film, it just doesn't work.  The result is a confusing mess that makes
you jump every once in a while.
One of the reasons we don't go along with the plot twists is because
we don't really care too much about the characters.  Goodman is
indecisive, Halperin is paranoid and suicidal, Fielding is insecure,
and Adams just plain weirds out soon after the film starts.  A scene
where Fielding and Adams compare the ages at which they earned their
first doctorates does very little to lend sympathy to the characters,
as does another scene where Goodman confesses he defrauded the
government for some quick cash.  It would seem that the character we
care the most about is Barnes, who is outside the neurotic realm of
the super-educated.  Barnes is a smart fellow, but he's also more
dedicated to the job at hand than any of the others, and we just hope
that their foibles don't prevent him from getting out of the whole
thing alive.
Peter Coyote also provides the most convincing performance in spite of
the big-name cast.  Coyote delivers his lines well enough to make us
believe he must at the same time complete his mission and juggle the
egos and vagaries of civilians.  No big flourishes for him, just good
solid acting of a character with whom we can sympathize.  Stone, on
the other hand, flourishes a few times too often as her character goes
down the emotionally unstable path.  It's just too bad those
flourishes aren't at least convincing.  Diametrically opposed is
Hoffman, who is too understated in his performance to be a leading man
here.  His role requires a strong performance; a real stand-out, and
we just don't get that.  Jackson's performance is good as usual, but
his talents are contorted in this film due to the strange avenues the
screenplay and direction take us.  A disjointed storyline makes him
near-psychotic one moment, then friendly the next.
In terms of visual effects, SPHERE suffers from the underwater
syndrome.  We all know that it is dark and gloomy a thousand feet
below the ocean's surface, but it doesn't help us out much to give us
a movie that tries to approximate this.  There's one scene where the
team is descending in a submarine to visit the spacecraft for the
first time.  Fielding looks out a viewport and says, "Look at the size
of that thing."  Cut to a view of the craft punctuated by a fanfare of
music.  Too bad we couldn't see much, or it might have actually been
impressive.
This film tries so hard to be a thinking thriller that it makes
efforts which only go through the motions and fail to captivate.  One
part of this involves time travel, and there is the revelation that if
the future has no record of the team finding the sphere, that must
mean they don't get out alive.  To tell you why this is in violation
of most time travel theory would be to give away much of the plot, so
suffice to say that much of the convolution seems only to dazzle the
audience with self-congratulatory cleverness that is not technically
or intelligently proficient.
As I stated previously, SPHERE is only the latest in a long line of
Crichton-based movies.  A question occurred to me while viewing this
film:  Why doesn't Michael Crichton just become a screenwriter?  After
all, every time he writes a novel, he must know it is destined to be
made into a movie.  Why not just write the screenplay and cut out all
that preliminary stuff?  The answer I came up with is that he can make
a whole lot of money off the novels first, and then make even more
money off the movie option.  People by the millions purchase his
books, and you know what?  It's because he's Michael Crichton, the guy
whose books get made into movies.  "He must be good," these people say
in the aisles of Barnes and Noble, "or else they wouldn't keep making
movies out of his novels."  Well, I've got an inside scoop for you,
folks.  He's begun to write with the mentality that each story will,
in fact, be filmed.  He's become lazy and ineffectual as a novelist.
You see, writing for a reader is very different from writing for a
moviegoer.  In a novel, you must be descriptive in an artful way so
that the reader is almost unaware how he or she knows what a character
is like.  To simply read off a list of traits, background, and
emotions is boring and insulting.  "Show, don't tell" is one of the
most elementary tenets of writing fiction.  When you write a
screenplay, however, you list as much as possible, so the producer,
director, cinematographer, casting agent and actors know what the film
will look like and what is expected of each character.  In his novels,
Crichton has begun to list.  Big time.  At the behest of a friend, I
began to read his latest literary offering, but I couldn't get past
the first fourth of the book because of the number of times the author
insulted my intelligence by listing traits about the characters and
telling me everything about them the moment they appeared in the
story.  Sad, really, to find that this has happened to the same man
who once wrote novels like "Coma" and "The Great Train Robbery."  The
only good thing I can say about Crichton today is that he has at least
continued to write from a wellspring of varied and interesting
subjects, unlike someone like John Grisham, who only changes WHERE the
lawyers work.  But that's another story....

Title
Review for Notting Hill (1999)
In Roger Michell's romantic comedy NOTTING HILL, William Thacker (Hugh
Grant) leads a rather dreary life maintaining his flagging travel
bookshop in the quaint section of London which lends it's name to the
film's title.  One day, American movie superstar Anna Scott (Julia
Roberts) walks in to purchase a book on Turkey.  Quickly enamored of
each other, the two embark upon an on-again, off-again love affair
replete with romance, humor, and the occasional lump in the throat.
The film opens with a non-verbal cue to Anna's stardom as the title
credits appear over a montage of slow motion sequences featuring the
actress's appearances in films and at premieres - coming out of
limousines, walking the red carpets and such.  Without words, this
sequence gives us a background to her character.  Following, however,
is a set-up narration by William indicating what he does and where he
lives.  I don't know why the filmmakers chose to go with a narration
which tells us nothing we couldn't have figured out by watching the
first ten minutes of film, and which never resurfaces after the
movie's beginning, but there it is.  If there were ever a clear case
for "less is more," this would be it.
The film is told nearly first person from William's point of view, as
he is in every scene.  By nature of this arrangement, we get a very
definite sense of what he is all about, and his nice guy personality
wins us over easily.  In fact, much of NOTTING HILL's strength lies in
the great dialog written for this character by Richard Curtis.  A
scene where William is still in shock over the fact that he's even
talking to a silver screen goddess is made golden by the way bumbles
through his attempt to offer her some honey-soaked apricots from his
refrigerator.  Or take an instance where Anna kisses William and asks
him never to tell anyone for fear of the incident hurting her image.
William assures her he wouldn't say a word, then adds, "Well, I'll
probably tell myself now and then, but I'd never believe it."  Great
stuff.
The downside to spending so much time with William is that we don't
get to see enough of Anna to make their relationship whole and
plausible.  We're constantly exposed to William's thoughts, feelings,
actions and desires, but don't actually get the sense of how much Anna
really feels for him.  There are a couple of instances where she
declares her obvious interest, but they nearly come out of nowhere due
to the fact that we're not sure what she's been thinking all the times
in between.  This, combined with the sheer iniquity of screen time
between the two, makes this Hugh Grant's film hands down.  He gets the
great scenes (look for one in which he has to portray an interviewer
from Horse and Hound magazine in order to speak with Anna), the great
lines, and gives an overall wonderful performance.  Julia Roberts fans
will probably be disappointed by the actress's top billing and
subsequent lack of involvement in the film (ala Sandra Bullock in A
TIME TO KILL) along with her detached performance which is only
worsened by her character's unpredictable behavior.  Anna doesn't get
a lot of our compassion.
This romantic comedy leans a little more toward the comedy than the
romance, much of it supplied by Grant himself, but with considerable
help from the supporting cast.  Most notable is Rhys Ifans as Spike,
William's eccentric roommate, who is in the film for no other purpose
than to make us laugh.  Hugh Bonneville, Emma Chambers, James Dreyfus,
and Gina McKee bring up the guard as William's friends and family,
particularly shining in a scene where William brings Anna to his
sister's birthday dinner, and we get to see how these common folks
react to the presence of a movie star in their midst.  It's a scene
most of us will probably think would play out in our own living rooms
were we faced with a similar situation.
Roger Michell's use of visuals doesn't sweep us off our feet, but does
give us more than your typical movie of this type.  For example, there
are a couple of instances in this film where large amounts of time
pass.  Whereas some films are content to simply put in a caption
saying "eight months later," Michell presents us with more interesting
cues, such as William's walk though his neighborhood while the seasons
change around him.  Another memorable shot occurs in a park where the
camera is lifted from ground level to a couple of hundred feet in the
air.  We're generally used to scenes where our point of view is lifted
from the earth to treetop level or so, but in this case, the camera
just keeps going up and up until we have a bird's eye view of the
ground below.
Music is used rather glaringly as an enhancement to many of the film's
scenes, and some of this might have been better toned down, but in
other areas it works to full effect.  It's kind of a mixed bag, but
still fares better than many of today's lighthearted movies which are
so influenced by the MTV fare that the film becomes one long music
video.  At least this film has some pretty good music that for the
most part remains relevant and appropriate.
NOTTING HILL's Grant and Roberts will not go down in history as one of
the all-time greatest film pairings, but the chemistry is decent and
the comedic aspects of the movie more than make up for it.  For a
couple of hours, you should expect to laugh more than cry, and that's
not so bad, now is it?

Title
Review for Tengoku to jigoku (1963)
Akira Kurosawa's 1963 film HIGH AND LOW has an interesting premise:  A
captain of industry is told his son has been kidnapped and a ransom is
demanded.  Kingo Gondo (Toshiro Mifune) is ready to pay the
kidnapper's exorbitant demand of 30 million yen, when he finds out his
son is safe and sound.  Apparently, Gondo's chauffeur's son was
kidnapped instead in a case of mistaken identity.  Gondo is then faced
with the question, "Would you pay the ransom for a child that is not
your own?"  When the movie is over, it is a question which every
viewer must surely ask himself.
Even if we think Gondo's answer would be an unqualified "yes", he is
in a situation which makes matters complicated.  Gondo is a large
shareholder in National Shoes, one of the leading shoe manufacturers
in Japan, and he has been approached by a few other shareholders with
a scheme to take over control of the company by pooling their holdings
and voting out the current company head.  However, Gondo doesn't want
to partner with these other men, who we find are unscrupulous.
Instead, he has carefully borrowed money to amass an increasing number
of shares and with one last purchase, would be able to take control by
himself.  If he pays the ransom, he would neither be able to make the
last, biggest purchase, nor pay off his loans.  Gondo therefore faces
the dilemma of whether to ignore the kidnapper and achieve his dream
and assure lifetime security for himself and his family, or pay the
ransom and put himself in ruin.  It is this predicament that occupies
the first third of the film.  We know Gondo is a good man who helped
build National Shoes from the ground up.  Whereas the other
shareholders believe they need to make shoes which will wear out
faster so they will be bought more frequently, Gondo insists they
continue to make quality shoes which people will want to wear.  "Shoes
carry the weight of the entire body," he says.  His is a character who
would get our sympathy no matter which decision he made, for we know
his reasons would be sound.
HIGH AND LOW plays itself out in three acts and an epilogue.  The
first act is by far the best and creates the most tension as we watch
Gondo struggle with the decision he must eventually make.  Trapped in
his house atop a hill and under surveillance by the kidnapper, Gondo
is at constant odds with himself, his family, and the police.  Once
Gondo has made his decision, however, the film plays out like just
about any other detective drama.  The second act is mildly interesting
as we watch the police gather information on the kidnapper and prepare
to track him down.  The last act is the manhunt and pursuit of the
kidnapper through the seedy sections of the city.  Unfortunately, this
part is unnecessarily long with too many drawn-out scenes which verge
on boredom.  This third act is also single-handedly responsible for
making the film longer than it should be, at nearly two and a half
hours.  Looking at each scene, it seems as though Kurosawa was too
preoccupied with composition and imagery (at which he has always been
a master), and did not pay enough attention to pacing.
The epilogue is a short interaction between Gondo and the kidnapper,
and is decidedly insufficient.  Although we expect the scene to tie
everything together, the revelations about the kidnapper's motivations
are all too simple and unsatisfactory, given the wonderfully
thought-provoking content in the first third of the film.  HIGH AND
LOW deserves a good rating just for that beginning portion, but the
rest of the film unfortunately just drags it down.

Title
Review for Deep Impact (1998)
Scientists have posited that a large meteor struck the earth millions
of years ago and killed the dinosaurs.  Mimi Leder's DEEP IMPACT faces
humanity with the same fate.  While with his astronomy club one
evening, high school student Leo Biederman spots an unknown star and
has a picture of it sent to Marcus Wolf, a club advisor who works at a
nearby telescopic observatory.  Wolf identifies the object as a
meteor, not a star, and plots its trajectory, only to find that it is
due to collide with the earth.
The United States government keeps this information under wraps for a
year, when MSNBC reporter Jenny Lerner (Tea Leoni), unwittingly
uncovers the story while following up leads on what she thinks is a
sex scandal within the President's cabinet.  Soon thereafter,
President Beck (Morgan Freeman) makes a televised announcement that a
meteor roughly the size of New York City will hit the planet within a
year, causing what is known as an ELE, or extinction level event.
What isn't destroyed by the initial impact will eventually succumb to
the lack of sunlight caused by the sun's being obscured by debris.  On
the bright side, a joint U.S./Russian mission to destroy the cosmic
interloper has already been planned.  Using the new nuclear "Orion
Drive", the largest spaceship ever built will take six astronauts out
to the meteor, where they will land on the surface, drill into it, and
plant nuclear devices which, when detonated, will break the meteor up
into small, harmless pieces.
I'm not giving away a whole lot by saying that the mission is not
entirely successful.  The movie poster has a meteor hitting the earth,
and every commercial I've seen shows a giant wave bearing down on New
York.  The bulk of this film is devoted to an emotional reconciliation
amongst the main characters in what are surely the last days of their
lives, superimposed against the backdrop of a mission to save
humanity.  What results is basically a long wait until the meteor gets
here.
You see, DEEP IMPACT bills itself as a disaster movie, but what it
lacks are, well, disasters.  Most disaster movies put their
earthquakes, eruptions, nuclear explosions, etc. somewhere around the
middle of the film and have the main characters try to deal with
salvaging what they can, or prevent a final, fatal disaster from
happening.  Remember METEOR from 1979?  The premise was much the same:
A meteor is coming to crush the earth.  However, throughout the film,
splinters off the main rock hurtle our way and impact the planet,
giving us enough eye candy to tempt our visual taste buds and make us
say, "Gee, if a splinter did that, what's the big one going to do?"
No such luck with this film.  Instead, we just get poor development of
characters we only intermittently care about, and the film therefore
fails to maintain the tension of impending doom.  Like I said, a long
wait until the meteor gets here.
The characters are forgettable largely due to fundamental faults in
the screenplay.  In a movie about the potential end of civilization,
why choose a reporter as the lead?  The Jenny Lerner character is one
of the most uninteresting of the film, yet she is thrust to the
forefront.  Leo Biederman is played nicely by Elijah Wood, but
Biederman is also a character whose presence is questionable.
President Beck's credibility as a component of the film was
unfortunately undermined by a terribly corny speech at the movie's
finale.  What a waste of a convincing performance by Morgan Freeman.
There are a few things in the film which just don't make sense, and
therefore distract the viewer from the rest of the movie, while you
try and figure out what they meant.  For example, while following her
scandal leads, Jenny sees cases of Ensure, a dietary supplement for
seniors, being loaded onto a boat belonging to presidential
cabinetmember Alan Rittenhouse (James Cromwell).  A little while
later, she is taken to a secret meeting with the President in the
kitchen of some restaurant, where she also notices a large supply of
Ensure.  We have no idea of the significance of this connection, as
there are many plausible explanations for the presence of Ensure at
both locations.
The special effects, however, are excellent, as you would expect from
George Lucas's Industrial Light and Magic.  The big wave is probably
the best part of the whole film, although whoever decided to show the
head of the Statue of Liberty floating underwater should really get a
slap.  You know, every time there's a disaster movie involving New
York City, they've got to put in the head of the Statue of Liberty
breaking off, or buried in debris, or floating in the water, like it
was the first time anybody's done it.  Please.

Title
Review for Booty Call (1997)
I know there were times during this movie that I laughed pretty hard.
The problem is, I can't remember them as I write this review.  That's
not a good sign.
In BOOTY CALL, Jamie Foxx is Bunz, a character whom I can't really
describe, because I don't know that much about him.  I only know that
he likes to shoot dice on the sidewalk, and that he doesn't like
relationships, just "booty calls" at three in the morning (no
questions, no commitment).  Bunz has a best friend named Rushon (Tommy
Davidson), who seems to be Bunz's direct opposite:  On the straight
and narrow, and currently in a long-term commitment (a whole seven
weeks, wow!).  Rushon wants to finally sleep with his girlfriend,
Nikki (Tamala Jones), but for a reason which is not totally explained,
it's going to happen after a double date with Bunz and Nikki's friend
Lysterine (Vivica A. Fox), who have never met.  To make a long story
short, the two couples pair off and spend the rest of the evening
having their attempts to do the deed spoiled by Nikki's obsession with
safe sex.  First she wants condoms, so Bunz and Rushon go out and get
them.  Oh, no, they have to be latex, not lambskin.  Back to the
store.  Now they've got to get dental dams, or there'll be no
foreplay.  Why are both couples stopped each time Nikki makes a
demand?  Nikki phones Lysterine, who lives across the hall, and tells
her she'd better be making these demands, too.  Talk about coitus
interruptus.
BOOTY CALL is a film that does not know whether it wants to be a
regular comedy or one of those over-the-top comedies.  The difference
between the two is that in the latter, things constantly happen which
are so far removed from reality.  In this category, for example, you
have ACE VENTURA: PRIVATE EYE on the mild side, and AIRPLANE! at the
extreme.  There are times during BOOTY CALL where the film steps out
of its shell and tries for this status, but then too often quickly
retreats to the safety of convention.  It is disappointing, and even
worse, distracting.
There are also instances where the screenplay by Takashi Bufford and
Bootsie Parker (are those real names?) does not live up to its
potential, as jokes are left unexploited or even ruined by bad
writing.  For instance, there is a scene where our main characters are
in a Chinese restaurant.  Bunz goes up to an Asian gangster and speaks
to him in fluent Cantonese, much to everyone's surprise.  However,
when asked how he learned the language, he goes into this explanation
of how he started picking up words from late-night kung-fu films, and
soon gained mastery.  This negated the ludicrousness of the entire
scene.  If, on the other hand, when asked how he learned to speak
Chinese, Bunz simply replied with, "kung-fu movies," and then moved
on, the joke would have been much more effective.  This is because it
would have been totally unbelievable, but funny because we know it is
unbelievable.  By explaining the point and trying to make the
ridiculous plausible, the film is not giving its viewers enough
credit.
The inconsistency and uncertain believability unfortunately also raise
other questions.  Why are two such disparate people like Bunz and
Rushon best friends?  Why do Rushon and Nikki fix up Bunz and
Lysterine?  If Nikki is so obsessed with safe sex, why doesn't she
have some condoms at her own apartment?  These questions are not
answered by the screenplay, but are overlooked for the sole reason of
moving the plot forward.
A very noticeable quality of BOOTY CALL is the prevalence of
unnecessary foul language.  Some movies use a lot of swear words, but
use them under very justifiable circumstances, as when they are
employed consistent with a character's pattern of speech.  Other
films, such as the recent JACKIE BROWN, use them in ways that almost
parody themselves.  BOOTY CALL just sticks them in to get laughs, and
it doesn't work.  They stick out like sore thumbs because there is
almost no reason to use them.
Half of the scenes seem to occur for no reason.  The Chinese
restaurant, a holdup at a convenience store, and a trip to the
hospital seem to have nothing to do with the story, and are in there
for filler.  This is surprising, considering that the film is less
than eighty minutes long.  It's too bad that the core of the film
isn't much better, since it is comprised of sometimes funny, but
forgettable dialog.  I refer you to the first paragraph of this
review.

Title
Review for Full Monty, The (1997)
In the beginning of THE FULL MONTY, we are shown a cheesy early 70's
promotional film for the city of Sheffield, England.  Sheffield, we
are told, is a city based on steel.  Massive factories employ
thousands of workers in an industry which will never die.  Fast
forward 25 years into the present, where Sheffield is now somewhat
less than a boom town, with a large portion of its male population
looking for jobs.
We meet Gary (Robert Carlyle) and Dave (Mark Addy), two unemployed
steelworkers reduced to stealing scrap from the abandoned factory
which for ten years was their place of work.  Gary has a son who is
shuttled back and forth between living with Gary and his ex-wife and
her live-in lover.  The ex lives in a comfortable house in a good
section of town, while Gary lives in a cramped apartment in a near
tenement neighborhood.  What Gary lacks in material possessions, he
tries to make up for with love for his boy.  Dave, on the other hand,
is married, albeit not happily.  He suspects his wife of looking for
another man to replace him, due to his current state of unemployment
and his overweight condition.  To top it all off, he's battling a bout
of impotence.
While walking home from a botched attempt at "liberating" a steel
girder from their old factory, Gary and Dave notice hundreds of women
lined up to enter a nightclub to see the Chippendale Dancers.  They
first scoff at the performance, but when Gary finds out he needs 700
pounds in order to file for joint custody of his son, they realize
that male exotic dancing would be an easy way to make some quick cash.
Their first obstacle, however, is that neither of them can dance very
well, so they attempt to enlist the help of their former boss, Gerald
(Tom Wilkinson), who happens to take weekly dance lessons.  Gerald,
like Gary and Dave, is unemployed, but he can't be involved in such
foolishness because he has "standing."  Besides, he's on his way to a
job interview, his first in six months.  Gerald also points out a
second problem.  Dave is fat, Gary is skinny, and they're both ugly.
In retaliation, Dave and Gary manage to sabotage Gerald's interview,
but quickly realize their mistake when Gerald has a near breakdown,
confessing that this was his last hope.  He hadn't told his wife he
was jobless, and "she's still got credit cards.  She's out there right
now, shopping!"  After making amends, Gerald agrees to help Dave and
Gary learn to dance and audition other dancers.  After all, he needs
the money, too.
In general, the characters are quite likable.  For example, even
though Gary takes his son Nathan (William Snape) along with him to
steal scrap, and has him run the tape player when grown men are
stripping to Donna Summer's "Hot Stuff", you know it's only because he
wants to spend time with his boy.  You can't help but like a character
who's willing to take off his clothes and risk being a laughing-stock
for a reason like that.  Robert Carlyle brings a lot of earnestness to
his role, and the scenes involving Gary and Nathan have a tangible
sense of genuine affection.
The accents and terminology get in the way in a few places, and I
think I lost out on several of the jokes due to the fact that some of
the dialog was unintelligible.  If I were from Sheffield, I'm sure I
would have been rolling in the aisles.  Luckily, this wasn't a major
problem as most of the jokes were sight gags anyway.  About 80 percent
of the movie's laughs are derived from watching these unemployed
steelworkers trying to shake their moneymakers.  One might think that
the same joke would grow tiresome after a while, but director Peter
Cattaneo does a good job of making each attempt at learning a little
different.  A funny little scene involves the would-be dancers trying
to get tips by reviewing a tape of FLASHDANCE.  They get encouraged
when they notice that the Jennifer Beals character is a steelworker,
too.
One problem I saw was the way the main characters bonded so quickly.
Gary and Dave already know each other, but everyone else is basically
thrown together in a very short time.  One day they are strangers, and
the next day they are working as a team to pursue a goal.  The
relationship between Gary, Dave and Gerald even has to overcome
animosity and a class boundary.  I suppose a case could be made for
the common plight of unemployment, but since the movie only runs an
hour and a half, a little extra time could have been taken in order to
cultivate the relationships a little more carefully.
All in all, THE FULL MONTY is an enjoyable film.  While laughing at
the characters, we are also wrapped up in the desire to see these
folks get a little better each time.  While part of this has to do
with the characters' likability, I also think it's because they're
just regular guys like the rest of us, and not muscle-bound hunks.
We'd like to see normal people get the same success and adoration that
the top of the genetic pyramid so often hordes.  Although I didn't
really need to see them take their clothes off, I was rooting for them
all the same.

Title
Review for Wizards (1977)
WIZARDS is an animated feature that begins with a narration of epic
proportions.  Over black and white drawings, we are told that the
earth is destroyed in an apocalyptic nuclear exchange, sending the
remnants of humanity through generations of radiation-induced
mutation.  The "original" inhabitants of the earth, fairies and elves,
return to populate the globe, along with their evil, mutant
counterparts.  One day (and I say "one day" not to be trite, but
because that's exactly how it happened - no advance notice), a fairy
queen gives birth to twins, one good and one evil.  The twins grow up
to be powerful wizards, the good one embracing magic, and the bad one
utilizing technology to attempt to expand his evil empire.  We are
given the notion that an ultimate battle must occur between the forces
of magic and those of technology.
As unoriginal as the premise is, I was still somewhat interested in
how this story would play itself out.  There's a lot you can do in an
animated fantasy world, after all.  I soon learned, however, that the
fantasy was the expectation of a decent film.  Once the transition was
made from still art to color animation, an entirely different feel
takes precedence.  Rather than the epic saga promised by the
narration, we get a goofy-looking world of a Saturday morning cartoon.
Not just the look, mind you, but all the zany sounds like >honkboing

For years, Blackwolf has lost his battles against the magical forces
of good, since his armies of ogres and other mutants would get
dispirited or distracted soon after battle is joined.  However,
Blackwolf now has a secret weapon:  Nazis.  Yup, Adolf Hitler, the
Luftwaffe and the Wehrmacht.  Okay, not the real things, but an
archival film his minions dug up.  Projected into the sky for all to
see, it inspires his own army while shocking the enemy into submission
long enough for the ogres to hack them up.  Before you know it, there
are dead elves everywhere.
This is just as well.  The characters are so bad that the viewer
doesn't care about any of them.  They're either silly, sappy, or both.
The dialog gets much of the credit for this.  An example is when
Avatar nonchalantly says, "Well, looks like my brother and I begin our
final battle."  Not very formidable when he's also the guy who says,
"This is the biggest bummer of a trip I've ever been on."  My favorite
line was from a sideline fairy who is asked by her child why good
can't fight back against the Nazi-charged evil.  Her response is,
"They have weapons and technology.  We just have love."  Suffice to
say, the characters are strictly two-dimensional, and we therefore
don't expect anything more than the obvious to happen.  Which it does.
The only unexpected occurrence is the way the final battle between
brothers is played out, which is anticlimactic and disappointing.
Please note that it is the action that is unexpected.  That it is
disappointing is not.
The film couldn't settle on a particular mood.  It seems to move from
dark to light with the cuts from scene to scene and even angle to
angle.  Scenes which are seemingly meant to contain deep meaning are
ruined by acts of levity.  The dramatics, which seem to occur at
random, are overly staged and overly acted, detracting from any kind
of value or even enjoyment which could otherwise be gleaned.
Ralph Bakshi, the director, makes an obvious attempt to get a message
across in this film:  Hitler and the Nazis were bad.  So who doesn't
know this already?  Well, maybe children.  Okay, so you might say that
this is a movie for children.  It's not.  In the scenes where good
fights evil, there's a lot of violence and gore that children should
not be seeing if they're watching a cartoon.  So is the film for
adults?  If so, we probably don't need to be bashed over the head to
get the point.  Why not have the bad guys be symbolic of the Nazis
instead of using old propaganda in a seriously disjointed attempt to
show us something we already know?
WIZARDS gives us a lot of footage of Nazi tanks and airplanes, and
Hitler giving speeches.  However, we don't see any reason why they
should be considered bad.  We see no atrocities being committed, not
even any real battle footage.  There is absolutely no connection made
between the armies of evil and the Third Reich, and we're not even
given a cursory explanation as to why this stuff is inspiring in the
first place.  This needed to be thought out much more thoroughly if a
point were to be made, since subject matter such as this deserves
better treatment.  I'd like to assume that Bakshi was trying to say
that the same nationalist movement that drove the Nazis could happen
anywhere, at any time, and we must therefore be vigilant.  However,
I'm not sure if I want to give him that much credit.

Title
Review for Rounders (1998)
Ever wonder what happened to Gabe Kaplan?  You remember, he was the
title character in that 70's sitcom, "Welcome Back Kotter."  Always
trying to help out the Sweathogs, frequently trying to dodge Mr.
Woodman, ever wary of his wife's tuna casserole.  "So," you ask,
"where is he now?"  Mr. Kaplan actually spends much of his time these
days playing professional high-stakes poker.  That's right.  I'm not
sure if it's his main source of income, but from what I've heard, the
guy occasionally comes away with $20,000 at a time.  And there you
were, thinking I was going to tell you he was doing off-Broadway
theater.  You silly goose.
Well, Gabe Kaplan isn't in the movie ROUNDERS, nor is the film about
the actor come gambler's life.  But ROUNDERS is about poker, and Gabe
plays poker, and I thought that was kind of a neat connection.  Sorry
about the segue, or lack thereof.
Matt Damon plays Mike McDermott, a law student who also has a singular
talent for the game of poker.  He's been playing for a while, and more
than being proficient, he has caught the bug.  He goes to all the
underground games in New York City, knows the regulars, and knows how
to win.  In the beginning of the film, he's built up a nice thirty
grand nest egg, which he takes to the speakeasy-type gaming parlor
where the big boys play.   Mike is there to make his bid into the
upper echelon by staking it all against Teddy KGB (John Malkovich), an
Oreo-munching cardshark with ties to the Russian Mafia.  Mike has the
potential to take a large pot and go to Vegas and buy into the World
Series of Poker, but instead he loses it all in a single hand.  Months
later, he's paying his way through law school by driving a delivery
truck.
When Mike's best friend and poker buddy Worm (Edward Norton) finishes
his jail term for hustling some students, he wants to pick up right
were they left off, working as a team to part others with their
betting cash.  Although Mike has stopped playing cards as a promise to
his girlfriend and fellow law student, Jo (Gretchen Mol), Worm
connives Mike into playing once more, and Mike, bitten again by the
bug, slides down that slippery slope, risking his relationship,
education, and reputation as playing poker again becomes the focus of
his life.
To make a film about gambling, a filmmaker will usually have to play
up the glamorous side to get the audience behind the characters.  This
is because few moviegoers will care a whole lot about some guy in a
leisure suit or terry cloth shirt sitting at a folding card table with
a stogie in his mouth.  ROUNDERS, however, seems to go more for the
latter than the former.  The card clubs Mike and Worm frequent aren't
very glamorous at all.  There's a basement, a lodge with elk heads on
the wall, a goulash joint - these are the kinds of locales in which
director John Dahl sets his shots.  Except for one brief instance when
the two players visit Atlantic City, the film is bereft of the
flashing lights of the casinos or the pleasant color of the green felt
table.  The reason ROUNDERS still captures our attention is because it
is less about the game of poker than it is about the personalities
which enjoy and are slaves to it.
We're given a nice set of interesting characters with clear
motivations, and good actors to play them.  Matt Damon is very natural
as Mike, who struggles between his desire to play the straight and
narrow by finishing law school, and answering what may be his true
calling, playing professional poker.  Ed Norton's Worm is truly a
worm, always looking for the angle and playing everyone for what
they're worth.  John Turturro, who amazes me with his acting range,
tones it down in this film by playing Joey Knish, a virtual poker
prodigy in his time who now plays the underground games to make rent
and child support payments.  He's both a friend and mentor to Mike,
and Turturro's low-key performance is totally convincing, just as John
Malkovich's heavily-accented Teddy KGB is imposing as an adversarial
dragon Mike must slay to prove himself.
Martin Landau is also thrown into the mix as one of Mike's law
professors, Abe Petrovsky.  While Landau slips well into the role, his
character, spitting out personal anecdotes about staying true to one's
self, facilitates the channeling of the storyline toward a predictable
ending.  Perhaps the weak link in the otherwise formidable line-up of
acting talent, however, is Gretchen Mol who just didn't seem to have
much presence on screen.  She's a genuine peach to look at, kind of a
cross between actress Renee Zellweger and singer Jewel (and I wouldn't
be surprised if the three of them formed some kind of blond-haired
triumvirate and attempted to take over the world), but her delivered
lines seemed very flat, and I found myself looking for Matt Damon's
reactions instead.
A good thing about ROUNDERS is that it doesn't get bogged down in the
character development and statement making so much that it can't find
time for humor.  The film is peppered nicely with scenes that both
make you laugh and keep the pacing going, such as a sequence where
Mike and Worm move rapidly around New York from one game to the next,
in widely different locales.  One game in a cigar club had me in
stitches.  "I LOVE the sweetness of this dark maduro wrapper," says
one of the players, clearly more interested in displaying his
pretentiousness over the cigar in one hand than in the cards in his
other.  I was hoping Mike and Worm would really take these guys.
With all the poker being played, ROUNDERS had the potential to be very
confusing.  You might think you know a lot about poker, but think
again.  Luckily, we're given a narration by Damon during the more
intricate moments to explain what's going on.  The narrations are more
informative than intrusive, and apprise us of what the stakes are and
why certain players want to do the things they do.  It's nice that as
the characters develop, so does our comprehension of their world.
As a film about success and survival in the realm of underground
poker, ROUNDERS delivers in spades.  Wait!  As a film about the
culture of cards, ROUNDERS is an ace.  Hang on!  Packed with great
acting and great characters, ROUNDERS is a full house.  Okay, I guess
that's enough.
Oh, by the way, if you ever want to get into a game with ol' Gabe
Kaplan, be sure to bring a note from Epstein's mother.

Title
Review for Romy and Michele's High School Reunion (1997)
ROMY AND MICHELE'S HIGH SCHOOL REUNION
I've got a couple more years until my ten-year high school reunion.  I
therefore have that much time to lose fifteen pounds, make twenty
million dollars, become famous, and marry Sandra Bullock.  But let's
face it, I'd be lucky just to lose the weight.  Movies made about high
school reunions are very sympathetic toward this predicament.  The
plot is pretty much always the same:  The main characters get an
invitation to their ten-year reunion, and realize that they are not
what they wanted to be by this time.  They make up an elaborate ruse
to fool people into thinking they are more successful than they really
are, only to have their cover blown at the reunion itself, causing
significant shame.  However, through a process of learning that
certain other classmates are also not doctors, lawyers, corporate
heads or movie stars, while still others who have achieved "success"
are not leading the fantasy life they thought they would, our heroes
find that just by being happy, they are success stories after all.
ROMY AND MICHELE'S HIGH SCHOOL REUNION follows this formula to a tee.
Romy (Mira Sorvino) and Michele (Lisa Kudrow) are friends who have
stayed together since high school, having moved from their hometown of
Tucson, Arizona, to Venice Beach, California. Romy is a cashier at the
service department of the local Jaguar dealership, while Michele is
one of California's gainfully unemployed.  They find out through a
classmate (Janeane Garafolo) that their reunion is a couple of weeks
away, and while filling in an informational survey for the event,
realize that they have not come nearly as far as they had expected.
After failed attempts to lose weight (how much more stick-thin could
they get?) and find good jobs and dreamy boyfriends, they hatch a
scheme to show everyone up by agreeing to pretend to be successful
businesswomen.
>From the beginning of the film, Romy and Michele are so full of
themselves and their appearances, I thought I was watching a movie
about the reunion for the high school class from CLUELESS.  Needless
to say, I didn't start viewing this movie caring for the characters
very much at all; Romy and Michele are quite simply annoying, with
annoying ways of talking and annoying little laughs.  We only start
identifying with them as protagonists because we find out through a
series of high school flashbacks that there were other students even
more self absorbed than them.  Once that is made plain, the two women
become a little more likable.
The film does a good job of characterizing some of the cliques which
comprise the teen social strata, and it's fun to watch them on screen.
There's the "A Group", made up of the debutantes and the handsome
jocks, the "B Group" comprised of the drama people, the "C group"
consisting of your various kinds of nerds, and then there are your
loners.  The representation of each group is pushed just the right
amount over the top so you can have a nice laugh reminiscing.  Too
much would have made them utterly ridiculous and unidentifiable.  Too
little would have probably caused horrifying flashbacks of your own.
Romy and Michele decide they don't quite fit into any of those groups,
but I'd say "airhead" transcends many categories.
As astonishing as it is, there is actually some decent character
development.  By the end of the movie, the two women not only find out
something about themselves, which is always the case is this formula,
but also about each other.  Take, for example, their plot to tell
everyone at the reunion that they developed Post-It Notes as a team.
Michele is horrified to learn that Romy doesn't think anyone would
believe that Michele would do more than suggest they make the notes
yellow.  "You're more of a design person," she tells Michele, implying
that she doesn't have the brains to do much more than express
feelings.  To the credit of screenwriter Robin Schiff, the conflict
between the two friends is not suddenly laid in our laps to give us
drama at the right point.  Instead, the first allusions to a possible
falling out occur shortly after they find out about the reunion, and
it builds from there.  This not only fleshes out the characters in a
more believable way, but also results in a nice way of showing how
reunions can bring out the worst in everyone.
Mira Sorvino does a competent job playing Romy, who is annoying and
vacuous but not completely hopeless.  Lisa Kudrow is basically playing
the character she plays on "Friends", but for an hour and a half.  She
is definitely the heir apparent to the ditz queen title previously
held by the likes of Goldie Hawn and Teri Garr.  Janeane Garafolo is
the one who really steals the show as the highly successful but
mean-spirited classmate who's spite is indiscriminate.  Unlike the "A
Group", she is just mean to everybody, and her interactions with other
characters is absolutely hilarious.  Although she's not on camera for
much of the film, any more screen time would have seen diminishing
marginal returns.
True to formula, the reunion goes exactly as you'd expect.  You're
given a message about human nature and society, and you take it with a
grain of salt.  I suppose it's because so many of us have faced or
will be faced with a situation similar to Romy and Michele's that by
the end of the film, you're actually hoping things will work out for
those who deserve it, even though you know they will.  That's in the
formula too, you know.

Title
Review for Absolute Power (1997)
In ABSOLUTE POWER, Clint Eastwood plays Luther Whitney, an expert cat
burglar who breaks into a mansion, but is caught in the master bedroom
when people show up unexpectedly.  Hiding behind a two-way mirror, he
witnesses an older man and a younger woman enter the room and begin to
engage in romance, which soon turns rough.  It quickly turns too rough
and when the woman protests and struggles to get away, the man becomes
violent, striking her and wrestling her to the ground.  In the
entanglement, the woman grabs a letter opener and attempts to stab the
man.  The man cries out for help, and two other men burst in on the
couple and shoot the woman dead.  The gunmen are Secret Service
agents; the other man is the President of the United States.
After the woman is shot, the President's chief of staff (Judy Davis)
rushes in and immediately starts damage control.  The woman's death
must be made to look like she was shot by an intruder in her home.  We
quickly realize that it is not so much the death that must be covered
up, but rather the circumstances surrounding the death.  Shooting a
person to defend the President is always justifiable, but doing so in
the midst of an affair involving the President could cause a lot of
problems.  This is an interesting premise to say the least:  The
cover-up of a presidentially justifiable homicide as a means to a
political end.  It's focus on the President of the United States is
equally intriguing.  Movies in the past have given us scandals,
conspiracies, and even murders close to the presidency, but rarely
have they actually involved the President himself.
Unfortunately, the premise does not live up to its potential.  Instead
of showing us some of the myriad ways the unique and all-encompassing
powers of the presidency could be used for self-serving goals,
ABSOLUTE POWER quickly falls right into line with any number of
thrillers.  The two Secret Service agents find out that Luther, whom
they chase from the mansion, has taken a key piece of evidence which
could provide undeniable proof that President Alan Richmond (Gene
Hackman) was involved in the woman's murder.  The rest of the film
concerns itself with the Secret Service's attempts to hunt Luther
down, and does so in the same ways we've seen before.
Whereas the storyline is the movie's main liability, the cast is the
movie's main asset:  Clint Eastwood, Gene Hackman, Ed Harris, and
Scott Glenn comprise this formidable lineup.  However, although the
others put in solid performances, in the end it's all Eastwood.  He is
convincing as the man who, through his chosen profession, has
alienated his daughter to the point where she has taken the direct
opposite path and become a prosecuting attorney.  Luther may or may
not like what he does for a living, but he definitely doesn't like
what it has done for his relationship with his daughter, Kate (Laura
Linney), and Eastwood does a great job at making this come through on
screen.  His convincing emotion is also displayed in a pivotal scene
where Luther is watching President Richmond on television, embracing
philanthropist Walter Sullivan (E.G. Marshall), Richmond's mentor and
husband of the murdered woman.  Luther talks to the TV screen:  "You
heartless whore.  I'm not about to run from you."  From almost any
other actor, this would have been the biggest slice of cheese you'd
ever laid eyes on, but because it's Clint Eastwood, you eat it up and
ask for more.
Every time there's a big caper, Luther is brought in for questioning,
but nothing sticks.  This time, D.C. homicide detective Seth Frank (Ed
Harris) finds Luther at a museum and questions Luther over lunch,
resulting in a wonderful scene where Seth and Luther exchange opinions
on who might have broken into the mansion the night Walter Sullivan's
wife was murdered.  Seth almost knows it was Luther, since he is one
of only a handful of people capable of pulling off a job like that,
and Luther knows Seth knows.  The two of them engage in a discussion
which subtlely makes each other aware of what they're thinking without
saying it out loud.  Particularly enjoyable is the way Luther
indirectly pays compliments to himself.  "Do you know the skill of
breaking the security of the security company?  I don't know how those
guys do it," he says.  Seth smiles and nods knowingly.  In this scene,
you realize you are watching two pros:  Luther, so confident because
he's been through this kind of thing so many times, and Eastwood,
acting with the confidence provided by decades of experience.  Both
the actor and the character play it free and easy, and it's fun to
watch.
Throughout most of the film, Eastwood's direction is evenhanded, and
in some cases, masterful.  For example, the way he uses visuals and
sound to build tension while Luther is trying to disable the mansion's
security system is very effective.  However, there are also evident
inconsistencies which detract from the movie as a whole.  The music,
while beautiful in some places (Eastwood actually composed much of
it), degenerates into cheap horror movie-type synthesized monotones in
others.  While some of the characters are very authentic, others are
right out of bad movies with near over-the-top lines.  I have a
feeling that with a better screenplay which could have closed some of
the gaps in storyline, this film could have been much better.  In the
end, ABSOLUTE POWER is enjoyable, with Eastwood's scenes nearly making
up for its flaws.  It's too bad that the rest of the film doesn't keep
up with Eastwood himself.

Title
Review for Feiying gaiwak (1990)
The first scene of OPERATION CONDOR has Jackie Chan preparing for a
secret mission.  He attempts to pop a couple of pieces of chewing gum
into his mouth, but misses.  After they ricochet off his face, he
says, "Not a good start."  As it turns out, this line not only gives
foreshadowing to the opening sequence, but to the rest of the movie as
well.
In this, the latest of the Jackie Chan movies to be released in
America after first runs in Hong Kong, Chan plays an international
operative codenamed "Condor", and is tasked by the United Nations with
finding a stash of gold hidden at a secret base by the Nazi's during
their retreat across the Saharan desert during the Second World War.
For some reason, Condor is given his mission at the U.S. embassy in
Spain.  I think this may have been done so that in a chase scene, they
could honor the time old tradition of knocking over a fruit cart.
Watch for it in any chase scene set in a foreign country, most notably
in Europe.  The chase will take itself through a marketplace, and a
fruit cart will be overturned.  It's almost a guarantee.  Anyway....
Condor is given a key which is supposed to unlock a giant vault in
which the gold is hidden; the problem is that the key has insulators
integrated into it, which may mean a booby trap might be
electronically triggered if the key is used improperly.  To help him
figure out where the gold is hidden and how to use the key correctly,
Condor is accompanied by a desert expert (Carol Cheng) and the
granddaughter of the captain who was in charge of hiding the gold (Eva
Cobo).  There aren't supposed to be any relatives of the Nazi captain
living in Spain, but Condor finds the granddaughter by looking her up
in the phone book or something.  Although these two women are supposed
to be integral parts of the mission, they prove no help at all except
to get in trouble and provide an excuse for Chan to jump into his
martial arts.  In fact, most of the scenes are so ridiculously
contrived that it seems everything is just a way to set up a fight.
I suppose this isn't so bad, since Chan's action is really the best
part of the movie, and the only reason you go to see one of his films
anyway.  If you've never seen a Jackie Chan movie, don't expect a
great plot, but do expect to be entertained by his moves.  They are so
well choreographed and often so amazing that you wonder if this guy is
human.  Knowing that he does his own stunts, and knowing that this is
the real stuff (no computer-masked bungee cords here) makes the action
sequences all the more exciting.  You've got to hand it to a guy who's
probably broken every bone in his body for the sake of his art.
Also of note in this, as in any Jackie Chan movie, is the humor.  As
far as I know, none of his films take themselves too seriously, and
even the dramatic parts have a certain tongue-in-cheek quality about
them.  What is almost masterful is the way that humor is even
integrated into the fight scenes.  Unlike a martial arts film such as
anything with Jean Claude Van Damme, where the fights get you on the
visceral level, fight scenes in Chan's movies are simply entertaining.
You marvel at both his moves and at the way he employs them in such a
way to make you laugh.
Unfortunately, even Chan's mastery can't save this film.  The plot and
characters are so weak that they don't hold the movie together at all,
and the acting is terrible.  Carol Cheng has apparently won best
actress honors at the Hong Kong Movie Awards in the past, but since
OPERATION CONDOR is a dubbed movie it kind of takes all bets off.
This, combined with an obviously low production value made we want to
turn away from the screen until I heard those kicks start flying.

Title
Review for Siege, The (1998)
A frequent error is the categorization of a terrorist as a soldier or a
common criminal.  A soldier commits acts of violence sanctioned by one
nation-state against another.  A common criminal commits acts of violence
for personal gain.  A terrorist employs random violence as a means to a
political end.  If the target nation does not affect the desired change in
policy, the violence continues.  It is the fear resulting from the fact that
the terrorist may strike at anyone (even total innocents), anywhere, at
anytime that gives the figure his label.  Edward Zwick's THE SIEGE explores
the possibility of this kind of violence taking place right here in the
United States.
You'd think the opening bit was ripped right from the headlines.  Arab
terrorists kill American citizens abroad, and the U.S. responds by
retaliating against the sheik whom supposedly ordered the attack.  However,
unlike the real-life tomahawk cruise missile strike against Bin Laden's camp
and manufacturing facility, the film version depicts special operations
troops kidnapping Sheik Ahmed Bin Talal.  In retaliation, the terrorists
bring the fight to the New World.  Unwittingly involved is FBI Assistant
Special Agent-in-Charge Anthony Hubbard (Denzel Washington), who works out
of the Bureau's New York office at One Federal Plaza.  While investigating a
series of bombings in the Big Apple, he encounters CIA agent Elise Kraft
(Annette Bening), also trying to uncover information.  Generally, the FBI is
charged with problems inside the U.S., while the CIA takes care of problems
in the international realm.  Even spies from other countries are off limits
to the CIA as long as they are in our country.  Hubbard therefore finds it
highly unusual that an Agency spook is nosing around what he considers his
territory, but as the two form a tentative professional relationship,
Hubbard becomes more and more aware of an increasingly complicated series of
allegiances and possibly illegal actions involving terrorism and the United
States government.
The original tagline for PATRIOT GAMES was, "There has never been a
terrorist attack on American soil."  However true, it was pulled before the
movie's release because it sounded too much like a dare.  Revisiting the
scenario of foreign terrorists committing acts of violence in the United
States, THE SIEGE is almost an invitation in itself, because it shows just
what kind of turmoil could be produced if an effective terrorist network
were to set up operations here in America.  Admittedly, the terror wrought
upon New York is a bit excessive (who's going to believe that a few bombs
are going to cause New Yorkers to jump at the backfire of a bus or to
curtail their shopping by two-thirds?), but the basic premise is still valid.
I liked the fact that this film rises above the basic action-thriller fare
of good guy G-Men against bad guy terrorists by exploring some of the
effects on society and law and order.  It provides a very possible
hypothesis that violent activity on the part of a few Arabs would escalate
into a series of hate crimes against the Arab-American population, and that
in an effort to find the terrorists, the civil liberties of the minority may
be violated by the government itself.  In fact, about halfway through the
film, when the President authorizes the declaration of martial law within
New York City, the liberties of all Americans are put at risk.  Although it
may actually be a side effect of a terrorist campaign, the demise of social
order in America is a scary thought and a goal which would not be beneath
many international terrorist groups.
Throughout, the film maintains a conflict between Hubbard, who wants to use
the FBI to pursue the terrorists within the letter of the law, and General
Devereaux (Bruce Willis), who is in command of the army and of the mind that
the greater good would be better served by suspending the law and pursuing
the terrorists more forcefully.  What results is a fascinating debate over
the appropriateness and constitutionality of the declaration of martial law
and the invocation of the War Powers Act, utilizing philosophy and
historical examples to make points on both sides.  It actually gets rather
heady at times, but it's a credit to screenwriters Zwick, Lawrence Wright,
and Menno Meyjes that they don't underestimate the intelligence of the audience.
I don't know if it's his tone or inflection or something else, but Denzel
Washington has a way of spitting out dialog that makes whatever he says
sound great.  This, combined with his innate acting ability and his
experience in playing the mid-level authority figure, makes his performance
in THE SIEGE convincing and enjoyable.  Annette Bening gives one of the more
assertive portrayals of a female character I've seen recently, and the
chemistry she shares with Washington is palpable.  It's somewhat unfortunate
that her character's fortitude is broken at a certain point, but it allows
us to watch Bening play a little more range.  Bruce Willis is pretty much
relegated to a tough-guy role, always standing straight, and with a
permanent scowl fixed upon his face.  However, the tension that exists
between Devereaux and Hubbard is a major drive behind the film's
development.  Notable is Tony Shalhoub who plays FBI Agent Frank Haddad, a
Lebanese immigrant.  The role calls for evidencing both a kind of filial
pride for his heritage, and contempt for those of his own race who might
interfere with his integration into the American society.  Difficult to say
the least, Shalhoub does it with a naturalness you can almost reach out and
touch.  Perhaps best known for his role as Antonio the cab driver in the NBC
sitcom "Wings," Shalhoub gained notoriety for his dramatic abilities in the
wonderful film BIG NIGHT.
Whereas Denzel Washington seems to be Edward Zwick's favorite actor (he
directed Washington in GLORY and COURAGE UNDER FIRE), James Horner seems to
be his favorite composer.  I therefore found it odd that Zwick chose the
prolific score-writer Graeme Revell (seven films this year already) over
Horner for THE SIEGE until I realized that this film contained a lot of
Arabian-themed music, and Horner's record has shown more of a propensity for
scores either neutral in ethnicity or Irish-sounding at most.  Revell does a
good job at providing appropriate music to punctuate key scenes and allowing
the score to enhance the movie as a whole.  It's nowhere near as intrusive
as in some of the other films we've been getting throughout the year.
Missteps in THE SIEGE can be found in a couple of the excesses it takes.
For example, it's pretty clear throughout that the film is meant to be more
of thriller than an action flick.  Unfortunately, there's a scene where the
army just cuts loose against some Arab immigrants in a blatant display of
firepower and explosions, obviously meant for the sole purpose of being
eye-catching.  In the middle of the city (and against no real opposition),
Zwick even has the army use a Cobra attack helicopter to shoot rockets into
a building no farther than 50 feet from friendly troops.  Verisimilitude
really goes out the window at that point.  The film also gets a little
preachy toward the end, focusing on the ability of different races to get
along.  A noble gesture, the film just puts the message across a bit too
obviously.  These flaws are glaring, but they don't detract too much from an
otherwise good film that makes you think about issues you may not have
considered since history class.

Title
Review for Armageddon (1998)
Naturally, there are a lot of expectations surrounding a film starring
Bruce Willis, directed by Michael Bay, and produced by Gale Anne Hurd
and Jerry Bruckheimer, because it has "summer action blockbuster"
written all over it.  ARMAGEDDON is the second movie this year to
feature a plot involving a big rock hurtling through space to destroy
the earth, and a plan to land on the rock, drill into it, and blow it
up with nuclear weapons before it hits.  The first film, DEEP IMPACT,
was disappointing enough that expectations for ARMAGEDDON have run
even higher.
We start out when NASA, under the direction of Dan Truman (Billy Bob
Thornton), discovers an asteroid the size of Texas which will impact
the earth in only 16 days.  Briefing the president, Truman explains
that the asteroid is what they call a "planet killer" which would
destroy all life; not even bacteria would survive.  To divert the
oncoming menace, NASA decides to send a bunch of oil drillers, led by
Harry Stamper (Bruce Willis), into space to blow the asteroid into two
pieces.  Scientists calculate the pieces would miss the planet, and
life could continue.
Stamper's oil drillers are not your average astronaut material, since
they are your average movie stereotype roughnecks.  Not much
discipline, trouble with the law, that sort of thing, and ARMAGEDDON
plays the "fish out of water" angle like you would expect.  There are
the scenes where they go through testing, training, and meet the
"real" astronauts.  It's all pretty amusing, especially a sequence
showing how each of them react to one of those Rorschach ink blot
tests.  They don't disappoint in delivery of humorous quips, either.
When they finally blast off, one of them says how incredible it is,
and another replies, "And this is only the beginning of space.  We
haven't even gotten into OUTER space yet!"  The problem is, it's not
very original.  The group reminded me somewhat of the band of veterans
Gene Hackman assembles in UNCOMMON VALOR.  A few of the cast members
even look like them.
Willis has played the tough guy for a long time now, so this role
isn't too much of a stretch for him.  The hardest part in playing
Stamper is trying to keep a Texas accent, which seems to move in and
out of Willis's vocal range.  A little different, though, is that
Stamper is the father of a full grown daughter, Grace (Liv Tyler), who
is love with A.J. Frost (Ben Affleck), one of the best drillers on the
team.  This gives Willis a lot of "I'm your father"-type lines, in
addition to the "I'm out here to save the world" lines.
I'm sure the scenes Affleck shares with Tyler will be appealing to
most women.  He's a handsome guy, and the movie does a lot to show him
doing those romantic things women love, like taking Grace on a picnic
in the middle of nowhere, and singing to her in front of a volume of
people.  Guys will probably think he's a schmuck.  Combined with his
action sequences, Affleck proves himself a versatile actor, but there
just isn't enough to his character to make him really likable.  If he
were to disappear three-quarters of the way through the movie, he
probably wouldn't be missed.
Whereas Affleck may be versatile, Liv Tyler has only two faces:  Pouty
and pensive.  She's nice on the eyes, but her acting is relatively
flat, and that look like she's going to bite her lip anytime now gets
old real fast.  There's also a couple of scenes where she just wigs
out, and I can't characterize them as anything less than annoying.
Perhaps the best performance is given by Billy Bob Thornton, whose
acting is solid.  The scriptwriters also deserve credit for making
Truman a character with depth, considering it could have easily been a
very thankless role.
The special effects work about half the time.  When the drilling crew
takes off in two newly designed space shuttles, the launch sequence is
very gripping.  Just getting it to look like there is a second
launchpad at Kennedy Space Center was good enough for me, but the
power and dazzle of the boosters igniting has to be seen.  Scenes
where much smaller asteroid fragments strike the earth also look
extremely realistic.  Anything involving the asteroid, however, is
throwaway.  It's too dark, vague, cluttered, and amorphous, and since
we don't have any concept of scale, it ends up being relatively
unimpressive.  When the biggest menace in your summer action
blockbuster looks like something the cat coughed up, that's bad.
While I wouldn't say the action is non-stop, Bay keeps the movie going
at a good pace and continuously gives us something to look at, be it
the asteroid, the space shuttles, or Liv Tyler.  Unfortunately, the
action itself is often undermined by not being able to fully see
what's going on in a shot (most of the scenes on the asteroid are in
darkness), or by the ambiguity of why something is supposed to be
dangerous.  "Drilling is an art form," a character says.  Apparently,
like art, it is not easily explained.  Half the time I didn't know
what was going on, and therefore didn't know why the drill started
shaking, and therefore didn't know why everyone was getting so
excited.  When the action in you summer action blockbuster is too
confusing, that's bad.
Many parts of ARMAGEDDON were apparently photographed to produce what
I call "The Bruckheimer Look".  Graduated filters are used to make the
skies more blue, or bluish-purple, while everything under it is shaded
with similar enhancing colors.  You see it in just about all the
Bruckheimer-produced films, like TOP GUN and THE ROCK.  There are also
a lot of scenes meant to show the beauty and variations of humanity:
Kids running, old men looking out of windows, Hindu masses bowing in
the courtyard of a temple - all in slow motion.  It looks a lot like a
credit card or soft drink commercial, or perhaps a music video.  Not
surprisingly, Michael Bay directed a lot of both of those before
coming to film.  My suggestion:  Learn new techniques.  When your
summer action blockbuster looks like a commercial, that's bad.
Action movies are usually notorious for their lack of logic, and this
film is no exception.  Our heroes have to drill only 800 feet so a
nuclear warhead can split the Texas-sized asteroid in two?  I don't
think the physics work out.  How convenient is it, that NASA just
happens to have two (not one, but two) secret prototype space shuttles
ready just in time?  Why were they secret, anyway?  When the main
characters go into space, they take large auto-cannons with them.
Just whom, may I ask, are they expecting to use them on?
Okay, the 16 days to impact thing?  I have to give them credit for
this one.  When asked why they didn't detect the asteroid sooner,
NASA's response is that the pathetic funding for astromonitoring is
only enough to cover about three percent of space.  Take that,
balanced budget.
Although the film isn't as engaging as expected, we are thrown a
couple of treats.  One of the mission control technicians Truman
depends upon to make a key transmission is named Vossler.  The radio
technician aboard the USS Alabama in CRIMSON TIDE, another movie
produced by Jerry Bruckheimer, was also named Vossler.  One of the
astronauts on Stamper's shuttle is named Gruber.  The villains in two
of the DIE HARD movies, starring Bruce Willis, were also named Gruber.
You've got to watch for these things, folks.  They happen a lot more
often than you think.
Oh, one more:  The two main characters are named Harry S. Stamper, and
Dan Truman.  Harry S. and Truman.  Neat, huh?

Title
Review for Enemy of the State (1998)
The National Security Agency is the branch of the Department of Defense
charged with encrypting our nation's secrets and decrypting the secrets of
others.  They have electronic listening posts across the globe set up to
listen in on everything from simple radio waves to hyperencoded satellite
burst transmissions.  The NSA's acres of computers located underground at
Fort Meade, Maryland work twenty-four hours a day to intercept and process
information traveling through wires and through the air.  Simply put, those
who work for the NSA are the premiere eavesdroppers of the world, capable of
gathering electronic intelligence with staggering means.  But what if this
capability were directed internally, at our own citizens?  In fact, what if
it were used to pursue a personal agenda?  It is this question which is the
focus of Tony Scott's ENEMY OF THE STATE.
The film begins at a lake shore with a last-minute attempt by NSA Deputy
Reynolds (Jon Voight) to convince Congressman Hammersly (Jason Robards),
chairman of a key House committee, to pass a bill which would grant the NSA
carte blanche in placing any individual under electronic surveillance.
Receiving Hammersly's emphatic "no," Reynolds orders the Congressman
murdered before he can get back into his car.  However, the murder is
captured on tape by an unwitting nature photographer.  When the photographer
later realizes he is holding evidence with tremendous implications, he finds
himself hunted by NSA operatives, and in his attempt to flee, stuffs the
incriminating recording into the shopping bag of labor attorney Robert Dean
(Will Smith).  Reynolds and his men soon realize what has transpired and
embark on an operation to retrieve the tape, silencing Dean for good if
necessary.
Okay, so here's a guy who's going along his merry way, when he's suddenly
mixed up in something completely over his head, and he doesn't even know
why.  Sound familiar?  It's the plot for a ton of movies.  Come on, think a
bit and I'm sure you'll be able to come up with at least a few.  So if the
film doesn't exactly tow the line for originality, is it too much to expect
that other aspects should make up for it?  Of course not.  Does ENEMY OF THE
STATE deliver?  Sort of.
This movie is supposed to be one of those thrillers that uses technology as
a basis for much of its intrigue and action, but if you want to impress your
audience, you usually want to include some really neat stuff.  ENEMY OF THE
STATE has a lot of neat gizmos, but unfortunately, almost everything used in
the film is stuff that doesn't even meet our expectations.  A tracking
device planted in Dean's shoe?  Oh my, what will they think of next?
Please, Maxwell Smart had the first cellular phone loaded in his.  For
original, check out TOTAL RECALL where Schwarzenegger had the tracking
device shoved up his nose and didn't even know it.  Some Mr. Universe.
Is the ability of the bad guys to follow Dean's every move original?  No.  I
mean, even FAIR GAME with Cindy Crawford used the idea of having a whole
bunch of computers and gadgets to track someone, and here's Tony Scott,
flashing it in our faces as if he's the first guy who's thought of it.
However, even if it's nothing new, it still provides a vehicle for some
exhilarating action scenes, the kind that Scott is a pro at - the kind where
it's not just a bunch of people running around and shooting at each other,
but also constantly talking at the same time.  Having some guy at a computer
feeding information to a some other guy actually doing the running around
adds another dimension to the tired old chases we get with every other
action-thriller.  Think about nearly silent World War II movie dogfight
scenes, versus TOP GUN (which Scott directed) where the air combat included
Maverick and Goose feeding each other information.  Does it busy up the
scene?  Maybe.  Does it heighten the excitement and the tension?  Yes, it
does.  Am I asking too many questions in this review?  What do you think?  Huh?
There's a lot of yelling in this movie.  As much as it works to further the
excitement in an action sequence, it is a severe detriment to the rest of
the scenes.  It seems as though everyone in the film has to have at least a
few shouted lines, and it gets annoying pretty quickly.  Perhaps the worst
example is an argument that Dean and his wife (Regina King) have over their
marriage's stability, where both of them are not just yelling, they're
yelling too loudly for the audience to take.  I swear, it was louder than
some of the explosions that elsewhere punctuate the film.  They're angry and
frustrated.  Okay, we get the point.
Gene Hackman is great (as usual) as Brill, an ex-NSA surveillance specialist
who comes to Dean's aid.  Unfortunately, he shows up after half the film is
already over.  Will Smith, who is in the whole film, is simply miscast since
we expect him to be his usual wisecracking self, but we instead get a flat
performance.  He could yell and run all he wanted to, but I never got the
picture of a man in danger.  Working against Smith is the scripting of his
character, which doesn't do much to endear the audience toward him.  Dean is
a lawyer with an inflated ego and a set of lungs full of hot air.  I started
to dislike him in his first thirty seconds of screentime.  Jon Voight is
perfectly cast as the official with an agenda, but the script is flawed with
regard to his character as well.  We see that Reynolds is not just an evil
guy with a plan to grab as much power as he can, but has a wife and a
daughter, and lives a life not unlike that of the "hero" of the film.  Why
screenwriter David Marconi wanted to engender sympathy for the villain is
beyond me.
This film also gets points taken off for copious use of what I call the
"techno-caption".  I'm sure you've seen it before:  Instead of a location
title (i.e., Washington, D.C.) just appearing at the top or bottom of the
screen, the words appear as if being typed very quickly on some futuristic
word processor, accompanied by an electronic beep-like sound effect as each
letter emerges.  It all seems so superfluous.
In all, this film thinks tries to pass itself off as being cleverer than it
actually is.  The action segments are engaging, and the pace is at some
times frenetic, but it's in those other scenes where old concepts are being
trotted out as new and innovative that ENEMY OF THE STATE fails.  One neat
little thing to look for, however:  When the NSA pulls up an old file
picture of Brill, it's actually a photo of Hackman's character Harry Caul in
Francis Coppola's 1974 film THE CONVERSATION, in which Hackman played a guy
who made his living conducting surveillance on other people.  That, I must
say, was pretty cool.

Title
Review for Mother (1996/II)
I like movies with Albert Brooks, and I really like movies directed
and written by Albert Brooks.  LOST IN AMERICA and DEFENDING YOUR LIFE
are two of my favorite comedies.  His humor is of a kind that is not
very prevalent in movies today, inundated as we are with films which
revel in their aim toward the lowest common denominator.  You will
rarely see any slapstick in an Albert Brooks film, while the dialog
will not be as oppressive as in some of the independent "talk films"
which are finding their way into theaters.  The situations in which
his characters find themselves are ones we can often identify with,
but even if we can't, Brooks has the talent to make them comfortable,
and therefore we laugh.  Teenagers and Jim Carrey fans probably won't
find an Albert Brooks movie very funny, but people who look for more
than what we could find on television probably will.  Put simply,
Brooks' comedy is intelligent.
MOTHER is Albert Brooks' latest film, and it does not disappoint.
Brooks plays John Henderson, a middle-aged science fiction writer just
coming off his second divorce.  He makes an attempt at dating, but
fails miserably.  He then has dinner with his brother Jeff (Rob
Morrow), a successful sports agent who seems to live the ideal life.
Jeff has a good job, a loving family, and most of all, a warm
relationship with their mother Beatrice (Debbie Reynolds).  After
dinner, John witnesses a telephone conversation between Jeff and
Beatrice, and is at the same time amazed and sickened by how
hunky-dory the dialog is.  In comparison, Beatrice always hints at a
fault in John and his career every time she talks with him, and John
gives it right back to her.  At the end of one of their conversations
where Beatrice has just picked apart John's life, she says, "I love
you," and John replies with, "I know you think you do."  The thing is,
Beatrice is not overt with her criticisms, but instead gives them in
that mothering way which is tantamount to nit-picking and guilt
loading.  It's the kind that goes something like, "Yes, dear, I think
you do that wonderfully, BUT...."  It seems as though nothing he does
makes her happy.  There's always the big but.
John believes that his mother is somehow connected to his failed
relationships with women, either because of his flawed self-esteem
caused by his need for validation, or perhaps because he tends to
unconsciously seek out women who remind him of his mother in an
oedipal manner.  He comes to the conclusion that since his problems
are rooted in his boyhood home, he should move back in with his mother
for a while just to see what kinds of feelings come out, and by that
be able to sort out why his life is the way it is.  "A great
experiment", he calls it.
Brooks' own brand of humor really shines in this film, especially in
the interaction John has with his mother.  There's a scene where John
has just arrived at his mother's house, and after having driven from
Los Angeles to Sausalito, and having explained to his mother about the
"great experiment", Beatrice asks, "Now explain to me again why you
don't want to stay at a hotel."  She still doesn't get it, and it is
absolutely hilarious.  In the same scene, we get little glances at the
life his mother leads when she tries to feed him food that is no
longer fresh.  She apparently buys in great quantities and
refrigerates it until the lettuce is wilted and the sherbet is iced
over.  When John points out the ice on the sherbet, Beatrice tells him
not to worry about the protective glaze.  "You've named the ice?" asks
John.  He's also surprised at the variety of items Beatrice keeps in
the refrigerator, such as a twenty-pound block of cheese.  "The
freezer was a good invention," says John, "but it's not supposed to be
used for everything.  That's why it's smaller than the refrigerator."
It's something most of us find strangely familiar.
Brooks is also a master at employing the non sequitur.  For example,
in DEFENDING YOUR LIFE, his and Meryl Streep's characters are in a
comedy club having a discussion.  When they're finished and walk out,
Brooks cuts to the comic on stage who is just at the point of
delivering his punch line, "And so the moral is, if you have to fart,
go outside!"  You don't know what the joke was because you couldn't
hear him during the entire scene, but I must have laughed for the next
five minutes, it seemed so out of context.  In this film, Brooks uses
the same trick a couple of times to open or close a scene.  I don't
want to give them away, but suffice it to say they work just as well
as they have in the past.
John's purpose for staying with his mother is to learn, and we as the
audience learn right along with him.  His mother is not the
fascinating type to begin with, but as John spends more time with her,
we learn things about her personality and her lifestyle that give her
depth.  Watching the character of Beatrice unfold is every bit as
enjoyable as the humor that accompanies it each step of the way.
On screen, Brooks does an excellent job playing this kind of
character:   You get the feeling he often believes he is the only sane
person in an insane world.  In a way, he's very much like Yosarian of
CATCH-22, expect with something of an attitude.  Casting Debbie
Reynolds as Beatrice is perfect.  She assumes the part with ease, even
moving and speaking a little slowly, and is just so adorable it's hard
to get mad at her character.  This only helps the audience to share
the frustration John feels when dealing with her.  As his first
choice, Brooks originally wanted to lure Nancy Reagan out from her
acting retirement to play Beatrice, but the former actress and first
lady could not leave her husband, who was beginning to show symptoms
of Alzheimer's disease.  That may be just as well, since Reynolds
lends a softness to the character which enhances it immensely.  Rob
Morrow also does a good job at playing the younger brother who has
always been mother's favorite and, for all his success in his job and
family, is slowly exposed as a mama's boy.
The only things that hold this movie back from being better are a
couple of plot holes.  A solid connection is not really made between
John's troubles and his reasons for living with his mother.
Additionally, the end results of the experiment do not necessarily
jibe with the stated goals, and although this may have been sloppy
screenwriting, how can you be mad at the guy who also wrote this?:
Beatrice:  You must think I'm some kind of moron.
John:  No, I think your someone who thinks I'm a moron.
Beatrice:  Well, it takes one to know one.

Title
Review for Free Enterprise (1998)
There are guys out there who grew up on Star Trek, and perhaps even
lived it out in various ways.  In their younger days, they fantasized
about being Captain Kirk, maybe role played the part on the school
playground or had a costume with the familiar yellow shirt and black
pants.  These folks have gotten older, and although they no longer
dress the part on Halloween, the attraction to the 30+ year old
phenomenon is still very much there, and still an influence.  FREE
ENTERPRISE is about two such young men in their late twenties, Robert
(Rafer Weigel) and Mark (Eric McCormack), childhood friends who find
themselves at a crossroads of sorts as they approach the big three-oh.
Taking stock of their lives so far, they together attempt to sort out
their lives in work, love, and Star Trek.
To me, Star Trek is a great source of entertainment.  I don't revere
it as the end-all of morality, like some people do, but rather view it
as a nice outlook for our own future.  I also believe that in order to
truly enjoy Star Trek, one must be able to laugh at it, and there are
so many reasons and ways to do so.  A film like FREE ENTERPRISE is
something for which a lot of people (including myself) have been
waiting a long time.  There is no doubt that this film was made for
Star Trek fans because of the many references to the episodes and
movies (oh, and that's Classic Trek, folks - sorry Next Generation
fans).  Many of the best laughs will probably be lost on
non-aficionados.  It's revealed, for example, that one of Mark's
fantasies is to get in bed with a green woman.  One might not really
catch the meaning of this unless you knew that the Talosians attempted
to seduce the previous captain of the Starship Enterprise, Capt.
Christopher Pike, with a sexy green Orion woman in the only two-part
Star Trek Episode entitled "The Menagerie", in a scene which was
really from the original pilot episode entitled "The Cage", before
series creator Gene Roddenberry revamped the show and replaced all of
the actors except for Leonard Nimoy.  Or, um, at least that's what
I've been told.
However, in a possible attempt to make the film more accessible to the
rest of the world, screenwriters Mark Altman and Robert Meyer Burnett
(it's no coincidence that the main characters have the same names)
have chosen to dilute this main comedic drive with a number of more
mainstream jokes, leaving the Star Trek punch not as potent as it
should be.  Unfortunate, especially since the mainstream humor doesn't
really click.  The result is fewer belly laughs for the fans, and
lukewarm jokes for everyone else.  If I had my druthers, there'd be a
Star Trek joke every few minutes.  After all, why take on such a
monolithic source of potential humor as the main drive for your film
if you're not going to exploit it?
Speaking of exploitation, William Shatner, who plays himself, gets the
Good Sport of the Year Award just for being in this film.  One of the
first scenes includes Robert and Mark browsing in a book store when
they see the man who portrayed Captain James T. Kirk himself - and
he's flipping through a porno mag.  After he gets to know them, he
attempts to enlist their help in producing a new version of
Shakespeare's Julius Caesar, in which he'll play all the roles.
Forget about what everyone else has said about Shatner's ego.  You've
got to love a man who can allow himself to be made fun of like that.
One of the interesting things about this film is that the characters
do things which my friends and I - er, I mean, which I've seen other
people do....from time to time.  For example, Robert, Mark and their
friends are going out to a special screening of STAR TREK II:  THE
WRATH OF KAHN.  How do they show their enthusiasm?  By all shouting,
"Khaaaaan!", ala Kirk when marooned in the tunnels of the Regula Moon,
second stage experiment for the Genesis Project - or, um, so I'm told.
The thing is, the characters are too much like regular people, who, in
addition to showing their enthusiasm for Star Trek now and then, also
have other interests, and showcasing these other interests strays our
attention even further from the main feature.  There's a big deal
about going to the comics store, having a collection of Star Wars
action figures, and possessing the Criterion Collection laserdisc
versions of Hitchcock films.  Realistic?  Yes.  Good for the film?
No.
There are a couple of half-hearted attempts at throwing in a romance
angle.  Robert falls in love with a woman, but really doesn't know how
to handle the emotions.  Meanwhile, Shatner falls in love with the
proprietor of a trendy night club/bar, and spends some of his time
trying to get her attention.  There's great potential here to explore
how Star Trek affects the way each of these men deal with love, or how
love affects their association with Star Trek.  Unfortunately, the
romance angle has no clear association with the topic, and is
furthermore less than compelling.
Am I going too far in criticizing the film for detracting from the
Star Trek jokes?  Am I missing the point that the film is really about
how average people relate to themselves and to each other?  I don't
think so.  I mean, the film is called FREE ENTERPRISE, after all, and
it does have William Shatner.  Star Trek not only has to be the main
theme, but the overriding theme, and this film simply does not deliver
in this respect.  It's too bad because this FREE ENTERPRISE could have
filled a niche empty up until now, a true Star Trek fan parody.  It
really could have gone where no one had gone before.  Come on, now.
You know I had to say it.

Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
It's an interesting premise.  Our reality is only real to us because
it is what we perceive to be real.  In truth, our entire existences
are lived out in our minds as we are fed information through
electronic inputs directly to our brains.  What we see, what we do,
everything around us is nothing more than a computer-generated
construct interlinked with the minds of others through a vastly
powerful artificial intelligence.  Our bodies, severely atrophied, are
kept alive for the sole purpose of generating heat and electrical
energy for a dominating order of machines which control the planet.
The sci-fi realm has been waiting a little while for something new to
come along.  THE MATRIX isn't it - the idea of a war between man and a
sentient computer network, a sham world, the ability to plug one's
brain into a computer, has all been gleaned from such sources as THE
TERMINATOR, DARK CITY, and a few Star Trek episodes (both classic and
Next Generation).  What is new is the ability to weave all of these
various elements together and succeed in producing a film that is both
entertaining as well as thought-provoking.
Keanu Reeves plays a computer whiz nicknamed Neo, who is plucked out
of the artificial world (known as the matrix) by a group of renegade
humans who are clandestinely fighting to expose the fallacy of the
computer-generated existence and free humankind from the oppression of
the machines.  The group's leader, Morpheus (Laurence Fishburne), has
chosen Neo because he believes Neo is "the one" who is destined to
lead the attack against the artificial intelligence.  
>From the beginning of the film, we are kept on our toes trying to
figure things out.  This, in a lesser movie would be annoying, but THE
MATRIX presents itself in an intelligent manner which makes the puzzle
rather interesting and even fun.  What is reality?  What is a sham?
The film turns our very perception of life on its side.  More than
once, we are also presented with the question of whether we would
rather know the harsh truth of reality, or live a life of relative
bliss, oblivious to the true nature of our surroundings.  As viewers,
this is intriguing enough, so imagine what it would be like for Neo.
And who to better play a bewildered person than Keanu Reeves?
Reeves, whom I've never really cared for as an actor, is competent in
roles which require a lot of straightforwardness, and little subtlety.
He was good in SPEED, for example, but laughably poor in A WALK IN THE
CLOUDS.  Neo is actually one of those roles which Reeves slips into
rather nicely, so much of my expectation was happily for naught.  In a
couple of places, the script even capitalizes upon his wooden nature,
and this is a heavy credit to writers/directors Andy and Larry
Wachowski.  I mean, since BILL AND TED'S EXCELLENT ADVENTURE, what
movie could you say really "utilized" Keanu Reeves?
More interesting than Reeves is Fishburne, who's Morpheus nearly runs
the gamut of emotions, and convincingly so.  Very surprising for a
sci-fi movie.  Fishburne also maintains a certain demeanor about
himself throughout, as if he always knows what to expect.  This helps
to further the aura of his character's proficiency and extensive
knowledge.  Hugo Weaving as Agent Smith, one of the artificial
intelligence's anti-intruder programs, is also good playing his
deadpan, no-nonsense, kick ass role, which requires him to show
emotion at the appropriate time.  Unfortunately, when Weaving speaks
for more than a few sentences in a row, the nature of his character's
speech pattern becomes a little more laughable than impressive.
Carrie-Anne Moss plays Trinity, Morpheus's number one assistant who
becomes somewhat of a love interest for Neo.  Although her character
is somewhat inconsistent, Moss nevertheless delivers an above par
performance when Fishburne isn't in the picture.
There were few expenses spared when it comes to the special effects.
Many methods of imagery are employed, from modeling to bluescreen to
computer graphics.  Of special note is the use of the "freeze and
turn" effect where the entire scene is frozen, turned, then continued
from a new angle.  This is accomplished by using a large number of
still cameras employed in a semi-circle, with motion picture cameras
placed at the two ends.  The motion cameras film the action, and at
the appropriate moment all the still cameras fire at once.  Place each
still image in a film sequence and you get a nearly seamless
transition from the first motion camera to the second.  Pretty slick.
THE MATRIX drips with style.  From the clothing to the music to the
action, we're watching an exaggerated version of what we're used to.
Much of it seems like the combination of two genres of the Hong Kong
action film - there's a lot of Kung Fu, there's a lot of gunplay.
When a character is letting go with an automatic weapon, much is made
of the empty cartridges falling to the floor in slow motion.  There's
also the element of the Japanese action cartoon (called anime by
aficionados), especially in the way the sequences are filmed in
sweeping pans and emphasized actions through special effects.
Combined, it's really like no live-action film I have ever seen.
The film is not without its faults.  Some of the scenes and ideas are
"borrowed" a little too liberally from other films, and one component
of the ending is decidedly disappointing.  Some of the lines are also
pretty bad - in one instance, a supporting character incorrectly
delivers a famous saying, and it wasn't meant to be a joke.  However,
these shortcomings detract little from what is an overall solid action
sci-fi film that for once does more than merely entertain.

Title
Review for Daylight (1996)
An explosion in an underwater tunnel connecting Manhattan and New
Jersey leaves the few survivors trapped and nearly inaccessible.  One
man, Kit Latura, can save them.  The problem is, Kit used to be head
of the Emergency Medical Service, but these days he is a driver for a
car service.  What happened?  Trying to effect a rescue, he made the
wrong call and got people killed.  Only the immediacy of the crisis
can jolt him back into action.  Sound familiar?  A few years ago, a
film starring Sylvester Stallone and based on a similar premise was
called CLIFFHANGER.  A couple of years before that, another movie
based on the same idea was called DEMOLITION MAN.  Stallone was in
that one, too.  This movie is called DAYLIGHT.  Hey, Kit Latura is
played by....Sylvester Stallone!
Ever see THE POSEIDON ADVENTURE?  Apparently so did Leslie Bohem, who
wrote the script for DAYLIGHT, since the survivors are all patterned
after characters from the 1972 movie.  We have Madelyne (Amy
Brenneman), a frustrated playwright who's purpose is to be scared when
Stallone needs to look strong, and to get into trouble when we need a
lady in distress, much like Pamela Sue Martin's Susan.  We have Steven
(Jay O. Sanders) the brute who is there to question everything Kit
does, just like Ernest Borgnine's Mr. Rogo.  There's Eleanor and Roger
Trilling (Claire Bloom and Colin Fox), an elderly couple who realize
the importance of having each other.  Did someone say Shelley Winters
and Jack Albertson?  Let's not forget George (Stan Shaw), the police
officer who knows his way around the tunnels.  It's good Stallone has
this guy, just like Gene Hackman had Roddy McDowell as the steward who
knew his way around the ship.
The borrowing from THE POSEIDON ADVENTURE goes beyond the supporting
characters themselves.  Even some of their fates are the same.  Oh,
and don't even get me started on plot points.  The disagreement on
which way to go, swimming underwater to find an exit, getting the
medallion out to the loved one (okay, in this case it's a bracelet),
they're all there.  Halfway through the movie, I wondered if DAYLIGHT
were a remake.
I should mention a key element which made the supporting characters of
DAYLIGHT different from the ones in THE POSEIDON ADVENTURE.  With few
exceptions, the characters in DAYLIGHT are all unworthy of our
sympathy.  Madelyne is fed up with New York due to the roaches and
rats in her apartment and her constant rejections from potential
producers, but the last straw comes when the married man with whom she
is having an affair can't get out of his marriage.  Oh yeah, I really
feel for her.  Eleanor and Roger's biggest concern is why their
Weimaraner won't breed.  Sure, poverty in New York City's streets
needs to take a powder and make way for the dog.  You get the idea.
At least you cared what happened to Red Buttons and Carol Lynley.
Stallone's performance in this film is much like the premise:  The
same as in previous movies.  Not to say it's a bad thing.  Stallone
has always been a convincing action hero and has played that kind of
part a lot better than the comedic roles he's tried in order to flex
those acting muscles.  It's just that we're not seeing anything new
this time around.  The supporting cast, on the other hand, turn in
lackluster performances of stock characters.  They might as well have
phoned it in.
The action itself is all stuff we've seen before.  Much of Stallone's
hanging from the tunnel ceilings looks a lot like he wants to prove he
can still climb like in CLIFFHANGER.  There's a scene with Stallone
and Brenneman in an underwater vortex which looks a great deal like
the last few minutes of TWISTER.  The most contrived of all scenes,
however, is the set up for Stallone's famous slow motion run away from
danger.  It's usually from an explosion or collapsing building or some
other such catastrophe, which invariably culminates in a leap toward
the camera.  Pained yell is optional.  In DAYLIGHT, Stallone runs from
a rolling flammable liquid trailer.  It's not really in slow motion,
but he's running in three and a half feet of water, so the illusion is
thus created.  Yes, yes, he makes the leap, but instead of toward the
camera to spirit himself that extra distance from danger, he leaps to
the side!  One wonders, "Why didn't he do that when the trailer was
much farther away?"  To create a false sense of tension, stupid.
One thing that caught my eye was how director Rob Cohen handles the
tunnel explosion.  Unlike anything I've seen before, this film
actually takes you into the explosion and keeps you there while the
fireball rolls over the unfortunate motorists.  Its debatable whether
or not what we see is an accurate representation, but the visual of
the whole thing is rather intriguing, and the notion of incineration
from the heat or asphyxiation from the fire's consumption of oxygen is
equally horrifying.  However, that was the only part of the movie that
was innovative.  Oh, in case you're about to tell me that flooding a
compartment in order to free yourself from Davy Jones' Locker is also
innovative, I refer you to AIRPORT '77.
Overall, DAYLIGHT is not a bad movie for what it is, which is two
hours of, well, Stallone.  You don't go into one of his movies
expecting great social commentary, so as long as you keep that in
mind, you can actually enjoy it.  I must, however, give credit to this
film for actually making me believe that the death-defying dog didn't
defy death after all.  You see, the dog in question was thought to
have died in the explosion, but soon comes trotting out from the
wreckage when called.  Fair enough.  But then, when the band of
survivors has to swim underwater to relative safety, the dog
(seemingly) does not make it.  I thought, "Wow, they killed the dog
after all."  Only after another tragedy does the dog resurface,
unscathed.  I'm beginning to think that dogs, not cats, have nine
lives.

Title
Review for Haunting, The (1999)
Okay, I admit it.  I don't really like scary movies a whole lot
because they're, well, scary.  Sometimes the ol' imagination gets
going when I'm alone at night, and the images I saw in that creepy
movie two days ago come back to haunt me.  I lie in bed under the
covers and wonder just how much I have to go to the bathroom.  Doing
so would mean putting my foot on the floor for a second, leaving
myself exposed to any number of things that might reach out from under
the bed and grab my ankle.  No, I can wait until morning.  If I can go
back to sleep, that is.
The latest film to come out of SKG Dreamworks, Jan De Bont's THE
HAUNTING, gives us chills and scares, but (lucky for me) doesn't
present us with a great deal of those indelible images that haunt us
after we've left the theater.  There's a scene, for example, when one
of the characters investigates the ashes of a large fireplace and
finds a skeleton.  What happens next caused half the theater to
collectively scream, but it's hearing the surprise of 200 people that
I'll remember, not what happened on the screen.  Phil Tippett's
effects company and the venerable Industrial Light and Magic do a
marvelous job rendering seamless computer images like moving statues
and shifting walls, but again, while the effects may be impressive,
the impression doesn't last.
The one image that has stayed with me was also the one that freaked me
out the most in the theater.  Interestingly, it was also probably the
easiest effect undertaken in the film.  Throughout the house are
carvings of children's faces - these little cherubic images that many
people find charming.  One of the characters is lying in bed and
glances over to a row of these carvings, all seemingly staring at the
wall opposite them.  She looks away for a second, and when she looks
back they have all shifted position so that they are facing her.  Very
reminiscent of that scene early in POLTERGEIST when the mother turns
away from the kitchen table, then turns back to find all the chairs
stacked up on the table.  It goes it show that sometimes the simplest
things work the best.
Unfortunately, it seems pretty obvious that the effects, rather than
the story, were meant to carry the film.  The plot revolves around
researcher Dr. Jeffrey Marrow (Liam Neeson) and three subjects he
recruits for what he says is a study of insomnia, but which is
actually a study of group fear.  As part of this study, they are to
spend several weeks in a mansion in the Berkshires known as Hill
House.  The three subjects, Eleanor (Lili Taylor), Theodora (Catherine
Zeta-Jones), and Luke (Owen Wilson) are a cross section of
personalities who are totally unaware of the true nature of their
participation.  "You don't tell the rats they're in a maze," says
Marrow.  Indeed.  Marrow's reasoning for conducting his study in the
gothicly creepy Hill House is that it's a highly suggestive
environment from which his subjects will no doubt generate their own
imagined fears.  The rest of the story in a nutshell:  Guess what, the
house really is haunted!  Mayhem ensues.
It turns out that the owner of the mansion, the late Hugh Crane, is
still in the house - yes, that's right - haunting it.  Crane
apparently built the house for children he would never have, yet
legend has it that at night, inhabitants of the nearby village would
hear children's voices.  Why this is and why the spirits of a couple
hundred children are also inhabiting the stately Crane manor is not
fully explained.  It also turns out that Eleanor has a connection to
the Crane family, and may be the only one able to free the spirits of
the children.  This is also not explained to satisfaction, and
contributes greatly to a rather poorly constructed story.  Basically,
we see things happen, but are only given superficial reasons why, and
later on, the "explanations" raise more questions than they answer.
What sort of power does Eleanor command?  Why does she have this
power?  How, exactly, was she drawn to participate in the study?
Crane had two wives?  When were we informed of this and why was this
significant?
Eleanor is the only important character in the film, and even she gets
annoying once she starts down the path toward realizing why she's
there.  Marrow, the one who was controlling the experiment, doesn't
even know what's going on until it's too late, and Theodora is a turn
off from the beginning, showing up with too much luggage and a rich
girl's attitude.  "I like your boots," admires Eleanor.  "Prada,"
explains Theodora.  "Milan, not New York."  Oh, she likes girls as
well as boys, by the way.  I don't know why they even put this in, as
it never becomes much of an issue.  As for Luke, he's just in there to
show up looking surprised when something happens.  As a result, our
emotional attachment to these characters is pretty close to zero.
There are a few good points to the film, in addition to the effects I
mentioned earlier.  Soundwise, THE HAUNTING is very rich.  The mere
sound of the mansion's heavy doors slamming shut is enough to send a
little shiver up your spine, and when things really start popping, the
theater's speakers nearly jump off the walls.  More than a few shots
by de Bont are designed to generate suspense, and they generally do so
with success.  On several occasions, for example, the camera lingers
on objects after the actors have left the scene, and our own
imaginations take over.  Did I see it move?  It's as if we're the
subjects of Dr. Marrow's study.  Oh, yeah, and the film gets a couple
of extra points for using an AMC Gremlin automobile in a few scenes.
No, I don't like the Gremlin, by hey, fits with the supernatural
theme, you know?  Unfortunately, with lackluster story which confuses
more than captivates, and effects which startle more than scare, THE
HAUNTING, like the Gremlin, turns out to be mostly a disappointment.

Title
Review for Dante's Peak (1997)
It's time to take cover.  After a hiatus of about fifteen years, the
disaster movie has come back with renewed zest.  In early 1997, there
were no less than three movies about volcanoes alone, one on
television and two in the theaters, with DANTE'S PEAK and VOLCANO in
heavy competition for the moviegoing dollar.  Of the two, I had heard
that DANTE'S PEAK was the better film, so I decided to check it out
when it was released on video.
The film begins with a slow motion scene of people in a third world
country trying to evacuate their little town.  The town is being
covered in ash and sulfuric water from what we presume is a volcanic
eruption.  Flaming rocks of various sizes also fall from the sky,
crushing homes and people.  We see people panicking, people crying,
and even horses rearing.  It is a disaster of biblical proportions,
signified to us by one person dragging a cross down a road.  Symbolism
doesn't get much more blatant than that.
We learn that Harry Dalton (Pierce Brosnan), a volcanologist with the
U.S. Geological Survey, was there with his wife when the eruption
occurred.  Harry survived, but his wife did not.  A few years later,
Harry is sent to investigate some unusual seismic activity detected
near the small town of Dante's Peak, Washington (which, we are told,
has been voted Second Most Desirable Place to Live (Under 20,000) by
the readers of Money Magazine).  There Harry meets Rachel Wando, a
single mother of two who serves as mayor of Dante's Peak and
proprietor of a small coffee shop.  Although the mayor doesn't seem to
be alarmed by the presence of a man sent to determine if the mountain
next to their town is going to blow up, a few members of the city
council are.  They are afraid that Harry's presence is going to scare
off an investor who has pledged to put millions of dollars into
developing Dante's Peak.  They would rather have any news of possible
stirrings within the neighboring dormant volcano swept under the rug.
However, when an amorous young couple takes a skinny-dip in the local
hot springs, they turn up cooked by lava which bubbles up from a small
fissure underneath.  Thus begins a chain of events leading up to the
inevitable eruption.
This film contains a number of cliches.  The amorous couple is one.
As soon as they doff their clothes, you know they're going to die.
The town busybody and the abrasive mother-in-law make appearances, as
does the death-defying dog.  Countless familiar scenarios only serve
to make this film very predictable.  Watching the movie, I was able to
not only anticipate each of the major plot elements, but some of the
dialogue as well.  Unfortunate, since much of the dialog is terrible.
For example, Harry's boss, Paul (Charles Hallahan),  and a team from
the U.S. Geological Survey join Harry to assess the situation.  Paul
basically tells the townsfolk that Harry's eruption predictions aren't
cause for alarm.  This causes Harry to leave in a fit of rage, only to
turn up the next day, ready for work.  When Paul asks Harry why he
stayed, he says with grim determination, "Cause this town's in trouble
and I'm the best man you've got."  Even better is when Harry is trying
to explain the need to jolt the residents into leaving.  He likens the
situation to how a frog will jump out if dropped into a pot of boiling
water.  If the frog is in cold water which is gradually heated up,
however, the frog won't move and will allow itself to be cooked.  "Is
that your recipe for frog soup?" asks one of the team members.  "It's
my recipe for disaster," responds Harry.
DANTE'S PEAK has a singular talent for pointing out the obvious.  Our
heroes are in a boat in the middle of a lake which Harry realizes the
volcanic activity has turned to acid.  Mayor Wando demonstrates her
brilliant powers of deduction by proclaiming, in a very grave tone,
"Acid eats metal."  Thanks for the tip.  When we first see the U.S.
Geological Survey building, there's a caption labeling it as such.
This wouldn't have been so bad if it weren't for the fact that the
caption is right above a sign on the building which reads, in large
letters, "U.S. Geological Survey."  I suppose the caption is for
people who can't read signs.
Although Harry and Mayor Wando become an item by the end of the film,
the viewer has no idea why.  There is a severe lack of chemistry
between the two characters, and the relationship seems rushed because
of this.  When they get close to kissing, I was asking myself, "Why do
they want to kiss?  Were they even attracted to each other?"  If I
were the mayor, I would sure think twice about kissing a guy who
doesn't even crack a smile through the whole movie, trying to pull off
the rough-yet-debonair act.  Who does he think he is?  James Bond?
The eruption of the volcano feels similarly rushed.  There are several
"warning signs" prior to the eruption itself, but they are so
lackluster and without suspense that we don't feel as if they are
leading up to anything.  For example, one of the survey team members
makes his way down into the crater of the volcano in order to retrieve
a remote controlled robot.  A tremor occurs.  Does he plunge headlong
to his death?  Is he engulfed in lava which shoots up from below?  No,
a couple of rocks fall on him and break his leg.  The sole purpose of
this scene seemed to be to set up the subsequent chopper rescue scene,
which I suppose was intended to be dramatic as well.  It wasn't.
One plot thread left noticeably hanging was the investment in the town
of Dante's Peak.  In a disaster movie, there's usually one guy who's
greedy enough to cover up the possibility of
eruption/fire/earthquake/explosion/tsunami/tornado/meteorite, and
usually gets killed by the disaster.  It's okay, of course, because we
all think he got what he deserved.  If you're going to be unoriginal,
you might as well go all the way.  In DANTE'S PEAK, the city
councilmembers are concerned, but they don't really try hard enough.
Maybe the mayor's abrasive mother-in-law should have been the one.
For no apparent reason, she snaps at Harry for even positing that the
volcano could erupt.  Perhaps her ancestors invested in some Pompeii
real estate.
There are a couple of good things about this movie.  The first is the
scenery.  There are panoramic shots of forests, lakes and mountains
that are absolutely beautiful.  The second is the special effects.
They are the closest I've ever seen to a real pyroclastic eruption.
But when elements which don't speak are going to be the best parts of
your movie, you'd probably better rewrite the script.

Title
Review for Inspector Gadget (1999)
About fifteen years ago, a cartoon called "Inspector Gadget" premiered
on American television featuring the voice of "Get Smart" star Don
Adams as a bumbling police detective with the unique characteristic of
being robotic.  Inspector Gadget did not have the self confidence of
the Six Million Dollar Man, nor the icy-cool visage of Robocop, but
instead was just an inept human being who happened to be partly
mechanical and loaded with a whole bunch of neat little devices.  Most
of his detective work was actually conducted by his niece, Penny, and
her dog, Brain, both of whom constantly accompanied or followed Gadget
to make sure that he stayed out of too much trouble.  
Today we're given David Kellogg's INSPECTOR GADGET, starring the
ever-youthful Matthew Broderick as the title character.  Gadget starts
out as John Brown, a security guard for a robotics research firm run
by Brenda (Joely Fisher) and her father (Rene Auberjonois).  The firm
is on the verge of completing work on a robotic prosthetic foot which
could be remotely controlled by the brainwaves of a human operator,
when the greedy tycoon Sanford Scolex (Rupert Everett) breaks into the
firm's lab, stealing the foot and killing Brenda's father in the
process.  Brown jumps into his Chevette and pursues Scolex, only to be
blown up by one of Scolex's innovative and fearsome weapons, an
explosive cigar.  As a result of the explosion, however, Brown's
bowling ball, which happened to be in the Chevette, flies into the air
and lands on Scolex's hand.  Scolex gets his hand replaced by a
mechanical claw, and renames himself, well, Claw.  Meanwhile, Brenda
uses all of her robotic wizardry to remake Brown, and Inspector Gadget
is born.  When Claw finds out about this mechanical wonder, however,
he becomes bent upon stealing the new technology to build an army of
Gadgets he can sell off to countries around the world.
INSPECTOR GADGET is a movie intended for kids, and on that level it
works pretty well.  It's got an uncomplicated plot, a lot of slapstick
comedy, and simple jokes.  Children will love it, but their parent
guardians may have a slightly less enjoyable experience.  First of
all, edits made after the trailers went to theaters serve to confuse
the attentive viewer by leaving out explanatory scenes.  For example,
Gadget goes to some kind of mayoral ball, but we have no idea why.  It
also seems that attendees are not surprised in the least that this
mechanical man is dancing in their midst.  Why?  Because the scene
showing that the ball was meant to debut Inspector Gadget was cut
completely.  I assume this missing scene was also where we get to see
why Police Chief Quimby (Dabney Coleman) harbors so much animosity for
his newest member of the force, since it's never explained
satisfactorily anywhere else in the film.  I really have to wonder why
these edits were made in the first place, as the film runs short at
about eighty minutes anyway.
Unlike the animated series, Penny (Michelle Trachtenberg) and Brain
are relegated to what amounts to barely supporting roles.  In fact,
they seem more of an afterthought homage to the original cartoon,
since their inclusion in the film is so superfluous that they could
have been left out altogether.  Too bad, as it would've been hilarious
to see a live action Brain following Gadget around and keeping him
safe.  Of course, they'd have to put that "No animals were harmed...."
disclaimer in big, bold letters at the end of the movie, as Brain was
frequently on the receiving end of exploding parcels and the like
which he intercepted before they reached Gadget.  It would seem that
in not exploring this possibility, the filmmakers passed up a great
opportunity for comedy and development of other characters (even if
one is a dog).
Speaking of the original show, you should know that it had no
connection to Disney whatsoever.  You wouldn't think so, the way the
live-action film version of the lovable cartoon is marketed in all
venues as "Disney's" INSPECTOR GADGET.  But there it is.  To be fair,
the possessive is more than mere credit grabbing.  Actually, the film
has that touch that plagues most of Disney's recent non-cartoon
features - just look at films like THE BIG GREEN, 101 DALMATIANS, or
THAT DARN CAT (with Christina Ricci, not Dean Jones), and you'll see a
certain quality of, oh, we'll call it goofy filmmaking (no reference
to the man-dog-thing intended).  INSPECTOR GADGET is laden with weird
sound effects that come out of nowhere for the sole reason of pushing
a scene over the edge and making it, well, goofy.  For example, a
billboard advertising the internet search engine Yahoo! falls on
someone, and as we see the logo come tumbling over, we hear the sound
effect of someone yelling, "Yahoo!"  Stuff like that occurs throughout
the film, and my reaction was that watching it was like watching an
episode of "Bill Nye, The Science Guy," which relentlessly uses the
same effects technique.  My girlfriend, by the way, very astutely
pointed out that "Bill Nye" is also produced by Disney.  Will someone
please give us a break?  Well, at least the billboard wasn't plugging
the internet's Go Network, which everything associated with Disney is
doing these days.
Shameless product placements also abound throughout the film, most
noticeably in Gadget's gadgetmobile.  Built right into the car's
console are buttons which, while never used, seem to dispense
Coca-Cola, Sprite, Skittles, M&M's, and a couple of other things which
we're supposed to go out any buy once the movie's over.  By the way,
the car also talks.  It's one of those ploys for the kids which adults
will find interminable, since the car doesn't say anything funny at
all, not even when it says, "You have to use your seat belt.  This is
a Disney movie."  It only reminded me of the painfully obvious.
Broderick actually does a pretty decent job filling the shoes of the
cartoon hero, although the screenplay doesn't require a whole lot of
the otherwise talented actor.  Unfortunately, the simplistic script
seems to almost visibly constrain the rest of the movie's players.  I
so much wanted Rupert Everett to have some juicy lines with which he
could take his character over the top.  He chews scenery, but it's
more like a nibble here and there, rather than the voracious feeding
frenzy I was hoping for.  Meanwhile, Joely Fischer's Brenda is
entirely forgettable.  As I write this review, I can't even recall a
line she had in the whole film.  The thing is, I can't fault her
because she displays a great acting range in a sequence where she
plays a dual role, and evidently could have really done a lot more
with Brenda if the script had only allowed it.  In the supporting
cast, Dabney Coleman has literally nothing to do, but is still cast
well as Quimby because he actually looks like the cartoon character.
Andy Dick as one of Claw's scientists and Cheri Oteri as the mayor
basically play the roles they play on television.  As Sykes, Claw's
minion, actor Michael G. Hagerty, supporting player in so many films
and various television episodes, stretches his acting range by
allowing us to see him for once without his mustache.  Wow.
But again, this film is for the kids anyway, and it's a lot of good,
clean fun for them, if not so much for you.  Just remember that:  It's
not for you.   In other words, don't go into the theater expecting a
reward for your years of watching the cartoon.  That will only
engender the kind of animosity you now have for George Lucas in making
STAR WARS EPISODE ONE:  THE PHANTOM MENACE.  And that's not very
productive, now is it?

Title
Review for Godzilla (1998)
Over 40 years ago, a Japanese production company called Toho
introduced the Land of the Rising Sun to Gojira, a reptilian creature
of immense proportions created by mankind's nuclear testing.  Partly
flight of fancy, partly commentary on the exploitation of atomic power
and weaponry, Gojira emerged from the ocean to terrorize Tokyo.  A
year later, GOJIRA was marketed to the United States by adding three
things:  A new name, a dubbed English track, and Raymond Burr.  As
GODZILLA, the film took on the rest of the world.  Thirty years later,
Toho remade the classic film and once again took it to the American
market by adding the same three things (yes, including Raymond Burr)
and called it GODZILLA 1985.  Now it's 14 years after Toho's remake,
and director Roland Emmerich has allowed the giant lizard to make an
American first run.
In Emmerich's GODZILLA, Matthew Broderick plays Dr. Niko Tatopoulos, a
biologist who is called in to join other scientists in the South
Pacific already studying the existence of a radiation-induced super
mutant which leaves footprints the size of livingrooms.  When the
mutant reptile suddenly appears out of the Hudson River, Tatopoulos
and the rest of the team relocate themselves back to the States.
Meanwhile, Tatopoulos's college girlfriend, Audrey Timmonds (Maria
Pitillo), works in New York City as an assistant to a big-time news
reporter.  She'd like to be a reporter herself, and when Godzilla
comes ashore, she figures this is her big break.  Of course, with the
big guy running amok in the city, Niko and Audrey are bound to cross
paths, and are joined by Victor "Animal" Palotti (Hank Azaria),
Audrey's trusty cameraman friend, and Phillipe Roche (Jean Reno), an
operative for the French government, whose nuclear testing started the
whole problem in the first place.  Together they attempt to find and
destroy the surprisingly elusive Godzilla.
With the resources of the most cutting edge special effects houses and
the clout of one of the nation's premiere movie production companies,
one would think Emmerich could make a film truly deserving of the name
GODZILLA.  He didn't.  Right up there with THE LOST WORLD, GODZILLA is
one of the biggest disappointments in recent cinematic history.
The plot is pretty much what we expect:  The big dinosaur-like
creature comes out of the water and starts smashing New York City, and
it's up to our heroes to figure out why this thing is on its rampage
and how it can be stopped, while the military makes futile attempts to
bring the creature down.  The script, however, is painfully bad.  It's
fraught with lines so corny, they don't even belong in B-movies, and
includes many character actions which make you think, "You idiot," or
"You stupid girl."
I suppose when you've got a movie with a giant lizard loose in New
York, any other semblance of reality goes out the window as well.  Why
is it that Godzilla topples some buildings by merely brushing against
them, but is conveniently able to leap atop others?  Why do
helicopters have to follow Godzilla by flying dangerously between
buildings where they can lose sight of him, when they could more
easily keep track of him by flying a little higher and in a straight
line?  Why do sidewinder missiles, which have small explosive
warheads, blow up entire buildings when they miss Godzilla?  Why is a
mission to bomb Madison Square Garden carried out by three F-18
fighter-bombers, when flights of such aircraft are always comprised of
multiples of two?  Okay, maybe the last one was a bit nit-picky, but
hey, I was on a roll.
Broderick is usually a good actor, but in this film he's weighed down
by an unexciting character and an atrocious screenplay which seem to
fight against him every step of the way.  Hank Azaria does what he
can, but don't expect to see development of any of the promise he
showed in THE BIRDCAGE.  Like Broderick's, Azaria's character is quite
simply lacking in color.  What really annoyed me was Maria Pitillo,
who actually takes the bad script and makes it worse with her acting.
Casting must have been asleep on this one.
The one bright spot here is Jean Reno, who oddly enough seems to fit
well into a role which is often comedic, quite unlike what we've seem
him do in the past.  Although his character is contradictory to the
unfolding disaster, Reno brings a style to the role of Phillipe which
makes him enjoyable.  Unfortunately, the same cannot be said of the
other incongruities.
The entire feel of the movie is tongue-in-cheek, and seems to pay
comical homage to a dozen or so films that have come before it.  This
results in a significant amount of parody, which contrasts sharply
with the threat of the monster, and ends up just producing a mess.
Most of the characters seem to be there for comic relief, and almost
none are smart enough for the audience to take seriously.  Although
Emmerich obviously wanted to make a fun action picture, what good is
it to sink millions into a CGI creature whose ferocity is undermined
by the humans he threatens?  If we can't take the characters
seriously, the threat they face is an empty one because we simply
don't care what happens to them.
GODZILLA simply pulls too many punches in its attempt to be a film
more light-hearted than it should be.  Far be it from me to want to
see more carnage in the theaters, but here's a behemoth running
through the city!  There's bound to be a lot of casualties, but
instead  GODZILLA is afflicted with the after-school G.I. Joe cartoon
syndrome, where almost everyone seems to get out of harm's way just in
time.  In a couple of scenes, Godzilla briefly breathes fire.  None of
the characters even remark upon this ability, nor is it used to any
particular advantage by the filmmakers.  It's as if the special
effects people just wanted to show that yes, Godzilla can do this,
just like in the old movie.  Consider another punch pulled.  Through
creative script writing, you can make a sequel out of just about any
movie, but the final scene in this one doesn't just leave the door
open, it opens into a hallway leading directly into a room where
GODZILLA II is waiting patiently.  It made me want to gag.
Emmerich should have done away with 90% of the humor and in-jokes and
played this one as a straight action film.  With an intelligently
written screenplay, GODZILLA could have been so much more.  However,
by confusing the viewer with a ton of add-ins and parodies, the movie
ends up being something that just doesn't work.  Now if they only had
Raymond Burr....

Title
Review for Rush Hour (1998)
Okay, let me first start off by saying that Jackie Chan is really a
force to be reckoned with.  I mean, he's funny, he's quick, he's an
action superstar, and the guy legitimizes everything he does because
he, unlike any American tough guy wannabe, does his own stunts.  It's
a wonder that he hadn't migrated from Hong Kong years ago and blew
everybody else out of the Hollywood market.  Since I figured Chan was
the best thing RUSH HOUR brought to the table, I was very encouraged
to see that the movie opened up with a showcase for Chan's physical
talent.  Here's the setup:  Chan plays Detective Inspector Lee, one of
Hong Kong's best special service cops.  He single-handedly foils an
operation to smuggle some of the greatest artistic and cultural
Chinese treasures out of the city just before Hong Kong is handed over
to China.  However, the crime boss in charge, known only by the name
of Juntao, is nowhere to be seen, and his right-hand man gets away.
As much as Lee is an asset to the Hong Kong Police, so is Detective
James Carter (Chris Tucker) a liability to the LAPD.  So when the
daughter of Chinese Consul Han (Tzi Ma) is kidnapped in Los Angeles by
the relocated Juntao mob and held for ransom, Lee is called in from
China by the Consul, while Carter is given the unprestigious job of
keeping him out of the FBI's hair.  When Lee convinces Carter of his
earnestness in returning the little girl to safety, the two of them
embark on their own investigation.
The tagline for RUSH HOUR is, "The Fastest Hands in the East Meet the
Biggest Mouth in the West."  Brother, you're not kidding.  Chris
Tucker really pushes the envelope when it comes to being an obnoxious
loudmouth, but it's done in such an over-the-top way that it works.
You get the sense that the character of Carter, for all his comical
performance, doesn't for one moment doubt that he's "The Man," and
it's that attitude of taking himself seriously and believing he's in
total control that makes him so funny.
Chan, on the other hand, shines when he is out of his element.
Although Lee initially exudes the persona of a calm, trained
professional, he later reveals his innocence in many areas as he's led
around by Carter.  This coping with the unexpected is trademark Chan,
who always seems like he's only just managing to keep his head above
water, whether in dealing with other police officers, or when in a
fight with one of the bad guys.  It's that kind of desperation that
makes you laugh at him, then it's that capacity to deal with the
situation that makes you marvel at his ability.
Luckily, RUSH HOUR has a great asset in the interaction between Carter
and Lee.  This is particularly important because when you break it
down, the film is a very conventional buddy movie, where the buddies
come from very different sides of the tracks.  There's the initial
mistrust, the learning from each other, the revelation by each
character that the other is an okay guy after all, and the climax
where one saves the other's life, cementing the relationship.  We've
been there, done that, but in this case we're given something a little
more unusual to spice up the old formula.  The closest thing I can
think of would be SHOWDOWN IN LITTLE TOKYO with Dolph Lundgren and
Brandon Lee, but it didn't go for the comedy like RUSH HOUR does.
Sure, some of the scenes are pretty corny, like when Carter attempts
to teach Lee to dance, but they are a bunch of gems nevertheless.
You know, it would have been easy to stuff the film with songs like
Carl Douglas's "Kung Fu Fighting," but in keeping with the "cops
against organized crime" motif, director Brett Ratner instead chose to
have Lalo Schifrin write the score.  This is the same guy who composed
the themes for "The Man from U.N.C.L.E.," "Mission:  Impossible,"
"Starsky and Hutch," and the Dirty Harry movies.  Once more utilizing
a lot of hi-hat and scratch guitar, now how cool is that?
Okay, so you've got great talents playing two interesting characters,
Jackie Chan action, good chemistry, and cool music.  What's the
downside?  For one thing, the movie is severely predictable.  If the
main bad guy's identity remains a mystery for a good portion of the
film, it's a good bet he's going to end up being someone everyone else
thought was one of the good guys.  If a criminal played by a decently
famous actor is put away at the beginning of the movie, there's a good
chance we'll see him again before the film is through.  If the bad guy
is climbing to any sufficient height and trying to make his getaway
with a case of cash, oh you know the case will open up and the
contents will fall like confetti.
Worst of all, however, is the fact that Ratner doesn't know how to
effectively shoot Chan's action shots.  Ratner uses quick cuts,
close-ups, a moving camera, and different angles, which would normally
be used to cover up the deficiencies in normal Hollywood action, but
Chan is both such an artist and technician that the best way to shoot
one of his sequences is to stand back and catch everything.  He'll do
it all right before your eyes.  Instead, the conventional shooting
makes Chan's movements less impressive, and it's too bad that Ratner
undermines one of the biggest attractions of the movie in this way,
unnecessarily bringing the film down a few notches.
Even with the aforementioned deficiencies, RUSH HOUR is the best
Jackie Chan vehicle released for the mainstream American audience to
date.  As a bonus, they even include the out-takes over the end
credits, just like in Chan's Hong Kong films.  How can you not like
that?

Title
Review for Wild Wild West (1999)
Back in 1965, a show titled "The Wild, Wild West" appeared on the
nation's television sets.  The show centered around Robert Conrad as
James West, and Ross Martin as Artemus Gordon, two Secret Service
agents answering directly to President Grant and sent about the
country to save civilization from conniving criminal elements.  Part
period western and part sci-fi, "The Wild, Wild West" has been
described by many as having been years ahead of its time.
The 1999 film version also seems to be ahead of its time, but in a
different way.  WILD WILD WEST is an immature movie that simply wasn't
thought out as well as it should have been.  In that respect, it was
released ahead of time.  Like that little twist?
The film presents us with Will Smith as West, and Kevin Kline as
Gordon, two mismatched government agents sent to hunt down former
Confederate General "Bloodbath" McGrath (Ted Levine), who is rumored
to be gathering men and weapons to start the Civil War all over again.
However, when McGrath narrowly slips through their fingers, and
President Grant receives a demand to sign over control of the United
States under the threat of the release of an ultimate weapon, the duo
is assigned to find an even bigger fish, Dr. Arliss Loveless (Kenneth
Branagh).  Thought to have been killed fighting for the South during
the war, Loveless has been kidnapping the nation's top scientists, no
doubt for the purpose of building the means to back up his threat.
Without a doubt, Will Smith is the best thing going for this film.
He's likable, handsome, funny, and though a little scrawny, still a
believable action hero.  His comedic timing is better than most actors
out there today, and his ability to win over an audience by playing it
free and easy is quite notable.  This ability is evidenced in several
places in the film, but especially in a scene where he's trying to
talk a group of former southern slave owners out of hanging him.
Reactions of the mob cue the audience into a few extra laughs, but if
the camera never moved off of Smith's face, it would still be a riot.
Kevin Kline makes a valiant attempt at this movie, but just doesn't
have enough good material to keep his character interesting.  Gordon's
banter with West follows the buddy movie line, playing upon the
differences between West's no-nonsense, shoot first and ask questions
later approach, with Gordon's aversion to violence and reliance on
trickery, gadgetry, and costume.  Unfortunately, the conflicts between
the two characters are mostly contrived and therefore are not
conducive to producing much original dialog.
Branagh actually plays a pretty good over-the-top villain, a departure
from what we're used to seeing from the Shakespearean actor.
Unfortunately, his character is in the movie only about half of the
amount he should be, and therefore there isn't enough screentime for
Loveless to really walk around and develop.  You just kind of take it
for granted that he's evil.
As I said earlier, this film could have stood further development
before being put on film and released to theaters.  The overarching
story is fairly complete, but the logic in transitioning from one
scene to the next is sometimes lost and the explanations for certain
actions are fuzzy at best.  For example, it wasn't clear as to why
West and Gordon were looking for McGrath even after they were tasked
with looking for Loveless, and the reason Loveless betrays one of his
allies is never really given (and it's a major plot point).  Later in
the film, Loveless's henchmen (and henchwomen) get knocked off one by
one, but it's not always clear how, and I think at least a couple are
left unaccounted for - they just disappear.
Then there's Rita Escobar (Salma Hayek), whom West and Gordon rescue
from Loveless's lackeys, and then, of course, take along with them for
the rest of the movie.  The character serves no, I repeat, no purpose
in the film whatsoever. She had absolutely nothing to do with the
plot.  Loveless didn't have any kind of vendetta because of her, she
didn't unwittingly lead Loveless to them, didn't even make one of
those contrived dumb-girl mistakes that gets our boys into trouble.
Now, I might be the last person in the world who would complain about
Salma Hayek being in a movie I'm going to see, but the character is
just so superfluous, it's inexcusable.  Either give her something to
do or cut her out altogether.
Director Barry Sonnenfeld, who previously directed Will Smith in MEN
IN BLACK, apparently doesn't know how to shoot fight scenes (and there
are a few in WILD WILD WEST), because you simply can't see what's
going on.  A fist flying here, a kick there is all you can see, then
it's over.  In a more serious picture, this might have merit in adding
to the confusion of the situation, but in an action/comedy, the fights
are supposed to impress.  Hard to do if the action isn't visible.
Too often, the screenplay, apparently written in committee by Brent
Maddock, Jeffrey Price, Peter S. Seaman, and S.S. Wilson, goes for
jokes which are just too obvious.  There's a part, for example, when a
train conductor (M. Emmet Walsh) overhears a conversation between West
and Gordon in the wrong context, and it's supposed to be funny.  Like
I didn't get enough of that from so many years of watching "Three's
Company."
This lack of originality even extends into some of the action
sequences, such as an instance where West is attempting to stop a
runaway horse-drawn wagon by jumping onto the horses themselves.  They
abruptly stop just short of a cliff and send West over the front end,
leaving him dangling over the edge, holding onto the reigns.  Yeah, I
liked it the first time I saw it done with Arnold Schwarzeneggar in
TRUE LIES.
Okay, you know me, I gotta pick out the little things, too.  Loveless
refers to an armored battle wagon as a tank.  History lesson for
today:  The term "tank" did not originate until World War I, when
"tank" was used as a code word to conceal what was at the time a
secret weapon to break the stalemate of trench warfare.  Loveless
might have thought up the concept in the 1860's, but would almost
definitely not have used the word.  You can roll your eyes, now.
WILD WILD WEST has its moments, but they are too few and far between,
and each depends heavily on Will Smith.  It doesn't help, either, that
the end sets us up for a sequel.  Let's hope that if there is another
installment, it'll have a little more kick in the saddle.  Now excuse
me while I go ride off into the sunset.

Title
Review for Star Trek: Insurrection (1998)
Beginning on September 8, 1966, the original "Star Trek" TV series ran for
three years on NBC, and only survived that long due to a massive fan-based
letter writing campaign mounted after announcement of it's impending
cancellation by network executives in it's second year.  However, moved to a
time slot regarded as death by ratings standards, the show failed to be
profitable enough to be included in the 1969 fall lineup, and lived on only
in syndicated reruns.  In contrast, the TV series "Star Trek:  The Next
Generation" ran for seven seasons from 1987 through 1994 without any network
association (it was syndicated from the start), and showed no signs of any
waning popularity.  Whereas most television programs which last more than a
couple of years die agonizing deaths as viewers slowly tune out, "The Next
Generation" voluntarily took itself off the air in order to make the
transition to the big screen.  Passing the TV Trek torch on to two new
series, "The Next Generation" cast bowed out gracefully.  Whether or not
their transition to theaters has been entirely successful is another story.
The beginning of this film finds a malfunctioning android Lt. Commander Data
(Brent Spiner) exposing an operation conducted jointly by the Federation
Starfleet and a race of beings known as the Son'a.  The operation is to
study the Ba'ku inhabitants of a planet which seemingly possesses the
ability to grant immortality to those who live there, and exploit the
planet's unique resources for the good of billions.  The planet is in
Federation space, but the Son'a have the technology to make the exercise
work, resulting in a mutually beneficial alliance.  However, when the covert
nature of the operation is blown and captain of the Starship Enterprise
Jean-Luc Picard (Patrick Stewart) arrives to take Data into custody, he
interacts with the peaceful Ba'ku and slowly begins to uncover the real
agenda of the Son'a, and their ties to a goal which goes against the very
foundation of Starfleet:  The Prime Directive of non-interference with
less-developed civilizations.  Captain Picard must then lead his crew
against the orders of Starfleet Command and the Federation Council in order
to save the Ba'ku from potential destruction.
STAR TREK:  INSURRECTION marks the third big-screen outing of the heirs to
the top tier of active "Trek."  The first film, GENERATIONS, was heavily
anticipated, but marginally received.  The second, FIRST CONTACT, was widely
regarded as the shot in the arm that the flagging franchise badly needed.
With very little originality and a retention of the TV series mentality,
INSURRECTION seems unfortunately content to ride on the popularity of its
predecessor.
The first question that occurred to me was, "Why is the film called
'INSURRECTION?'"  It sounds so ominous and negative.  If the heroes of the
film are the ones fighting against the corrupt authority, it's not really an
insurrection, but more like a rebellion or crusade or something that sounds
a little more noble.  "INSURRECTION" would have been more apt if the film
were about how the Enterprise were sent to put down a mutinous band of
Federation citizens or something like that (then, in typical Star Trek
fashion, it would be later revealed that there was reason for the uprising,
exposing tainted elements of authority).  One of the working titles for this
third Next Generation installment was STAR TREK:  PRIME DIRECTIVE.  Would've
been a heck of a lot better, if you ask me.
Jonathan Frakes, who also directed STAR TREK:  FIRST CONTACT, and who also
plays the role of the Enterprise's first officer, Commander William Riker,
shows a solid directorial talent once again, but the principal problem with
this film is that the story plays like something from one of the series
episodes, but has been dragged out for two hours.  A tighter screenplay
could have the whole film in a one-hour installment, but a great deal of
useless filler is added in order to stretch the story into feature length.
Watch for one of the Ba'ku women's ability to seemingly slow time, then be
prepared to be let down as neither this ability, nor its significance, is
explained.  Worse yet, some of the filler poses elements intriguing to fans,
but are left untended and unresolved by the end of the movie, almost as if
we'll be able to see a continuation next week.  However, there won't be a
next week; we'll probably have to wait another two years, and it'll be
interesting to see if they remember to even give lip service to some of
these things.
There's a lot of stuff in INSURRECTION that's being passed on to us as new,
but which has really already been covered during seven years of episodes.  I
suppose if you haven't watched much of "Star Trek:  The Next Generation", it
may not matter, but the movies are essentially made for the fans, and those
are exactly the ones who will be disappointed in this film's lack of
originality.  For example, one of the filler subplots involves Data
interacting with a child and discovering childhood for himself.  He must
have done it a half dozen times during the series.  Isn't his search for
humanity getting a little old?  What happened to the computer chip which
gave him emotions?  It was included in both the previous movies, but in this
one, the Enterprise's Chief Engineer Geordi LaForge (LeVar Burton) claims
Data "didn't take it with him" to the planet.  It would seem as though it
this was done just so screenwriters Rick Berman and Michael Piller (both of
whom had extensive involvement in producing "The Next Generation") could
recycle a theme which has already been explored repeatedly.  There's also a
trick that Picard pulls on the leader of the Son'a (F. Murray Abraham) that
seems so incredibly clever until you realize that Picard had the same trick
pulled on him years ago, then subsequently used it himself, and all done
years before this movie.  Did the filmmakers think we've got really short
memories, or that we'd nod knowingly at the "homage" to the series?
The current incarnation of the Starship Enterprise (NCC-1701E) still hasn't
grown on me.  Perhaps it's because the new ship was thrown to us in such a
nonchalant manner in the last film, greatly contrasted with the extensive
(although admittedly a bit excessive) showcasing of the Enterprise in STAR
TREK:  THE MOTION PICTURE, and I still feel that we haven't yet been
properly introduced.  The "Enterprise-E", as it's called, looks alien, and
although I realize there are probably a lot of aliens in Starfleet's design
bureau, the classic look of the Enterprise has been a reassurance that we,
the humans of the here and now, are the forefathers of those who would
explore space in the future.  As the very symbol of the whole "Star Trek"
franchise becomes further altered into something unrecognizable, we as the
fans become distanced from "Star Trek" and from the hope that was engendered
in those who so faithfully followed it.
Before you go wondering if there was anything I liked about STAR TREK:
INSURRECTION, I will say there were some very positive aspects to the movie.
The film's pacing is pretty good, with enough action interlaced with the
dramatic and lighter moments to keep things moving.  Special effects, while
widely downplayed as a contribution to the "greatness" of a film, are superb
and deserve note for their technical contribution.  As a side note, this is
only the second "Star Trek" film out of nine to not use Industrial Light and
Magic for any of its special effects.
The actors play their roles with the aplomb of old pros, once more slipping
into their familiar personae.  Additionally, they actually look as if
they're having fun, and that really goes a long way.  It was also nice to
see that Captain Picard has a love interest (Donna Murphy), since he so
rarely got one in the past.  How Patrick Stewart must envy William Shatner.
Unfortunately, the talents of F. Murray Abraham are woefully underused in a
role which requires little of the skilled actor.  The character itself is
not even very good as a villain, and no where near some of its deliciously
over-the-top predecessors.  And you know how they say the villain often
makes the picture.
There has been a rule of thumb used by both critics and fans of the Star
Trek movies:  The even numbered ones are good, the odd numbered ones not as
good.  STAR TREK:  INSURRECTION is number nine in the series.  The rule
lives on....

Title
Review for Beloved (1998)
The day after I saw this film, someone asked me if it was good or bad.
Honestly, it took me a few moments to come up with an answer.  You see,
BELOVED, based on the novel by Toni Morrison, is good in so many ways, yet
terrible on such a fundamental level as to be inexcusable.  While most
movies have pros and cons, this one suffered from faults that were so
glaring, they seemed to cancel many of the meritorious aspects.
Sethe (Oprah Winfrey) is an escaped slave living in Ohio with her teenage
daughter Denver (Kimberly Elise).  When Denver and her siblings were still
very young, Sethe's master came up from Kentucky to claim his "property,"
and in a confused frenzy, Sethe attempted to kill all four of her children
so they would not be taken back.  In her desperate attempt, Sethe was only
able to knock the eldest three children unconscious, but managed to kill her
youngest daughter, who's spirit haunted their house ever since.  This
haunting isn't the type that opens a cabinet door now and then, or moves a
spoon from the kitchen counter to the living room when nobody's looking.
When Paul D (Danny Glover), a fellow slave from Kentucky, comes into the
house and takes an obvious romantic interest in Sethe, the spirit shakes the
structure to the foundation and hurls a table across the room, threatening
to cut Paul D in half.  No wonder Sethe's two boys ran away years ago.
The romance that blossoms between Sethe and Paul D is both a reawakening and
reconciliation of Sethe's past.  By getting reacquainted with someone who
shared her experiences on the plantation, it is clear that Sethe can now
vocalize some of the most horrible moments of her life, and in doing so,
gain strength from the fact that she survived.  Paul D's arrival also fills
the hole left by the husband whom Sethe never saw after escaping from
Kentucky.  However, as much as Sethe manages to put her life together and
become happy once again, the child that she killed continues to haunt her.
In essence, this film is about a woman trying to come to terms with her
past, and in that respect, BELOVED is very engaging.  While Sethe is seen as
a strong woman early on, her transformation into a whole person is tangible,
and Winfrey, who delivers a startlingly convincing performance, gets much of
the credit for this.  In developing the relationships between man and woman,
and mother and daughter, BELOVED is also able to provide several dimensions
to the storyline.  Danny Glover is a joy to watch on screen as he gives an
earth-natural performance of a very likable character, and capitalizes upon
the significant chemistry between Winfrey and himself.  Kimberly Elise is
also very impressive as the daughter who must vie for the attention of her
mother, while consistently supporting her in every way she can.
Director Jonathan Demme emerses us so deeply in the period that we really
get a good feeling for what it was like in the mid-1800's.  We watch from
beginning to end as Sethe makes biscuits from scratch and bakes them in a
cast-iron stove.  We are witness to the continual process of scrubbing
wooden board floors, and the ungainly drudgery of using a pole to assist in
doing the laundry in a tub of boiling water.  So many details provide an
interesting authenticity to this film, and it pays off by allowing us to
share in the day-to-day experiences of the characters, and therefore
appreciate them a little more.
This human aspect of the film is so interesting and full of possibilities
that it could have been it's own movie.  In fact, it should have been,
because the second aspect, the supernatural subplot, only weighs down the
rest of the film.  The haunting scenes seem out of place and totally
unnecessary, as if someone had gotten the great idea that by combining two
absolutely different films, he could somehow take advantage of some kind of
cinematic economy of scale.  Worse yet, Sethe's youngest becomes tired of
mere haunting and materializes as a teenage girl in front of the family
house.  Just like she showed up at the door, so did this subplot.
Thandie Newton plays Beloved, the re-embodied spirit, in a way that leads
you to believe that although the character's body is the age it would have
been had she lived, her mind is still that of an infant or young adolescent.
Newton's performance is quite proficient, although it does become rather
grating after a while.  If an infant learned to talk, would we really want
to listen to its blathering all the time?  What I couldn't figure out was
why the whole thing seemed so normal to the main characters.  After getting
over an initial shock, all involved just take living in a haunted house with
a grain of salt, and accept the fact that a dead relative returned from the
grave.
Beloved's presence exists for the sole purpose of symbolizing Sethe's past
coming back to haunt her, ironically returning Sethe to a figurative state
of slavery.  Sethe's world is turned upside-down, and her own very existence
is subjugated to the care of her newly returned daughter.  However,
BELOVED's supernatural element is so extraneous that the film could easily
have been turned into a very compelling conventional human drama.  Whenever
we see Newton's character, it's like a second story trying to insinuate
itself into the one we're watching.  It's strange, cumbersome, and
distracting, so why not just take it out altogether?  We could still have
Sethe struggle with her own conscience without all of the weirdness.  Now
that would be a film I'd like to see.

Title
Review for Mummy, The (1999)
It is the time of the ancient Egyptians, and the pharaoh's mistress is
one of the most beautiful women in all the land, coveted so greatly
that he forbids her to even be touched by another man.  Little does he
know that the enchanting Anck-Su-Namum has been doing a little fooling
around with the pharaoh's priest of the dead, Imhotep, until the
pharoah catches the both of them red-handed.  Stabbed in the back by
this traitorous act, he gets stabbed in the back once again and for
good by the happy couple.  Unfortunately for them, the pharaoh's
guards burst in to find their ruler murdered and proceed to take the
lovers into custody.  Of course, when you're talking ancient Egypt,
you know they're not just going to the slammer.  Anck-Su-Namum is
killed, and Imhotep is mummified alive, with a few hundred
flesh-eating scarabs for company in his sarcophagus.  But that's not
all!  No, a terrible curse is placed upon his body which will haunt
him in the afterlife.  One trick, though.  If he is ever exhumed, he
will return to the earth as a plague upon mankind.  Well, there's
always a catch, isn't there?
Skip ahead a few thousand years to 1923, where Jonathan (John Hannah)
has come into possession of a rare Egyptian artifact.  He just wants
to sell it, but when his Egyptologist sister Evelyn (Rachel Weisz)
opens the artifact and inside finds a map to the lost city of
Hamunaptra, where a trove of the pharoah's treasure supposedly exists,
they enlist the help of former French Foreign Legionnaire Rick
O'Connell (Brendan Fraser) and embark upon a journey to rediscover the
lost city.  The problem is, they're not the only ones looking for the
city and its treasure.  Three Americans and another Egyptologist, lead
by Rick's former comrade-in-arms Beni (Kevin J. O'Connor) are also on
the hunt, and upon their arrival at the Hamunaptra ruins, accidentally
release our old friend Imhotep, wrapped up in a thirst for revenge
against the world.
For those of you looking for an honest-to-goodness scare, look
elsewhere because director Stephen Sommers' approach is definately a
departure from what we're used to.  Sure, there are some suspenseful
moments, and a few instances where you catch your breath in your
throat, but for the most part THE MUMMY is an action-oriented flick
interlaced with a decent amount of humor.  Sommers obviously didn't
want to gross people out or make them scream, but just give them a
good time instead.  Keep in mind, however, that "a good time" is a
relative term.
The change in approach is due in part to the mummy Imhotep himself.
You see, the mummy in THE MUMMY isn't like the ones we've seen in
black and white on late night television, arms out in front, slowly
moving forward toward its victim.  No, this one is able to change
itself into a whirlwind to move itself across the desert, convert
itself into a pile of sand in order to slip through a keyhole, and
overall just kick some serious ass very quickly.  Whereas the thing
about the old mummy was that it was slow, but it was going to get you
no matter how long it took, this one is much more conducive to an
action film.  After all, think about how boring it would be to try and
revolve an action sequence around a walking Ace bandage moving at a
quarter mile an hour.  This one is the full blown action mummy with
kung-fu grip.
Brendan Fraser's O'Connell also contributes to the action tone, being
a stock character for one of these films.  O'Connell is brash,
confident, full of bravado, but also completely competant.  You'd
expect to see a guy like him come walking out of an adventure novel.
Fraser plays him well, imbuing O'Connell with enough charisma to make
us forget that it seems totally normal to him that he's going to have
to go and kill this guy who's already supposed to be dead.  Rachel
Weisz's Evelyn similarly fits right into this film as the book smart,
but unworldly damsel.  Whereas Fraser plays his part with aplomb,
however, Weisz does little to distinguish this movie heroine from
countless others in the annals of movie history, an admittedly
difficult task when the script provides little help.  The rest of the
characters are pretty much in the film to fill in the requisite slots,
and it's too bad that the script doesn't offer them more than the
standard fare.
Visually, this film has some top-notch effects, most notably when it
comes to rendering Imhotep.  Starting off as a decaying corpse, the
mummy hunts down those who released him in order to take their vital
organs for his own.  As he becomes whole, he "fills out" so that at
any given time, he's part live and part dead to some degree, and the
line between real and computer generated is virtually unnoticable.
Unfortunately, while THE MUMMY presents us with a very unconventional
mummy movie, it's still a very conventional action adventure film,
complete with such cliches as the old washed up guy who gets to prove
himself one last time, the ever popular leaning against a wall and
revealing a hidden passage to a secret room, and not just one, but two
people getting done in because of their own greed.  THE MUMMY gives us
virtually nothing new, and therein lies its ultimate downfall.  I
don't think everyone wants to watch a film that just has more of the
same stuff you've seen in so many other films - except oh, yeah, this
one has a mummy.

Title
Review for Boogie Nights (1997)
It is hard to imagine today, but in the late 1970's, porno movies were
actually a lot like regular movies.  They were shot on film and shown
in theaters.  Marquees and posters advertised the latest X-rated
flicks in blatant view of motorists on the street.  You actually
bought a ticket from the guy at the box office, and walked into the
theater.  The problem was, you might have been seen doing so.  In the
early 80's, the adult film industry made a profound change.  Most
movies were shot on video with minuscule budgets, mass produced, and
marketed through mail order.  While losing the "artistic" quality of
larger productions, the increased anonymity afforded by mail order
resulted in a huge growth in sales.  After all, the only one who might
have known you were watching these tapes would have been your mailman.
Today, the adult industry is booming like never before, even keeping
up with the latest trends in technology; films are now available on
CD-ROM and even DVD.
BOOGIE NIGHTS starts out in the earlier era of adult entertainment,
when the filmmakers counted on star power to get viewers into the
theater seats.  "Exotic" film director Jack Horner (Burt Reynolds)
notices a young dishwasher named Eddie Adams (Mark Wahlberg) in a
nightclub and offers him a career in X-rated movies.  Eddie has
dropped out of school and faces continual verbal abuse from his mother
at home, and so one evening, after his mother (Joanna Gleason) crosses
the last line, the seventeen year old Eddie runs away, ending up at
Jack Horner's house.  To Eddie, Jack's offer is his ticket out of his
little life and into one of stardom.
We meet a lot of colorful characters in the business.  First there is
Amber Waves (Julianne Moore), a porn queen who lives with Jack, but
under apparently platonic circumstances.  There's also a high school
dropout-turned porn starlet who goes by the name "Rollergirl" (Heather
Graham) because she never takes off her rollerskates, even
while...ahem...acting.  We also meet Buck (Don Cheadle), a black
pornstar who is a hi-fi salesman on the side.  He wears
country-western outfits on the job and uses music to match when
selling stereos, prompting the store manager to ask, "What kind of
brother are you?"  Another one of the male talents is Reed Rotchild
(John C. Reilly), who's so insecure about himself that the first
question he asks Eddie is, "You work out?"  Behind the camera, we meet
Jack's set manager Little Bill (William H. Macy), who regularly
catches his wife having sex with other men.  Scotty (Phillip Seymour
Hoffman) is a set hand who is decidedly more attracted to the male
actors than the female ones.  Finally, sitting behind it all is a man
called "The Colonel" (Robert Ridgely) who puts up the money to produce
Jack's movies.
With such a cast of characters, there are a lot of possibilities for
some great scenes, and the viewer is not disappointed.  Take for
example, a scene at a party where Little Bill sees a group of people
gathered around in a circle.  He goes to find out what everyone is
looking at, to find his wife (played by real-life porn star Nina
Hartley) having sex with a stranger.  Little Bill demands to know
what's going on, to which his wife responds with, "Bill, you're
embarrassing me!"  Another great one is when Eddie meets Reed, and
each wants to find out how much the other benches at the gym.  Just so
one doesn't make up a figure higher than the other's, they agree to
say their bench weights at the same time, "on three."  They count to
three and there's silence.  Then Eddie says, "You didn't say
anything."
Some of the scenes involving the shooting of a porn film may seem
preposterous to the unindoctrinated, but director Paul Thomas Anderson
makes no apologies.  To his credit, the scenes are treated almost with
the factual nature of a documentary, and very few attempts are made at
colorizing the proceedings for the purpose of eliciting a laugh.  The
result is a surprisingly evenhanded representation of the filmmaking
process, with laughs naturally occurring at actions which seem
ridiculous to most, but which are simply another day's work for adult
entertainment employees.
Anderson does a good job at presenting us with a film about journeys.
We witness each character as he or she changes with the times or has
the times run over them.  Not one character is the same at the end of
the movie, and that is something very satisfying.  We even get to see
the journey made by the industry itself, in it's move from film to
mass marketed video.  In a great scene, Horner is taping in the back
of a limousine, saying they are "about to make film history....right
here on videotape."  Of all the journeys made, the most compelling is
Eddie's, who we see progress from dishwasher to pornstar "Dirk
Diggler" (the persona he assumes), his displacement from the industry,
and his decent into drugs and crime.  Wahlberg, perhaps still more
widely known as a rapper than an actor, comes through with a great
performance.  I look forward to what he will do in the future.
The real joy of this movie, however, is watching Burt Reynolds.  There
has been much talk about the Jack Horner role being his comeback
performance, and I do not doubt the truth to this.  Over the last
number of years, Reynolds has been playing mostly comical,
tongue-in-cheek type roles which shied away from the kinds of
characters he played in the past.  Although he has been quite amusing
in some of these cases, this has caused the public to in a way forget
that he is capable of really putting forth as a good actor.  Reynolds
is sincere, and plays Horner without the indulgence in which another,
less experienced actor might be tempted to engage.  It definitely pays
off.
There are only a few problems with BOOGIE NIGHTS, and only one that
really bothers me.  One of the major plot points is that Dirk Diggler
was easily replaced by up and coming talent.  This is one thing that
the movie got wrong, as it is the women who are in constant danger of
being the flavor of the month.  Males have a much better chance of
staying in for the long haul, often remaining in the business for a
decade or more.  The good thing is, if you didn't know this until now
(and I'm sure most people don't), it won't detract one iota from
enjoyment of the film.  Make no mistake; there is a great deal of
explicit language being tossed about, but most of the obscenities are
the words themselves.  Although there is a lot of sex going on, it is
tastefully shot and often more alluded to than anything else.  It
would be a shame if the subject matter dissuades you from taking in
this great film.

Title
Review for South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut (1999)
You have probably heard that SOUTH PARK:  BIGGER, LONGER AND UNCUT is
offensive.  Well here's a little test.  Just ask yourself the
question, "Am I easily offended by anything, anything at all?"  If you
take more than three seconds to answer, this movie will probably
offend you.  For the rest of us, SOUTH PARK is a hilarious good time.
Yeah, that's right, I liked the movie.  For all its low-brow humor, I
laughed almost all the way through.
The film finds gradeschoolers Stan, Kyle, Cartman and Kenny excited at
the imminent release of a movie version their favorite TV show,
"Terrance and Phillip," which consists of the two title characters
passing gas for half an hour every day.  The kids march on over to the
theater, only to be denied entrance because the film is (gasp!) rated
R.  Ever resourceful, they enlist a homeless guy to buy them tickets
as their "guardian," and proceed to view the potty-humor-soaked
Terrance and Phillip movie.  What they soon find out is why the movie
is rated R - Terrance and Phillip start swearing up such a storm as to
make a stevedore blush.  Of course, after the initial shock wears off,
the kids love it and later go to school spreading the good words,
prompting more kids to go and see the movie.  Soon, nearly all the
kids of the small mountain town of South Park are worshipping at the
alter of the Terrance and Phillip movie, much to the chagrin of the
town's adults.  Mad as hell, Kyle's mom spearheads a movement to ban
the film, which soon grows into a declaration of war against the
country which Terrance and Phillip come from:  Canada.
As I said, SOUTH PARK is potentially very offensive, as it contains a
lot of swearing, graphic cartoon violence, and a bunch of sexual
references which don't even try to couch themselves as innuendo.
They're just out there.  But if you can get past all that, you're in
for a great time.  The jokes come fast and furious, often catching you
off guard, and although much of the humor is based on the fact that
you're listening to "kids" spouting profanity, it might surprise you
that some of it is actually quite sophisticated and satirical of the
real world.  Everything from history to current events to pop culture
is given little barbs, including the likes of the French underground
resistance, President Clinton, Bill Gates, and there's even a
climactic battle between Satan, Saddam Hussein, and Cartman which
draws not only upon RETURN OF THE JEDI, but also upon STAR TREK III:
THE SEARCH FOR SPOCK.
Talk about satire, the whole set up with the Terrance and Phillip
movie is basically a satire of the South Park movie itself.  Think
about it:  A show on TV that's pretty profane as it is makes the jump
to the big screen and with an R rating and just goes all out with the
foul language.  Kids have to sneak in because responsible parents
wouldn't take them (never mind that at the screening I went to, there
were several adolescents in the audience - maybe they found a homeless
guy of their own), and an uproar about the offensiveness follows suit.
Fairly insightful.
Additionally surprising is the fact that SOUTH PARK actually tackles
the fairly heady topic of censorship.  As Kyle's mom goes on her
crusade and recruits the town and the nation into making scapegoats
out of Terrance and Phillip, we see the development of a type of evil
that we've seen in history and which could resurface if we're not
careful.  No, we're not given anything new or groundbreaking, and the
message may be delivered in a somewhat ham-fisted manner, but you've
got to give the filmmakers (and South Park creators) Trey Parker and
Matt Stone credit for taking what could have been an hour and a half
of meaningless guilty-pleasure laughs and actually imbuing it with
meaning.
One of the delights of this film is that it's not just a movie, it's a
musical!  Yes, the South Park cast not only gets to shout vulgarities,
but also sing them in several of the musical numbers.  The songs are
actually quite catchy and in fact better than many numbers from other
"legitimate" musicals - Hey, not to be disrespectful, but "I Have
Confidence" from THE SOUND OF MUSIC really could have been better.
Accomplished screen composer Marc Shaiman, along with Trey Parker,
skillfully presents us with stirring music, and even manages to weave
several of the songs together in a rousing medley near the film's high
point, displaying the composer's familiarity with the conventional
musical and giving the film an added depth.  The only problem was that
I couldn't hear the lyrics in a lot of the big numbers, which I'm sure
would have had me laughing even more.
Another drawback lies in the fact that if you're not familiar with the
Comedy Central cartoon, you're probably not going to enjoy the movie
as much, since it brings in characters and conventions from the show
without taking the time to explain their significance or background.
For example, South Park followers will cheer the appearance of Big Gay
Al and his rendition of "I'm Super," but it's not going to mean a lot
to others.  On the other hand, the fact that Kenny gets killed and
goes to hell is a major part of the plot, but it won't impair the
enjoyment of those who don't know that Kenny gets killed in every
episode of the series (expect maybe one).  Suffice to say there's
still a lot of comedy packed into SOUTH PARK for non-fans to come away
laughing.  Just remember what I said about asking yourself if you're
easily offended.

Title
Review for Conspiracy Theory (1997)
You think that these people only exist in the movies, but trust me,
they're as real as life.  I once talked to a guy who thought the
United States government was putting satellites into orbit which could
fry an individual person's brain with microwaves.  Then I sat in a
room full of people who believed that the government rigged state
elections.  I even listened to a man who swore that nicotine was an
additive that cigarette companies put in their products for the
specific goal of getting people addicted.  These people had what are
known as "conspiracy theories" - ideas about how unseen forces work to
deceive and control the public.  A little imagination goes a long way.
In Richard Donner's CONSPIRACY THEORY, Jerry Fletcher (Mel Gibson) is
a New York City cab driver who seems to have a conspiracy theory about
everything.  His latest, that NASA is trying to kill the President by
causing an earthquake from the space shuttle, might sound outrageous
to us, but is all in a day's work for him.  He combs the newspaper,
looking for tidbits that leave telltale warnings about the goings-on
behind the scenes, and from there Jerry draws his conclusions.
Upstanding citizen that he is, he tries to convince Alice Sutton
(Julia Roberts) of the Justice Department that the President must be
warned.  Lucky gal, Alice, who met Jerry when he saved her from a
couple of muggers and has had to listen to his theories during the six
months since.  What she doesn't know is that Jerry's interest in her
is far more than, well, professional.  He goes to great lengths to
follow her around and watch her in her own apartment.  But when some
secret government types seem to take an interest in Jerry's ideas and
his limited-circulation "Conspiracy Theory" newsletter, he finds
himself in danger and in real need of Alice's help.
One of the problems with CONSPIRACY THEORY is that it tries to pass
itself off as an action-thriller when it seems to have neither a whole
lot of action, nor a significant number of thrills.  Part of this is a
result of the film's slow pace.  It takes forever to set up the
relationship between Jerry and Alice, and even once that is over with,
the rest of the film seems to be a lot of boredom that every once in a
while stops to take a break for excitement.  At over two hours, this
film could have been significantly condensed and had it's running time
shortened by twenty minutes to half an hour, but even then, the action
scenes would not be able to save the film.  Instead of truly exciting
and engaging set pieces, we're treated to a few of the generic scenes
with the requisite "black elements":  Black helicopter, men in black
action suits and body armor, black vehicles - you know the drill.
They come on down with all kinds of neat gadgets and weapons, but for
some reason a guy with just a bunch of theories and some chick with no
training somehow manage to elude them every time.  Big deal, we've
seen it all before.  Watching the film, I wished Donner had at least
tried to use a little imagination, but I was out of luck.
Now, when I say it took forever to set up the "relationship" between
Jerry and Alice, I completely mean what one person is relative to the
other, and not romantic involvement.  Oh, Donner and screenwriter
Brian Helgeland would like you to believe that by the end of the
movie, the two main characters will end up falling hopelessly in love
with each other, but there seems to be no evidence of that ever
occurring.  You see, there were more sparks between Gibson and Danny
Glover in the LETHAL WEAPON movies (also directed by Donner) than
between Gibson and Roberts in CONSPIRACY THEORY.  The two just don't
click, and when you throw in a number of happenings that would cause
Alice to reject Jerry altogether (like finding out he's been stalking
her), the subsequent attraction is absolutely forced.
The script in general also seems forced, like someone sat Helgeland
down and forced him to write it, then took it and forced it upon us.
Dialog is undistinguished and rather unmemorable, to the point that I
almost stopped listening.  Even Gibson's usual gift for ad lib
couldn't punch up the film sufficiently to raise my interest, although
one of Jerry's theories about Oliver Stone was mildly amusing.
Unfortunately, much of what's discussed in the film is not inherently
important to what's going on, but instead filler that starts out with
potential, but ends up just being extraneous because it's never
followed through.  For example, Jerry professes that a man found
drowned in his swimming pool was actually murdered by the government
in a New York subway station.  He even goes so far as to explain that
the station was flooded at the time due to a water main break (hence
the water in a subway station), and that the coroner should check the
man's lungs for chlorine.  This is convincing enough to Alice that she
seems to believe him.  You know what happens then?  Nothing, zip,
nada.  No follow-up whatsoever, so what's the significance?  Okay,
here's another one.  A couple of well known (real life) assassins were
found to have possessed copies of the J.D. Salinger novel "The Catcher
in the Rye".  Jerry also has a bunch of copies.  Whenever he goes into
a bookstore, he has to buy one.  Leaving out the question of whether
or not this makes Jerry an assassin, we're never given a reason to
believe WHY this would make him an assassin.  Not when we find out
about his Salinger collection, not when he goes to the bookstore, not
later on when we get the answer to our first question.  The point
becomes totally extraneous.
Oh, did I mention that Patrick Stewart is in this film?  Yeah, he
plays this government psychiatrist named Dr. Jonas who may or may not
be a bad guy.  That's about it.  For all the presence this usually
marvelous actor has, he's nearly forgettable in CONSPIRACY THEORY.
You can just lump him in with the supporting players, with the
exception of Cylk Cozart who plays Agent Lowry of the FBI.  This guy
was really likable, and I wish he and his character had gotten more
screen time.
Okay, here's my theory.  This really started out as a great film, but
some of its jokes were actually true!  The government came in and
forced Donner to make edits for the sake of national security, and
this was what was left over.

Title
Review for Pleasantville (1998)
David (Tobie Maguire) and Jennifer (Reese Witherspoon) are twin brother and
sister, but the bond that all twins supposedly have just isn't there.  In
fact, they couldn't be more dissimilar:  David is a social reject and not
given a second thought by the girls in his high school senior class.
Jennifer, on the other hand, is more along the lines of the school slut.
While Jennifer enjoys a pretty heavy social scene, David's world exists
largely in front of the TV, watching the cable channel full of hits from
television's golden age.  One evening, while their single mom is out of
town, the two kids fight over who gets to use the TV.  Jennifer has the
hottest guy in school coming over to watch MTV, but David is all set to
watch the Pleasantville marathon - hours and hours of his favorite black and
white show, during which they'll be holding a Pleasantville trivia contest
where he could win a thousand dollars.  During a struggle over the remote
control, it gets flung across the room and shatters to pieces.  "This is a
new TV," says David.  "It doesn't work without a remote."  Uh, oh.
Luckily (and mysteriously), a friendly TV repairman (Don Knotts) shows up at
their door just at that moment and gives them a specially made remote.  "One
that really puts you right in the show," he says.  No sooner does David flip
on the Pleasantville marathon than the two are at it again, struggling over
the new device.  Suddenly, they're zapped into the sitcom.  They have now
become Bud and Mary Sue Parker, two of Pleasantville's main characters.
Faced with this incredibly strange turn of events, they must live out the
lives of the fictional family members in the Pleasantville world until David
can contact the repairman (who talks to them through the Parker family
television set) and convince him to take them back home.
Gosh, there are so many possibilities that could be explored with this
setup, comedic and otherwise.  Screenwriter and director Gary Ross takes one
of the more obvious, but also one of the most intriguing routes by setting
up the two kids as travelers in terra incognito.  On the surface, it would
seem that PLEASANTVILLE is meant to contrast the sets of values between
1950's television and the real world of the 90's, but it's actually quite a
bit more than that.  As David and Jennifer interact with the characters of
the TV show, they open the fictional personalities' worlds up to new and
different experiences and ways of thinking.  We see that the "values" of the
Pleasantville citizens are rooted in the fact that they have lived
two-dimensional lives and have been deprived of the knowledge that exists
beyond the television script.  Once in the Pleasantville world, the movie
switches to black and white, but as the citizens learn to step beyond their
accustomed boundaries, people and things gradually being to gain color.
This is a metaphor not only for the added dimension one gains when opened to
a new way of thinking, but also for the way in which the townsfolk learn
that, for good or bad, life is not so clear cut (black and white) after all.
Ross and cinematographer John Lindley have a keen eye for shooting,
composing, and lighting the scenes much like television from the period,
adding significantly to the TV sitcom feel.  Ross also delivers some
effective jokes by up-playing the incongruity between TV and real life, such
as when Jennifer goes to the ladies room and finds there are no toilets.  We
never see TV actors answer nature's call, so the facilities just don't
exist.  Later, we learn that no one in the town knows how to put out a fire,
since all the fire department ever had to do in any of the Pleasantville
episodes was rescue cats from trees.  Watching the first half hour in which
we're treated to the saccharine words and actions of the Pleasantville
characters is good fun as we identify them with similar characters from such
shows as "Leave it to Beaver," "Father Knows Best," and "The Adventures of
Ozzie and Harriet."  All the actors look as if they had a great time playing
their roles, and do so with relish.  It's rare you get to go over the top so
much as in this film.
Among those clearly having the most fun are William H. Macy and Joan Allen,
who play George and Betty Parker, Bud and Mary Sue's TV parents.  Starting
out as the stereotypical sitcom mom and dad, they have the difficult job of
playing characters who go through the most extreme changes as their world is
turned upside-down.  However, with their more than competent level of
acting, they pull it off without a hitch.
Jeff Daniels is also present as Mr. Johnson, who runs the soda fountain.
Through Mr. Johnson, we get one of the more enjoyable looks at the pleasure
in finding something new, especially when he discovers his love of art.
There's a wondrous scene where he flips through an art book full of
beautiful, colorful (remember, most of the world is still black and white)
images.  I'll admit, this scene contained the obligatory famous paintings
(at one point, I thought to myself, "I'll bet the next one will be van
Gogh's 'Starry Night,'" and it was), so the wonder may not be quite the same
for us, but it's still very effective.  Unfortunately, much of the attention
given to his character is unwisely focused on his relationship with Betty
Parker, an aspect which only confuses the film and drags it down.
Maguire and Witherspoon are very good as the fish out of water.  Maguire
came onto the acting scene about five years ago when he played the title
character in the short-lived (and very underrated) Fox series, "Great
Scott!"  Witherspoon gained notoriety from her performance in the 1993 film,
A FAR OFF PLACE, and has had an accelerated career since the movie FEAR,
with Mark Wahlberg.  Both provide fine performances, but also show a lot of
potential for doing greater things as they develop their skills.
As much as there's a villain in PLEASANTVILLE, it's J.T. Walsh in his final
performance as the town's mayor, Big Bob.  Walsh offers his usual
magnanimous presence as the leader of the opposition to all the change
that's happening, and best off all, he looks like he's having fun in the
role, too.  Not a bad one on which to make his exit.
There are a few downsides to the film, such as the fact that we get bashed
over the head with the morality lesson a few times.  When the town citizenry
becomes polarized between those who have become colorized and those who have
not (the spectrally challenged?) prejudice erupts and signs reading "No
Coloreds" get posted in store windows.  There's even a book burning to rid
the library of the evil literature like Mark Twain and J.D. Salinger,
harkening to the imagery of the German Nazi's.  I was also disappointed that
the film didn't address the issue of what happened to the original Bud and
Mary Sue that David and Jennifer replaced, and this is only one of the
reasons the end of the film screams, "Sequel!"  However, these points didn't
detract all that much from the film's otherwise enjoyable nature.  For a
couple of hours, PLEASANTVILLE transports us into another world that's,
well, quite pleasant.

Title
Review for Tampopo (1986)
After watching the first ten minutes of this Japanese film, you will
never eat a bowl of ramen the same way again.  There is a scene where
an old man is teaching a young one how to eat the soupy bowl of
noodles, as a master would teach an eager apprentice.  "You caress the
noodles with the chopsticks," he says, "then put the roast pork on the
side of the bowl and apologize to it by saying, 'see you soon.'"  Of
course, it's meant to be a parody, but there is an earnestness
underneath the silliness that makes you take it with a certain degree
of sobriety.  You begin to appreciate the food as not merely something
you eat, not something you like, not something you enjoy, but rather
something you experience.  Experiencing it is a process which engages
all of the senses, fulfilling each one on its own terms and weaving
them so that the total is a pleasure that is more than the sum of its
parts.  Trust me, you really want to go find a noodle shop at this
point.
Juzo Itami's TAMPOPO brings the same sense of the serious parody of
food to the forefront by making the story follow the pattern of an
American western, set in modern day Japan.  A stranger, Goro (Tsutomu
Yamazaki), comes into town and finds Tampopo (Nobuko Miyamoto), the
proprietor of a small, hole-in-the-wall noodle shop, trying to fend
off the insults of the local strongman, Pisken (Rikiya Yasuoka).
Goro, to defend the honor of this woman and her noodles, gets into a
fight with the ringleader and his henchmen, emerging bloodied, but
victorious.  Goro finds that Tampopo's ambition is to have a shop that
people would flock to from far away, just to eat a bowl of her ramen.
The problem is, her fare is something less than popular, and less than
appetizing.  However, Goro agrees to help Tampopo in her quest, and in
the process they seek the wisdom of an elderly noodle expert, enlist
the aid of a wealthy patron, and make friends with the former enemy.
This film is filled with many little scenes which are absolute gems.
Take, for example, when Tampopo tries to buy the recipe for a
delicious soup from another shop owner.  The price is too high, but
the owner of the store next door will secretly sell it to her for a
more affordable sum.  Tampopo meets him at his store late at night,
and he leads her to a back room.  She protests, thinking that perhaps
this man has ulterior motives, but he insists.  Just when she is about
to bolt for the exit, he shows her a small gap in the wall adjoining
his store with the noodle shop next door.  She peers through and takes
notes as she watches the cook make the soup for the next day, her face
filled with a joy that can be felt by the audience.  This scene, while
comical, is very effective at filling the viewer with a sense of
trepidation, then of relief and discovery.
There's also an interesting scene where Goro introduces Tampopo and
her son to a bunch of street people who, despite their economic
trappings, are all gourmets and master sommeliers.  We even watch as
one of them sneaks into the kitchen of a restaurant and expertly
prepares a French omelet.  The scene is meant to bring a laugh, but it
also says that no matter whether people are rich or poor, food is
something which everyone has in common, and the enjoyment of food is
an experience shared by all.
There are also a number of unrelated vignettes appearing throughout
the film, which help to illustrate and accentuate the role of food in
people's lives.  A particularly effective one involves a wife and
mother being tended to in her home by a doctor.  Surrounded by her
children, she is obviously in her last hours of life.  Her husband
comes home, and seeing her worsened condition, demands that she get up
and make dinner.  The viewer knows the husband's intention is not to
be mean; he is desperate for the normalcy of which he and his family
has obviously been deprived, and the wife making dinner is an
essential part of this.  In a near miracle, the wife drags herself to
the kitchen and prepares a quick meal, then brings it to her awaiting
family.  As the family eats, she looks on them and smiles.  Preparing
food for her family is a joy and a comfort to her, and for a brief
moment, she too enjoys the normalcy.  Then she falls over, dead.  For
a moment, the family is stunned, but then the father yells at the
children, "Keep eating!  This is the last meal your mother ever made!"
Crying as they do so, the family finishes the meal.  The scene is
comical, awkward, moving, and beautiful.
By including the vignettes, Itami ran the risk of creating a
disjointed film, but surprisingly, they do not interrupt the pacing of
the main storyline.  Instead, they even help contribute to the idea
that Tampopo's goal of being able to serve exceptional food is worthy
and even noble.  Because the film parodies a western, the construction
of the plot is fairly predictable, but is still enjoyable as we watch
the familiar way in which the "good guys" come together for the final
showdown.  In this case, the showdown is against the ramen.  If they
eat Tampopo's ramen, soup and all, Tampopo knows she has succeeded.
It's pretty obvious what the outcome will be, but when a film changes
your whole perspective on something you consume every day of your
life, you can afford to cut it a little slack.

Title
Review for Hope Floats (1998)
Imagine yourself invited to a talk show because you think you've won a free
makeover.  Then imagine that on the show, for all the world to see, you find
out your best friend is having an affair with your husband.  At the rate
trash television shows do things like this these days, you might not have to
imagine it; it might have happened to you already.  For the rest of us,
we're given HOPE FLOATS, in which Birdee Pruitt (Sandra Bullock) is
humiliated in just such a way on national television.  Birdee loads up the
station wagon with her possessions and her daughter and leaves her
unfaithful husband in Chicago to move back to her hometown of Smithville, Texas.
In trying to start her life over again, Birdee is faced with several
obstacles.  For one thing, just about everyone in the small town has seen
her infamous television appearance.  "We have a satellite dish," says one of
her high school classmates, "and so we got to see it twice."  Another
problem is that her daughter Bernice (Mae Whitman) doesn't quite get the
idea of separation - she still thinks her father will be coming to get them.
Birdee's overbearing mother (Gena Rowlands), with whom Birdee and Bernice
have come to live, isn't much help either.  "You look terrible.  Have you
taken up drinking?" is the way she greets Birdie at her door.
The first half of HOPE FLOATS is devoted to Birdee trying to reincorporate
herself into life in Smithville.  There are some nice scenes where she meets
different classmates who never left the small town.  Some are happy to see
her, while others revel in the fact that she has been made a fool of and has
come crawling back home.  Here the movie shows promise, but then something
happens about midway through.  It begins to lose direction and drag....and
drag....and drag.
One direction the film tries to take is love story.  Birdee's mother tries
to set her up with Justin Matisse (Harry Connick, Jr.), who left Smithville
for California years ago, but then came back.  Justin used to have a crush
on Birdee, who was less than sympathetic, and it seems nothing has changed.
Justin is still very interested, and Birdee is still very stand-offish
toward him.  Now, you'd expect that there will be sparks as the movie
progresses, but there aren't.  The whole film is peppered with instances
where Justin gets close, but Birdee soon turns cold.  It's really no matter,
since there isn't any chemistry between them, and when they finally do get
together, it's totally forced.
Another direction taken is the reconciliation Birdee must make with her
past.  Birdee has issues with her mother, with her father, with herself, and
with half the townsfolk.  There are plenty of scenes where we see Birdee
deep in thought, and an image of her going through the same thing, but at a
younger age, is superimposed.  Two problems exist here.  First, we never get
the feeling how these instances fit in with the rest of the movie.  When
they appear, they seem isolated and disjointed.  There's hardly much of a
resolution for many of them.  Second, when the past images are displayed,
they are so vague that it's really mostly guesswork as to what they're
supposed to show.  In most of them, I could barely make out the image of a
young girl, so I assumed it was supposed to be Birdee.
There's also a subplot involving Birdee's daughter and how she doesn't have
any friends at school.  In fact, she makes an enemy of the school bully, Big
Dolores (Rachel Lena Snow) by accidentally hitting her in the face with a
volleyball.  There's this big buildup to an after-school fight.  Bernice is
scared.  The fight occurs with kids shouting and screaming and eerie music
playing and the whole thing looks like some kind of nightmare.  Then Bernice
gets up and goes home, unscratched.  I suppose director Forrest Whitaker
didn't think anybody wanted to see a kid actually all beaten up, but by
giving her only a bruised ego, we don't see the significance of the whole
thing.  Worse, Bernice's family then cheers her up by lip-synching to a song
by the Temptations in a scene which was so obviously put there just to break
up the monotony.  Too bad it wasn't very funny.  In fact, it was kind of
embarrassing.
Whitaker engages in a severe overuse of devices which are supposed to
provoke emotions.  He has Bullock cry too often, he includes too many slow
motion sequences, and he puts in too many musical montages, only serving to
trivialize each supposedly dramatic moment and drag the pacing even further.
There are even scenes which are in the movie for no apparent reason except
to mislead us into thinking there will be some kind of payoff down the road.
I guess they are there just to fill time.  Someone should remind him that
sometimes, the saying "less is more" is actually true.
You find the performances in HOPE FLOATS are pretty good when you can
concentrate long enough to pay attention to the screen.  Gena Rowlands is
fine as Birdee's unflappable mother, and young Mae Whitman does a nice job
playing Bernice, the typical precocious movie child.  Her part is actually
hampered by the script, however, which at first gives her the usual
older-than-her-years conversation, but then quickly gives her lines which
are not just unrealistic, they are nearly impossible to take from someone so
young.  You wonder if the screenwriter had actually taken the time to say
the sentences out loud.  Harry Connick, Jr. delivers some of the corniest
lines I've ever heard, my favorite being when he's at the local saloon,
trying to get Birdee to cut a rug with him.  "Dancing is like a conversation
between two people," he says.  "Talk to me."  I had to control my laughter.
Sandra Bullock clocks in with her most mature performance to date.  She is
strong, tender, vulnerable, and funny.  There's a scene where Birdee is
trying to get a job through an employment agency headed by a classmate she
didn't treat very well in high school, and the classmate, enjoying the turn
of the tables, decides to put Birdee in her place.  Bullock delivers a short
monologue which simultaneously shows all four of the qualities I have
mentioned.  The movie is almost worth seeing for those few spoken lines.
Just grit your teeth at the rest.

Title
Review for Bridge Too Far, A (1977)
        There are war movies, then there are Great War Movies.  A war movie
can be about anything set against the backdrop of war.  Sometimes they
are about a few human characters and how they act in war (PLATOON).
Sometimes they are about romance during war (THE ENGLISH PATIENT).
Sometimes they are about growing up during war (HOPE AND GLORY).  As
is often the case, the scope of the movie is relatively limited.  Too
many characters in too many places detract from the plot and confuse
the viewer.
        The Great War Movie uses these "problems" as tools to provide a broad
plain of vision and give the viewer a concept of the tremendous amount
of effort and coordination involved in a military undertaking.  So
many critical things go on at once.  The Great War Movie has
characters which we care about and admire.  By the end of the film we
have an idea of who they are, but more than that, we have an idea of
what they did - how they contributed in a small or large way to the
effort as a whole.  Their scenes do the same thing for the movie.
Individually, they are good.  Put together, they become more than the
sum of the parts.  That, in essence, is the strength of the Great War
Movie.  THE LONGEST DAY falls into this category, as does GETTYSBURG.
However, the definitive Great War Movie remains Richard Attenborough's
A BRIDGE TOO FAR.
        Set in September of 1944, A BRIDGE TOO FAR is about Operation Market
Garden, a plan to drop three divisions of Allied paratroopers behind
enemy lines in Holland, each tasked with capturing a key bridge
successively deeper in Nazi-held territory.  The US 101st Airborne was
to take the first bridge near Eindhoven.  The US 82nd Airborne was to
take the second bridge near Nijmegen.  The British 1st Airborne was to
take the third bridge over the Rhein at Arnhem.  Once landed, the
airborne troops had to hold its bridge until British XXX Corps could
punch through the fighting front and link up with each division in
succession.  Once successful, the Allies would be in a position to
strike at Germany's industrial heartland, the Ruhr region, and end the
war by Christmas.  This ambitious (some said foolhardy) plan was
severely hampered by the unexpected presence of a German panzer
division resting in Arnhem.
        A BRIDGE TOO FAR has so many things going for it.  Initially striking
is its all-star cast:  Dirk Bogarde, James Caan, Michael Caine, Sean
Connery, Edward Fox, Elliott Gould, Gene Hackman, Anthony Hopkins,
Hardy Kruger, Laurence Olivier, Ryan O'Neal, Robert Redford,
Maximilian Schell, and Liv Ullmann.  Casts like that are simply not
seen these days, except in cases where a movie contains a lot of
short, walk-on cameos.  In those cases, the stars are simply there to
catch the viewer's attention for a few seconds.  A BRIDGE TOO FAR not
only has these actors in it, they all actually do something
meaningful.  Each gives a stellar performance in scenes essential to
the plot.
        The plot of a Great War Movie is comprised of history.  As much as
possible, it is not a colorization of history or someone's
interpretation of what happened, but a series of events based on the
facts.  So it is with the plot of A BRIDGE TOO FAR.  This movie does
not deviate significantly from the actual historical accounts, and
with the exception of a few minor characters, all personalities
portrayed in the movie were actual people.  This has the effect of
making the story of the events and characters all the more compelling.
Take, for example, when General Roy Urquhart (Sean Connery) and
another officer are taken under fire and fight a running gun battle.
They try to seek shelter from the enemy, only to end up trapped in the
attic of a Dutch house by a German Tank.  This is not fiction - it
actually happened.  Another example can be found when XXX Corps
reaches the bridge at Nijmegen.  A Nazi general (Hardy Kruger) has
demolition charges set to blow the bridge sky-high when the first
British tank crosses it, but the charges don't detonate.  You would
think this were pure movie-making fiction, but it actually happened,
too.
        Through clear direction by Attenborough and superior performances by
all the actors, A BRIDGE TOO FAR gives the viewer insight into the
world of military leadership.  The charismatic leader is portrayed
best by Edward Fox as General Horrocks of XXX Corps.  In a scene early
in the movie, Horrocks arrives at a theater to brief the senior
officers.  From the moment he exits his jeep and thanks the driver,
then hands his coat and hat to a junior aide and says, "Look after
these for me, will you?" you've already got the idea that this man is
well liked and could probably get his men to follow him anywhere.
Then he starts the briefing out with a joke.  Later, he is driving
down a column of armored vehicles, while talking with Irish Colonel
Joe Vandeleur (Michael Caine) in the passenger seat.  Periodically,
Horrocks shouts encouragements and good-natured jibes at commanders on
the side of the road, eliciting enthusiastic responses.  One cannot
help but be pulled into this aura of charisma, much like the soldiers
under his command.  
        As Colonel John Frost of the British 1st Airborne, Anthony Hopkins
delivers a wonderful portrayal of the English stiff upper lip when his
battalion must hold out against unexpected German tanks.  One of his
officers says, "I was a bit surprised to find Bittrich's Panzer troops
here in Arnhem."  Just as surprised, Frost nevertheless responds with,
"Well, you didn't really believe all that nonsense they told us about
the enemy being comprised of children and old men, did you?"
        There are many other scenes which contribute to the viewer's peek into
this realm, but one other scene in particular deserves mention.  On
the way to the drop zone, General Maxwell Taylor (Paul Maxwell) is in
one of the many planes carrying paratroopers of the US 101st.  He
merely looks at one of his soldiers, and gets the response, "Yeah.
Fine, sir."  This more than adequately illustrates the bond these
leaders had with their men.  It is an extremely short scene with only
three words of dialogue, but it speaks volumes.
        One theme raised in the beginning of the movie is how once begun,
Operation Market Garden was not able to be stopped.  This was in large
part due to the fact that even those who were skeptical of the
operation's plans were often afraid to "rock the boat."  Two
characters express their opposition to the plan.  One is Polish
General Stanislaw Sosabowski (Gene Hackman), a man who keeps silent
until he has something meaningful to say.  In one scene carefully
crafted by Attenborough, the operation is revealed to the generals in
charge of the assault divisions.  Although there are only five men in
the room, the viewer is not even aware Sosabowski is present until he
is asked a question.  He is nearly punished for his opposition by
being marginalized in the operation.
        The other character to speak out is a British intelligence officer,
Major Fuller (Frank Grimes), who is adamant about photographs he has
recently collected showing the placement of panzers in the town of
Arnhem.  Even though he shows them to General Browning (Dirk Bogarde),
they are dismissed with doubts that the tanks are fully serviceable.
Browning goes on to chastise Fuller about how "sixteen consecutive
drops have been canceled for one reason or another, but this time the
party's on."  Fuller is later not allowed to participate in the
operation in a touching scene where a doctor seeks Fuller out, notes
the stress he has been under lately, and recommends he "get some
rest."  It is almost as if anyone who does not agree with the plan is
mentally unstable.  (Interestingly, the character of Fuller is based
upon a real intelligence officer by the name of Brian Urquhart.
However, since Sean Connery portrays a general also named Urquhart,
the intelligence officer's name was changed to avoid confusion.  In
reality, Brian Urquhart was, like the character of Fuller, left out of
the operation, but later served with the United Nations with
distinction as was eventually knighted.)
        Also worthy of mention are the visuals.  The take-off of hundreds of
C-47 Dakota transports and towed gliders is magnificent, especially
when coupled with John Addison's rousing musical score.  There are two
sequences in which the sky is filled with paratroopers, a sight that
would only be accomplished through computer imagery today, but which
actually employed scores of real jumpers in 1977, when the film was
made.  The battle scenes are also startling, portraying the wild melee
that occurs in urban fighting, and the sometimes surprise nature of
enemy contact in the countryside.
        Altogether, A BRIDGE TOO FAR is an excellent movie as well as a
wonderful account of Operation Market Garden.  In addition to the
lesson in history, it provides an entertaining and fascinating story
of the people and the acts of heroics, successful and failed, on both
sides.  Movies of this caliber are few and far between.  This, coupled
with a relative decline in interest of films of this genre and scope,
may very well cause A BRIDGE TOO FAR to remain the definitive Great
War Movie of years to come.

Title
Review for X Files, The (1998)
Apparently not much goes on in Blackwood, Texas, since kids have to
find their kicks by digging around in the undeveloped areas outside of
the small town.  While doing so, four young boys discover an
underground system of caves when one of their number falls through the
ground.  As any little boy would, he finds the whole thing pretty neat
until a mysterious black oil seeps up from beneath his feet and
absorbs itself into his skin.  Soon, the oil has turned the boy's eyes
the color of night and put him in a comatose condition.  Help arrives,
and in a baby-down-the-well scenario, four firemen go down the hole to
bring the boy back, but meet the same fate, attacked by the black oil.
News travels fast as a convoy of unmarked tanker trucks and a
helicopter full of secretive government-types converge on the scene
and take over.  "Remember that situation we never planned for?" the
newly arrived man in charge asks a cellular phone.  "We better come up
with a plan."
Part of the plan is to cover up the victims' cause of death, and when
FBI Special Agents Fox Mulder (David Duchovny) and Dana Scully
(Gillian Anderson) receive a tip that bodies from Blackwood are
planted in the rubble of a "terrorist" bombing in Dallas, they uncover
a trail of conspiracy and deception with implications for the future
of the entire planet.
In case you didn't know, THE X-FILES:  FIGHT THE FUTURE is a movie
version of the hit Fox television series "The X-Files".  For those of
you unfamiliar with "The X-Files", thank you for reading this review.
I realize cave-dwellers don't get much in the way of reading material.
Were you also chosen for the O.J. jury?  I'm sorry, I couldn't resist.
Briefly, the television episodes can be divided into two categories:
Stand-alone, self contained stories, and those which are part of a
continuing melodrama centered around Mulder's quest to find his lost
sister and uncover the conspiracy which he believes is responsible for
her abduction.
The promotional tagline for THE X-FILES:  FIGHT THE FUTURE is "The
Truth is Revealed, Only in Theaters".  I wouldn't be going out on any
limbs if I were to say most people going to see this film are doing so
just to find out some explanations for the numerous unanswered
questions left by the television series.  Indeed, much of the
promotion for this film is centered around the fact that viewers will
get the answers they've been so eagerly awaiting.  In this way, much
of the series has been extremely effective as a marketing gimmick to
get people to shell out their money and buy a ticket.  Likewise, the
"truths" revealed are such that the story of the conspiracy is far
from over, and of course, you'll have to tune in next fall to find out
where it will go from here.  Absolute genius.
The premise of the movie is intriguing enough that it gets you
interested, and the script is competently written so that one event
leads logically to another, and you are rewarded with a climactic
finish that ties everything together.  This film is also well-paced,
with sufficient punctuations of action and suspense that hold the
viewer's attention through the two-hour running time.  Visually,
however, the movie seems to split between presenting the viewer with
fascinating sights and no sights at all.  At times, the images on
screen are breathtaking, while at other times, the film is
photographed in such shadow or darkness that it is unclear exactly
what it is we're supposed to be looking at.
When you make a movie out of a television show, you can't assume your
moviegoing audience is already well acquainted with the characters and
framework.  Unfortunately, this film is guilty of doing exactly that,
as it assumes too much and is definitely lacking in character
development.  For example, Mulder's motivations are only given a
cursory explanation, and an unindoctrinated viewer would therefore
only be able to guess at the deeper background supporting the film's
plot.  Likewise, supporting characters from the television show are
thrown in for what seems to be no other reason than to give the loyal
fans what they want:  To see them on the big screen.  On television,
FBI Assistant Director Walter Skinner (Mitch Pileggi) has a close
relationship to the two agents, but this is not made clear in the
movie.  When he helps Mulder evade surveillance by other agents, one
does not know why.  When Mulder's off-the-record technical consultants
show up for a short scene, the audience isn't given a clue who they
are.  Maybe the tagline should be, "The Truth is Revealed, Only in
Theaters, Only to Fans".
Perhaps most disappointing is the absence of a solid villain.  "The
Cigarette-Smoking Man" (William B. Davis), Mulder and Scully's primary
antagonist in the series, is present in the film, but his involvement
with the story is very low-key, and only fans will appreciate his
participation.  This is a real missed opportunity, as he is presented
very ominously in the beginning of the film and is therefore set up to
play a large role in the plot.  However, rather than being portrayed
as the driving force behind the unfolding plans of the conspiracy, or
the constant foil to Mulder's attempts to uncover the truth, he is
relegated to being the mysterious person who seems to be present
wherever the conspiracy manifests itself, hardly speaking at all.  A
confrontation (violent or otherwise) between The Cigarette-Smoking Man
and Mulder would appear to be requisite, but it never materializes.
Just as there is a disadvantage to being unfamiliar with the series,
however, so is there a problem if you are a follower.  The film has a
slightly upped production value, but not so significant that the movie
doesn't play just like a two-hour episode.  The series is already a
well-produced show, so the filmmakers had a difficult task right from
the start in creating a movie which would not only answer questions,
but impress as well.  As it turns out, the film has a few more special
effects and is more darkly photographed, but that's about it.  I'm
sure some people will wonder why they couldn't have seen this at home
for free.
Fans of the show will not be disappointed in the performances of the
actors, since they are playing the same characters they have played
for several years now.  Duchovny and Anderson have matured with their
on-screen personae, and appear very comfortable in their portrayals of
the two FBI agents, although Duchovny's performance may seem a bit
wooden to those who haven't seen him in the role before.
THE X-FILES:  FIGHT THE FUTURE is not a bad film, but neither is it a
great one.  It is decent entertainment for the time spent, but the
problem lies in trying to please two segments of the audience and not
being totally successful in either endeavor.  In all, fans of the
series will appreciate (and enjoy) this film considerably more than
other people, but with expectations running very high, even they might
be disappointed.

Title
Review for General's Daughter, The (1999)
The U.S. Army utilizes a number of books known as field manuals which
stipulate the specific way in which almost every action imaginable
must be done.  One particular field manual is known as the FM 22-5,
which among other things, covers the practice of saluting.  Under the
"saluting" section is a sub-section which covers how a salute is
rendered by a military work detail in the presence of a superior
officer.  The salute is rendered by the highest-ranking individual
present when the superior officer comes within six paces of the
detail, and is dropped when the officer passes six paces from the
detail.  In any event, the salute is rendered only by the man (or
woman) in charge, rather than by the whole group.  Almost at the very
beginning of THE GENERAL'S DAUGHTER, we see a general's motorcade
passing a work detail.  Everyone salutes.  It looked impressive, but
it just wasn't right.  That little bit showed me that someone either
didn't do the appropriate research, or made the conscious decision to
go with style over substance for the scene.  In fact, this would serve
as a metaphor for the rest of the picture, as it seems director Simon
West tried so hard to craft a film with atmosphere and flash that he
forgot a coherent story and good characterization are also crucial to
a good movie.  What results is a film that looks good, but like that
one scene, just isn't right.
The first fifteen minutes of the film is a good example.  Paul Brenner
(John Travolta) is an agent for the Army's Criminal Investigation
Division, undercover at a Georgia Army base to investigate an illegal
arms sale.  Prior to the transaction, the buyer gets a whiff that
Brenner isn't the unscrupulous supply sergeant he's supposed to be,
and later that night attempts to kill him by shooting up the houseboat
on which Brenner is living.  So ensues a cat and mouse action sequence
which ends like a certain scene in RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK (we'll just
say that it involves propellers). Brenner then receives new orders
when the commanding general's daughter, Captain Elisabeth Campbell
(Leslie Stefanson), is found naked, bound, and dead on one of the
base's training ranges.  He is teamed with rape investigator Sarah
Sunhill (Madeleine Stowe) to uncover the truth about the peculiarly
gruesome murder.  What I want to know is why the whole action scene
with the arms buyer was even necessary.  It gives no insight into
Brenner, other than the fact that he's a little cocky.  Does the arms
subplot turn up later?  No, so why add this extra running time to the
film?  The answer:  It looked cool.
Or how about the "atmosphere"?  The beginning of THE GENERAL'S
DAUGHTER presents us with imagery of the deep south - thick trees,
dirt roads, sultry colors over water - all backed up with bayouesque
music.  Nice immersion in the setting, but it soon doesn't matter, for
when the film's plot shifts over to the murder investigation, so does
the entire mood.  No attention is paid to the location of the story,
and the music is altered to fit a very generic thriller theme.  Did
the filmmakers start out thinking they were making a different movie?
Instead of creating a cohesive atmospheric theme for the entire film,
we get the distraction of one of theme followed by another, just
because the director thought he should show off some of the
countryside.
The above examples also serve to illustrate that inconsistency is
another problem with this movie.  As I've already mentioned, an entire
section of the film doesn't jibe with the rest, and the
characterization only adds to the difficulty.  Brenner, who comes
across as a man with little respect for authority, suddenly snaps to
in the presence of General Campbell (James Cromwell) and utters some
of the corniest "yes, sir"s I've ever heard.  He even delivers an
emotion-charged monologue about why he will work so hard to catch the
person who killed the General's daughter, even though he was totally
flippant about the whole thing just a couple of minutes previous.
Sunhill, who initially comes across as a professional investigator,
utilizes a couple of blatantly illegal methods to obtain information,
and even revels in her ingenuity.   Both characters are protagonists,
but it's hard to get behind them when their personalities are all over
the place, and in some cases, simply unappealing. 
I could imagine that during filming, West would shoot a scene, then
take the actors aside and tell them, "Let's do it again, but this
time, I want more."  I say this because although Travolta and Stowe
are normally very good, in this film they overact in most of their
scenes.  An even worse offender is Clarence Williams III as the
general's aide, Colonel Fowler.  I swear the guy says all of his lines
from the position of attention.  A far cry from his days as Linc in
"The Mod Squad", I can't help but think he was acting from West's
direction.  A couple of side characters including a West Point
psychologist (John Beasly) and a young female private (Ariyan A.
Johnson) make their scenes nearly impossible to bear.  The only two
actors who seem to have escaped West's influence are James Woods, who
provides a good performance as Colonel Moore, Elisabeth's mentor at
the Psychological Operations unit, and Timothy Hutton as Colonel Kent
of the Military Police.  Woods relishes the role of a man whose job is
playing with people's minds, and does so without ever taking it over
the top.  Hutton just kind of hangs around, but at least he wasn't
overacting.
I haven't read the Nelson DeMille novel on which this movie was based,
but I'll bet more than a few dollars that the story was better in book
form.  The movie version has got characters which come and go with
little or nothing to do except fill up space, or provide bits of
information which seem to neither mean anything in terms of advancing
the story nor reveal any significance once the whole story is
finished.  Every time we're presented with some new aspect to the
case, West gives us more of that flash by playing it up like it's the
most momentous discovery ever, but the information is not used by the
investigators at all.  Instead, when conclusions are drawn, they are
such tremendous leaps of faith that you wonder if successful
investigations are not based on facts, but lucky guesses instead.  The
Army should have saved time by bringing in Brennan and Sunhill,
letting them play a game of twenty questions with the suspects, then
letting them guess who the killer was.  Would've been over in a half
hour.
The film finishes with a sort of bookend, featuring the same style and
southern scenery as the very beginning.  Literally during the closing
credits, we get to see Brennan get in his car and drive off, then we
get to see Sunhill get in her car and drive off.  They both seem kind
of happy.  Maybe they were driving away from Simon West.

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
The premise is pretty simple.  Three young film students go out into
the woods of Maryland to get footage for a project on what locals call
the Blair Witch, an entity who supposedly comes to claim lives from
the local population every so many years.  Although their foray is
supposed to last only a couple of days, they get lost and have a
difficult time getting their bearings despite their possession of a
map and a compass.  Worse yet, each night they are tormented by
strange, haunting noises, and each morning find evidence that someone
or something knows they are there.  Is it the Blair Witch?  Whatever
it is, the students never come out of the forest again.  Sounds like a
fairly run-of-the-mill horror movie, but what's different about this
film is it's a documentary.
Well, okay, it's a mockumentary, but the style in which THE BLAIR
WITCH PROJECT is filmed is so natural, it takes on a very eerie
reality.  Directors Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez hired three
actors, gave them sketchy details about the roles they were to play
and the rough outline of the plot, and turned them loose in the woods
with cameras, food, and a global positioning system receiver so they
would at least know where they were at any given time.  Myrick,
Sanchez, and a small crew followed the actors at a distance and left
them food and new camera batteries at predetermined checkpoints.  The
actors were free to improvise dialog, and shot all the footage
themselves with a small videocamera and a 16mm black and white, giving
the whole thing a documentary-like look and feel.  The improvised
script is also very effective, for even though much of the dialog is
repetitive and simplistic, it's probably more akin to what real people
would say in this situation than anything pre-written could have
achieved.  It's as if what these three actors are experiencing is
very, very real, making the film even scarier than you'd think.
Aiding in the illusion of reality has been a campaign of rumors and
publicity implying that the story of the disappearing film students
were true.  Even though the directors and actors have been
subsequently interviewed for printed articles, many unknowing viewers
have been uncertain as to the origin of the footage, purported to have
been found mysteriously in the basement of an abandoned house a year
after the "students" disappearance.  Believe me, creepy as this film
was, the fright factor would have gone up exponentially if I had been
under the impression it were real.  If you've got friends who don't
know the secret, don't spoil it for them yet.
Except for a few rare instances, the film doesn't explicitly show us
anything that would actually scare us.  Instead, most of the scares
come from the reactions of the actors, leaving the sources of their
terror to your imagination.  Moreover, a few of the occurrences are
even left up to your own interpretation, causing mild chills for the
next several days as you run the possibilities through your mind.
Those looking for definitive answers, or those who are more fond of
today's "show everything" style of horror film may find this film
lacking, but others will find this approach a breath of fresh air.
THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT is not one of those barn burners that throws
scares at you the moment the film starts to roll.  Instead, it's a
slow pot boiler that gives you circumstances and information that
ultimately lead up to an incredibly scary last 20 minutes.  So
frightening is this portion, that "It's not real" was a mantra I said
to myself every so often.  However, that's not to say that the film is
badly paced with nothing to offer until the end.  On the contrary,
while the first hour of the film may not be exactly frightening, it is
a very interesting character study as the film students realize their
hopelessly lost situation, then become aware that they may not be
alone in the forest, and ultimately lose their presences of mind.  As
they slip down that slope toward their ultimate fate, we're right
there along with them.
However, as effective as this film is, there are at least two things
which stand in the way of making it more enjoyable.  First is the fact
that the cameras keep rolling through virtually everything.  The
students have an argument and it's caught on tape.  The students are
scared out of their wits at something they can't see, and yet manage
to keep the 16mm going the whole time.  It occurs to you more than
once that any regular person would drop the camera once things started
getting desperate, and therefore the illusion of reality is shattered
in a few places.  But to their credit, the actors provide a
semi-decent explanation (looking through the camera filters reality,
and they sure don't want to be there), and besides, without the
constant filming there would be no movie.
The second problem is the constant jarring motion of both cameras,
especially the video camcorder.  I realize it would be pretty
difficult to keep a hand-held camera steady while on the move, but the
shakiness was to the extreme and left many at my screening with a
headache or nausea.  Be warned that if you're susceptible to motion
sickness, this film may not be for you.
If you see THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT, just keep in mind that the payoff
doesn't occur until the end.  I've heard reports of people walking out
prematurely because "nothing happened," but to do so would be a
definite mistake.  If you wish to be scared, be patient and you will
be rewarded.  But as they say, be careful what you wish for.

Title
Review for Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)
When AUSTIN POWERS:  INTERNATIONAL MAN OF MYSTERY made its debut in
1997, it was an idea whose time had come.  Mixing dead-on spoof with
hilarious conventional comedy, the film was a continuous, unrelenting
laugh-fest that poked fun at the 1960's secret agent movie genre.
It's sequel, AUSTIN POWERS:  THE SPY WHO SHAGGED ME, attempts to carry
on in the same tradition, but unfortunately fails to entertain as well
as it's predecessor.
Mike Myers returns as British super spy Austin Powers, frozen in the
60's and thawed out in the 90's to combat his arch nemesis Dr. Evil
(also played by Myers).  At the end of the previous film, Dr. Evil
escaped capture by sending himself into space in a giant Bob's Big Boy
statue.  The beginning of THE SPY WHO SHAGGED ME features the evil Dr.
Evil returning from the cold reaches of Earth orbit, bent upon
destroying Austin Powers by traveling back in time to 1967, when
Powers was still frozen, and stealing the life force that makes him a
successful international operative:  His "mojo."  Dr. Evil is
convinced that once the constantly randy Powers is robbed of his
libido, his ability to thwart the plans of the world's dark forces
will be sapped for good (or bad, as the case may be).  Powers must
therefore pursue Dr. Evil into the past in order to save the world and
his ability to shag.
As I mentioned earlier, THE SPY WHO SHAGGED ME attempts to capitalize
upon what worked so well for the first film.  This means there is
still a lot of parody of movies like DR. NO and OUR MAN FLINT, and
even the Patrick Magoohan television series "The Prisoner."  In many
cases, this works very effectively, such as when Dr. Evil builds his
secret hideout in the middle of an active volcano on a secluded
island, or whenever Powers gets into an automobile and the background
immediately looks like pre-filmed scenery.  However, many of the jokes
we get in THE SPY WHO SHAGGED ME are also just retreads from the last
film without sufficiently new angles to make them as funny the second
time around, such as when one of Dr. Evil's henchmen just won't die,
or when Powers goes romping naked through a hotel lobby.  Both jokes
were brilliantly executed in 1997, but this time they are by nature
less inspired and fall relatively flat.
Undeveloped jokes are actually a serious problem in this film, a
result of screenwriting lapses and poor directorial choices.  For
example, the Evil empire invested heavily in Starbucks, and now the
Evil headquarters is located in the Seattle Space Needle.  As Dr.
Evil's right hand man Number Two (Robert Wagner) explains, it was a
great investment because Starbucks offers "premium coffee at
affordable prices."  The utter ridiculousness of this proposition,
along with the plausibility of the empire association (Amazon.com
could have been another good choice), presents many opportunities for
further comedic exploitation throughout the film.  Picture Frappucino
machines lifting themselves off of their mounts and walking down the
street wreaking havoc.  It's too bad the possibilities weren't pursued
further.  Additionally, there are instances where a character will say
something which seems to be a lead into a punchline, but the dialog
immediately moves on to something else, leaving the audience hanging
and confused.  A good director would have recognized this and
rectified the situation on the set or in the editing room.
The saving grace for this movie is that when the jokes do hit the
mark, they hit solidly.  Most of the time, the Dr. Evil character
steals the show, but one of Dr. Evil's henchmen, Fat Bastard (also
played by Myers) may be the most outrageous.  Drooling and inflated
with the notion that he's a sexy man, he also once ate a baby.  Myers
has played over-the-top Scotsmen on Saturday Night Live and in SO I
MARRIED AN AXE MURDERER, and Fat Bastard seems to be the next logical
step in the progression.
The other actors in the film are pretty much window dressing, although
they do what they can.  Robert Wagner only has a small role as Number
Two before the film moves to 1969, and a younger Number Two is played
by Rob Lowe, who does a great Wagner impression.  Seth Green as Dr.
Evil's son, Scott Evil, is under-used and has a lot less screen time
than he did in the last movie.  Mindy Sterling returns as henchwoman
Frau Farbissina, and Elizabeth Hurley has a short performance as
Secret Service agent Vanessa Kensington.  Powers' new love interest
and action partner is portrayed by Heather Graham as CIA agent
Felicity Shagwell, but she doesn't live up to the better performance
by Hurley the last film.  I realize THE SPY WHO SHAGGED ME is a
comedy, but Graham just doesn't hold up in the scenes which require
more than a pretty face.  Disappointing, considering her wonderful
acting in BOOGIE NIGHTS, and I have a feeling the direction had more
to do with this than anything else.
One of the new characters in this film is a one-eighth sized clone of
Dr. Evil, which he dubs Mini Me (Verne Troyer).  I was impressed by
the fact that the film got a lot of mileage out of this diminutive
character who has no spoken lines, but actually helps the plot along
in addition to providing a lot of laughs.  In the end, however, Mini
Me is somewhat of a metaphor for this follow up to AUSTIN POWERS:
INTERNATIONAL MAN OF MYSTERY.  It comes from the same stock as the
original, but it's a lot less.

Title
Review for Snake Eyes (1998)
It was a dark and stormy night.  A hurricane was making landfall and
whipping the shores of Atlantic City, a town known for the bright
lights which belied its dark, seamy underside.  The rain came down
like a gesture from God, trying to wash away the murkiness, the
corruption, the evil.  But taking shelter inside of one of the
so-called jewels of the city's thorny crown were the sinners, gathered
around a boxing arena and eager to watch the ensuing pugilistic
contest like the Romans of old, frenzied in their thirst for blood,
drawn of their fellow man.
That's how I envision the first paragraph of the screenplay for SNAKE
EYES, in which director Brian De Palma attempts to deliver a film noir
for the present day.  It's got all the ingredients:  A cop on the
take, a villain with money and power, a damsel in distress, a boxer
paid to take a dive, a murder, and a storm outside to provide an
ominous backdrop.
The main character is Rick Santoro (Nicholas Cage), an Atlantic City
police detective who is king in his sector of the boardwalk area.  He
knows everybody, is well connected, and gets regular payoffs by the
local would-be felons.  It's obvious he runs a pretty tight ship, one
that serves his own purposes nicely.
Atlantic City is a big boxing town, and Santoro is a big boxing fan.
On this particular night, he gets to watch the fight of the century
from the front row, courtesy of his best friend, Navy Commander Kevin
Dunne (Gary Sinise), who is handling security for Defense Secretary
Charles Kirkland (Joel Fabiani).  Kirkland's attendance is partly a PR
ploy to show solidarity with the arena's owner Gilbert Powell (John
Heard), who's also the head of a defense contracting company
developing the Airguard, a controversial new anti-missile system.
When, in the middle of the fight, Kirkland is shot to death mere feet
away from Santoro, he becomes embroiled in the investigation into who
killed the Secretary and why, attempting to reconstruct the chain of
events leading up to the assassination through eyewitness accounts,
surveillance footage, and his own recollections.
The problem with film noir as a genre is that it doesn't give us very
many surprises.  There have already been a lot of films before this
one that have set the series of events we expect - that's why it's a
genre.  It is for this reason that SNAKE EYES doesn't really impress.
De Palma treats us to some interesting (although not innovative)
camerawork, great use of light and shadow, and the way he plays out
the same scenes from different perspectives is refreshing, but as a
film there isn't a lot that's original. We can anticipate the plot
twists, and we know what the outcome will be.
This is why it is perhaps even more disappointing that there are some
rudimentary points which were not given enough attention, signifying
some sloppy screenwriting and direction.  For example, Julia Costello
(Carla Gugino) is the person seen talking with Kirkland when he is
shot.  Disappearing into the crowd after being grazed by a bullet
herself, she is sought after by both the good guys and the bad guys as
the one person who might be able to identify the motive behind the
murder.  Principal role, right?  Important to the plot, right?  It
wasn't until the credits came up that I even knew the character's
name.  Was the part where her name is revealed left on the cutting
room floor, or was I just seriously not paying attention?  I wonder
how she is even able to "disappear" when security is crawling all over
the arena, detaining people left and right, and here's a woman,
covered in blood, and apparently no one takes notice.
There are other disappointments, too, such as when Santoro is being
trailed by the film's villain, and recognizes he is being followed
when lightning from behind causes an unmistakable shadow.  De Palma is
successful in mounting some serious tension by focusing on certain
parts of the villain's shadow, and utilizing Ryuichi Sakamoto's
dramatic score.  However, there is zero payoff as Santoro simply turns
around and faces his antagonist, rather than pull some fancy move and
commence the final struggle.  Unfortunately, the film's climax, when
it does occur, depends so much on coincidence it's laughable - or at
least would be laughable if it weren't such a sorry excuse for
wrapping everything up.
Luckily, we are given two good performances by the male leads.  Cage
is engaging as the over-the-top Santoro; he's up on energy through the
first half hour of film, and it's fun to watch him.  It would be
difficult to take it for the full running time, however, so his
character is graciously toned down as the sobering reality of the
assassination takes hold.  Cage also plays well off of Sinise, who's
Dunne is straight man to Cage's Santoro for the first part of the
movie, but who soon enough gets to distance himself and command his
own scenes.  I sometimes wonder if Sinise can play a role badly.
SNAKE EYES is a film that starts out with a lot of potential, but
founders along the way to a decidedly unsatisfying finish.  Cage and
Sinise save portions of the movie, but in the end the screenplay does
not rise above the level of ordinary, and occasionally dips below
that.

Title
Review for Tian yu (1998)
In the late '60's and early '70's, the Chinese government embarked
upon a program intended to close the differences between people from
the city and people from the country.  In typical communist fashion,
the program involved forcing high school age boys and girls away from
their families in the urban areas and out into the rural areas where
they learned trades such as farming and animal husbandry.  Joan Chen's
XIU XIU is about the experiences of one such young girl.
Xiu Xiu is a girl who seems eager to take on new challenges.  Although
she knows she will leave her family and boyfriend behind to learn the
ways of the countryside, Xiu Xiu would rather look forward to her
destination rather than fret over what she will miss.  Trucked away
from the city, Xiu Xiu is initially placed in a commune with plenty of
girls her own age, and actually enjoys the new experiences such as
horseback riding and outdoor movie shows on Saturday nights.  Her
enthusiasm and independence is evidenced when she stands up to a
loud-mouthed young man in the middle of a crowd of others.  However,
for all her spunk, Xiu Xiu is still basically an untainted young girl,
and just as her exposure to another way of life strips her of her
ignorance of the country, so do her experiences there strip her of her
innocence.
The administrator for the program headquarters decides that Xiu Xiu
will leave the commune and learn horse herding from Lao Jin (Lopsang),
a nomad who was supposedly castrated while taken prisoner during the
Tibetan war.  Upon her arrival at Lao Jin's campsite, Xiu Xiu is
appalled that they must share a single tent that affords little
privacy, but soon learns that Lao Jin is a most benign fellow in spite
of his gruff exterior.  Chen's screenplay, based upon a novel by
Geling Yan, is fairly sparse with dialog, yet manages to establish a
believable and meaningful relationship between Xiu Xiu and Lao Jin in
a relatively short amount of time.  Later, when Xiu Xiu learns that
there are a limited number of permits allowing return to the city, we
can nearly empathize with her plight and tangibly notice the film's
mood change from one of discovery to one of descent.  I must attribute
much of the credit to Chen's surprisingly impressive directorial
talent (this is her first time behind the camera), and to the
abilities of the actors, who are able to convey a lot of emotion
without saying a word.
Another non-verbal mode of communication is employed by Chen in
showing the passage of time.  I really enjoyed the way Chen chooses to
give us cues such as the increasing length of Xiu Xiu's hair and the
diminishing supply of toilet paper that her mother packed for her at
the beginning of her journey.  I appreciated the fact that Chen trusts
that her audience will have the visual acuity to notice these
semi-subtle clues.
XIU XIU is wonderfully rich in symbolism and complexity, and I must
admit it took me a full day after viewing this film for some of the
more hidden statements to surface in my mind.  The transformation of
Xiu Xiu as a person is handled delicately and competently, so there is
a lot to look for in terms of deeper meaning.  Take, for example, the
way influential government workers come to visit Xiu Xiu in the
countryside, preying upon a girl who is so desperate to get back to
the city that she will do anything.  The first arrives via ox and
cart, the next by motorcycle, and the one after that by jeep, each a
progressively closer symbol of urban lifestyle.  With each visitor,
then, Xiu Xiu gets closer to home, but also gets closer to what is the
opposite of nature and the innocence that it represents.
However, XIU XIU is more than just a film about the loss of innocence.
It is also a political statement aimed at the corrupt and hypocritical
Chinese government.  The very nature of the film's subject matter
speaks volumes of Chen and Yan's attitude toward a system which
allowed the abandonment of many of its young citizens to unfamiliar
lands and lifestyles.  Notice how Xiu Xiu's predicament is created
because there are fewer permits to return to the city than there are
girls who have been moved out, and the only way out of this situation
is to submit to the unscrupulous employees of the system which begat
the problem in the first place.  XIU XIU was actually banned in China
due to sexual and political content, but I believe the reasoning had
more to do with how the government is portrayed than anything of a
sexual nature.
One of the drawbacks to this film is the inclusion of a narration at
the beginning and end by the boyfriend Xiu Xiu left behind.  Although
it works as set-up for the film, it's intrusiveness at the end spoils
a climax up to which the film had worked so diligently.  Some of the
camerawork during exciting scenes is also a little too frenetic for my
tastes, but I've seen more of the same in examples of Chinese cinema,
so perhaps it's just a style of which I'm not fully appreciative.
Additionally, I had a problem with some of the music, most notably a
recurring thematic melody which I found grating rather than haunting.
Overall, however, XIU XIU is a film worth seeing, and quite an
accomplishment as Joan Chen's directorial debut.  Just be sure to pay
attention, and you'll have something to think about for a few days
afterward.

Title
Review for You hua hao hao shuo (1997)
KEEP COOL, a Chinese film directed by semi-accomplished filmmaker
Yimou Zhang, was one of the kickoff films for this year's Hawaii
International Film Festival.  On the day it premiered, lines of eager
moviegoers stretched around the block, some anticipants having queued
up well in advance to get a good seat in the theater.  They need not
have wasted their time.
The movie is billed as a comedy, but is surprisingly bereft of humor.
There are noticeable attempts at laughs, but very few tries actually
click.  I wondered if there were jokes that I wasn't getting because
I'm not from China, but unfortunately my conclusion was that this lack
of humor couldn't be attributed to the cultural barrier either.  KEEP
COOL just isn't very funny.  
The prelude to the film was a visit by KEEP COOL's producer who, with
the help of an interpreter, regaled us of how in order to get the
print to the festival in time, an assistant hand carried it on the
plane from China to Hawaii.  Although the print made it, the
assistant's luggage was lost.  Too bad that story wasn't in the movie,
because it got a big laugh.  Qu Ying, the film's female lead, was also
on hand to give a few comments.  However, whereas the producer
politely made regular pauses in his dialog so the interpreter could
bring us up to speed, Ms. Ying saw fit to say everything she had to
say in one, fast-paced, incredibly long tirade.  It was dizzying; good
foreshadowing for the film.
You see, KEEP COOL is filmed almost totally with a camera handheld by
a man with a bad case of the shakes.  At least that's the way it
seems, since the camera is constantly moving.  Cinema verite is one
thing, but panning and shaking around until your audience has a
headache is another.  Although some might consider it a form which
helps give the viewer an idea of the anarchic state into which Chinese
youth is slowly growing, I found it thoroughly distracting, and after
a while, quite annoying.  Headache, as I said.
The film is about a young bookseller (Wen Jiang) who is after a young
woman (Qu Ying).  They used to be romantically involved, but the woman
grew tired of him and left the relationship.  The first half of the
film is about the young man's plan to win her back.  Of course the
thing is, she doesn't want to be won back, and has a nightclub owner
friend of hers rough him up a bit.  In the fight, the young man grabs
a laptop computer belonging to a bystander and attempts to use it to
fend off his attacker, but only ends up smashing it against a
lamppost.  We later find out that the laptop belongs to an older man
who wishes to get his damaged computer replaced.  There is a funny
scene (the only one in the film) where the young man tries to use some
twisted logic in order to get the older man to seek out the nightclub
owner (Baotian Li) in order to recoup his losses.
There is no sense to be made out of the young woman's behavior; cold
one minute, caring the next, so we feel no sympathy for her character.
The bookseller would be better off without her.  Although the second
half of the film causes us to lose a lot of sympathy for the young
bookseller as well, who is obsessed with chopping off the nightclub
owner's hand as revenge for the beating he took, it also offers us
some nice interaction between the bookseller and the older man.  While
the bookseller is blinded by his thirst for revenge, the older man is
the voice of reason and tries to rationalize each situation.  His
quest to end the dispute peacefully and equitably is the one we
identify with, but it is frustrating to see that he seems to be
talking to a brick wall half the time.  A friendship develops between
the two men, but it occurs too late in the film for the audience to
appreciate.
Although only an hour and a half in length, KEEP COOL contains
extraneous material.  The whole plot of how the bookseller is after
the young woman could have been taken out, since we don't see her from
the midpoint on.  A case of mistaken identity or some other device
could have served as the point of conflict between the bookseller and
the nightclub owner, and would have saved us from the bookseller's
boring pursuit during the first half.  But of course, this would have
shortened the movie to less than an hour.
There are a few things that KEEP COOL does right.  As mentioned
before, the interaction between the bookseller and the older man is
generally pretty good.  Although it grows tiresome, the reasoning with
the unreasonable is a nice exercise in logic, and represents the
differences in thinking between generations.  In one scene, for
example, the bookseller quotes Confucius to get his point across, but
the older man claims the quote was misinterpreted, and that it means
something entirely different.  Also effective is the way Zhang sets up
tension within a scene, such as when the bookseller is getting ready
to cut off the hand of the unwitting nightclub owner.  The nightclub
owner is counting out money, slapping each bundle of currency on the
table.  With every shot of his hand, we can hardly stand the
interminable wait before the bookseller is going to pull out his
cleaver and exact his revenge.  Unfortunately, these crumbs are not
enough to overcome the rest of the film's shortcomings, and weren't
enough to prevent that headache from lingering after I left the
theater.

Title
Review for In Love and War (1997)
I love war movies.  I also love Sandra Bullock.  My girlfriend once
said that my favorite movie in the world would be a war movie WITH
Sandra Bullock.  A couple of months later, IN LOVE AND WAR was
released and I thought that I had perhaps found this favorite film.
However, after seeing some previews and commercials, the movie didn't
seem to be all that interesting, and I never even made it to the
theater.  Since it was recently released on video, I decided to check
it out and see what I missed.  As it turns out, I didn't miss much.
Richard Attenborough's IN LOVE AND WAR is about the love affair
between a young Ernest Hemingway (Chris O'Donnell) and Agnes von
Kurowsky (Sandra Bullock), a nurse with the Red Cross, and is set in
Italy during the last year of World War I.  I learned in high school
that Hemingway was an ambulance driver, but I didn't see him driving
any ambulances.  Instead, he seemed more like a male Doughnut Dolly
whose job it was to hand out candy bars and cigarettes.  In the movie,
Hemingway is overly eager to see some action on the front line, so he
sneaks out one night and visits with some Italian soldiers.  Not long
after he arrives, an artillery shell strikes the trench where he and
his new friends are sitting.  He carries a wounded young Italian from
the trench to safety, getting hit in the leg by a machine gun on the
way.  Hemingway is taken to a hospital staffed by American nurses, and
is tended to by von Kurowsky, of whom he is immediately enamored.
Although he makes it a priority to have his love requited, her
affections are divided between Hemingway and an Italian doctor
(Domenico Caracciolo) who is also courting her.
Sandra Bullock puts in a decent performance, but there is not much
that's attractive about her character.  We really don't get a good
idea of why two men (three if you count Hemingway's war buddy Henry
Villard, played by MacKenzie Astin) are so desperately in love with
her.  There's really nothing special from a personality point of view,
and in this movie, Bullock looks relatively plain.  Her character
could be summed up by the word "bland".
Chris O'Donnell, however, does a good job of playing the young, brash,
but sometimes thoughtful Hemingway.  O'Donnell takes the character
through a wide variety of emotions but never over-does it.
Attenborough takes his time in developing the relationship between
Hemingway and von Kurowsky.  It's nice to see a film in which sparks
do not fly fifteen minutes after the credits.  Unfortunately, the
sparks, when they do happen, seem faked.  This is partly due to the
seeming inability of the von Kurowsky character to make up her mind.
Which of the two men does she really love?  Her relationship with the
doctor seems cold, but her relationship with Hemingway is consistently
interrupted because of it.  Her scenes with Hemingway are therefore
more like vignettes than a progression of a well cultivated love.
I expected more from Attenborough, who brought us such great movies as
A BRIDGE TOO FAR and GHANDI.  Although he made pretty good use of the
Italian scenery, and even threw in a sweeping battle scene quite
reminiscent of Lewis Milestone's ALL QUIET ON THE WESTERN FRONT, it
did not save the film from looking just like any other movie filmed in
a scenic location.  Perhaps the source material, which was mainly
taken from von Kurowskys diaries, simply did not lend itself to such
a film, and perhaps Attenborough did not want to stray too far from
the truth.  Whatever the case, the film ended up relatively
pedestrian, with a disappointing ending.
One note:  With the exception of A TIME TO KILL, Sandra Bullock's
films since WHILE YOU WERE SLEEPING have not had much acclaim,
critically or at the box office.  In case you're counting, that's four
out of five films in the past two years.  When I say I love Sandra
Bullock, I'm forgiving several of her roles and a few of her
performances.  Unlike a lot of fanatics out there, I don't believe
she's ready to win any non-popularity-based awards just yet, but I do
think she has a certain infectious charm which is evident in
interviews and which comes through in light-hearted roles.  While I
laud her for stretching her acting skills by attempting a variety of
parts, I hope she does not stray too far from playing the kinds of
characters which caused to many people to fall in love with her in the
first place.  At any rate, I suppose I'll have to keep waiting for
that favorite film.

Title
Review for Alien: Resurrection (1997)
If you talk to some people, they'll say Ridley Scott's ALIEN was the
best of the series, which went downhill after that.  Talk to others
and they'll tell you that James Cameron's thrill-ride masterpiece,
ALIENS, was where the series peaked.  If anyone tells you ALIEN 3 was
the best of the lot, call the nearest mental hospital and tell them
you've found their missing patient.  Fans of the first two films will
invariably join forces to gang up on that installment, directed by
music video director David Fincher.  Four years have gone by since
that fiasco, but the fans' memories have not disappeared, so while the
latest movie, ALIEN RESURRECTION, is approached with high hopes, it is
also approached with a certain wariness.
Ellen Ripley (Sigourney Weaver), the glue that held the series
together, was killed off in ALIEN 3, taking her own life just as one
of those fearsome creatures came bursting out of her chest.  As she
fell toward a fiery pit of molten metal, she seemed to caress the baby
alien as her own baby, embracing the enemy which had haunted her
through six hours of cinema over fourteen years.  A little corny?
Perhaps, but it seemed a fitting closure to a series which had
garnered a lot of fans and their spending cash.  Of course, an ALIEN
movie would not be the same without the venerable Ripley, so in this
new film, they resurrect her.  Hence the name.
In ALIEN RESURRECTION, Ripley is not really Ripley, but a clone
generated a couple hundred years later from the first Ripley's own
tissue that had been saved from the planet on which she died.  The
people cloning her are from a military-business conglomerate which
hopes to use the aliens for the purposes of research and general
killing as the ultimate weapon.  This clone seems to pick up right
where the late Ripley left off, complete with gestating alien, and the
first scenes of the movie show the medical personnel aboard a gigantic
research vessel removing the baby from Ripley's chest.  Following the
operation, the host seems to be doing fine, so hey, they decide to
keep her around, too.
The research vessel is commanded by General Perez (Dan Hedaya), who
has contracted a freelance freighter crew to deliver a number of
people hijacked while in cryo-stasis, whom Dr. Wren (J.E. Freeman)
plans to use as hosts to breed more aliens.  You see, the alien taken
out of Ripley's chest is a queen and by this time is already laying
eggs.
The freighter crew is your usual band of misfits.  There's Elgyn
(Michael Wincott), the tough leader of the group, Vriess (Dominique
Pinon), Elgyn's lover and first mate of the freighter, Johner (Ron
Pearlman), the all brawn, no brain type, Christie (Gary Dourdan), the
techno-wiz, and Hilliard (Kim Flowers), who doesn't seem to be part of
the crew for any other reason than he's in a wheelchair and therefore
adds a little color to the group.  Then there's Annalee Call (Winona
Ryder), another member of the group who's apparently just tagging
along for reasons which aren't really explained (until later, but
those motivations apparently weren't revealed to the crew before she
was taken on board).  These people react to their surroundings with
the predictable suspicion of authority, and of course there's the
compulsory scene where one of the visiting crew finds the supply room
and loots it.  There's really not much we haven't seen before, and you
can almost pick out the characters who are going to die within the
first hour of the film.
And die they do.  Pretty soon the baby aliens are full grown and find
a particularly ingenious way of escaping their confines.  Shortly
thereafter, they are up to their usual mischief, killing here,
snatching there, and overall looking really mean.  So of course it's
up to Ripley to save the survivors by leading them to their only means
of escape, the freighter on which our rag tag band arrived.  I think
it would have been cute for director Jean-Pierre Jeunet to have paid
an homage to STAR WARS and have Ripley say, ala Princess Leia, "You
came in that thing?  You're braver than I thought."  At least that
would have been unexpected.
ALIEN RESURRECTION contains a whole bunch of things you just knew were
going to happen, because you've seen it happen in the previous films.
>From these re-treads you can publish a doctrine on what not to do when
there are aliens on your spaceship:  1) Don't go looking into holes
made by the aliens.  They will probably grab you from their hiding
place just to the side of the hole.  2) If you find some goo on the
floor, don't spend time staring at it and going, "Ewww."  Instead, run
away fast.  There's an alien nearby.  3) Don't walk on floor gratings;
only walk on solid floors.  With gratings, an alien is probably
looking at you from below and will pull the gratings away and grab you
from underneath.  4) Always assume the alien is right behind you.  The
moment you think it's not there, it will come out of the darkness,
hiss at you, and bite your head.
Most of the performances turned in by the cast are pretty
two-dimensional, but it's not really the fault of the actors, given
what they had to work with.  Most of the characters are paper thin and
just fill up slots, with only Winona Ryder given the slightest chance
to exercise any real acting ability.  Even then, her character's
catharsis is decidedly forced, since the reason for her being on the
ship are justified only by a flimsy motivation.  Sigourney Weaver,
however, gets to play her character in a different way than in
previous movies.  First, Ripley's got all the experience from dealing
with the aliens in the past, and therefore she's more intuitive with
regard to the aliens' behavior.  Second, through the cloning process,
Ripley is actually part alien, and therefore can sense where the
aliens are and even when the queen is in pain.  While intriguing, this
limits the amount of fear she has of the aliens and therefore the
amount of tension we have as an audience.  Sure, we can watch as the
other characters get frightened by the aliens, but since they have no
depth, we don't really care if they're frightened or even if they live
or die.  
The aliens themselves are the best they have ever looked, and credit
must be given to the creature crew on this one.  There are
computer-generated aliens too, and they also look a lot better than in
ALIEN 3, where shots of the CGI alien were all too fake.  One
noticeable change from the previous films is that we see the aliens
very clearly in this movie, in rooms which are decently lit.  Although
this helps to show off the wonderful alien artistry, it also somewhat
defeats the suspense generated from knowing there is something out in
the murky darkness but not being quite able to see it.  As a result,
we become so familiar with their appearances that they aren't all that
scary when they subsequently show up throughout the film.
Altogether, ALIEN RESURRECTION shows that the franchise is running out
of plot ideas, and there are only so many times you can take the same
person running from the same aliens.  While a better film than ALIEN
3, ALIEN RESURRECTION doesn't have what it takes to give the series
the shot in the arm it needs, so if there is to be a fifth movie, it's
going to have to be something really special.

Title
Review for Mortal Kombat: Annihilation (1997)
When you've run out of old TV shows to turn into movies, I guess you
try video games.  Why did I go to see MORTAL KOMBAT:  ANNIHILATION?
The quest to seek an answer to this query may prove a better movie
that the one I just saw.  This film was a bunch of fighting, yelling,
special effects, and bad acting set to an oppressive techno music
soundtrack.
The plot is fairly simple:  A portal has opened between our world and
the "Outworld", allowing evil forces commanded by Shao Kahn (Brian
Thompson) to wreak havoc and attempt to destroy humanity.  The good
guys, led by sorcerer Rayden (James Remar) and human mortal Liu Kang
(Robin Shou), must take the fight to Outworld, where the fate of both
worlds will be determined.  Here's the catch:  They must reunite
Princess Katana (Talia Soto), who's on the good side, with her
resurrected mother Queen Sindel (Musetta Vander), who's on the bad
side, for their love for each other will close the portal and ensure
humanity's safety for another generation.  How this is supposed to
work, I still have no idea, but I liked Katana's line, "I knew love
would keep us together," since that Captain and Tennille song ran
through my head and I got a good laugh.
There are some seriously stupid things in this movie.  Take, for
example, a transportation system which utilizes the "inner winds",
generated by Earth's magma flows.  You get in this metal ball which
transports you through underground tunnels really fast.  How fast? As
Katana says, "You will be moving so fast, it will be as if you are not
moving at all."  What?  Later, Sonya Blade (Sandra Hess) goes to find
Jax (Lynn "Red" Williams, otherwise known as "Saber" on TV's American
Gladiators) at a medical research facility on the island of Oahu.  How
do we know this is where she went?  There's a sign on the facility's
perimeter fence that reads:  Medical Research Facility - Oahu, Hawaii.
Remember, this is not a caption, but an actual sign.  I guess the
location is on there for all those medical researchers who keep
forgetting where they are.
There's a lot of major flipping action, too.  The first encounter
between good and evil shows Kahn and Rayden swiftly arching though the
air toward one another.  Do they land and immediately get into the
fighting?  Does one of them land first and catch the other off guard?
Do they collide in mid-air?  No, apparently they flip toward each
other so they can talk without having to yell from far away.  Why did
they need those metal balls to travel?  Everyone could have just
flipped from Point A to Point B.
I have to admit, the fight scenes are pretty good, although you can
tell they are heavily enhanced by digital effects and fly wires,
allowing the characters to surpass the limits of the human body and
the laws of physics.  The movie's thrills are derived from these
scenes and most of the audience responses are on the visceral level
when someone gets trashed really badly.  "Ouch" was the most common
expletive heard when I screened this one.  You could tell that the
filmmakers knew in advance that fights, not plot, would be the main
draw, since dialog is apparently in the film just to get from one
fight to the next.  It seems that's all there is in this movie.  Maybe
it is.
As I had mentioned, the acting is bad.  There's not one solid
performance in the film, although Williams as Jax was pretty funny.
After a fight between Sonya and one of the bad guys degenerates into
female mud wrestling, Jax says, "You look good in mud.  No, really,
you do."  Remar plays Rayden with an inconsistency which makes it hard
to take his character seriously, and Shou is relatively emotionless as
Liu Kang.  Brian Thompson, who has played good guys, bad guys, and
even an alien on TV's The X-Files, but always some muscle-bound
behemoth, is your average evil demi-god, but it's more the script's
fault than his own that he doesn't have anything original to say.
The one really impressive thing about this movie is that there is not
one swear word in the whole hour and a half.  Another thing which
should be noted is that for all its punching and kicking, blood only
appears in one scene.  All in all, MORTAL KOMBAT:  ANNIHILATION is
loud, violent, shallow, and marketed toward kids.  Hey, just like the
video game!

Title
Review for Doctor Dolittle (1998)
In the mid and late eighties, Eddie Murphy was the king of movie
comedy.  48 HOURS, TRADING PLACES, BEVERLY HILLS COP, and COMING TO
AMERICA, among others, put him firmly at the top of box office draws.
Then his career began to slide with films such as BOOMERANG,  THE
DISTINGUISHED GENTLEMAN, and A VAMPIRE IN BROOKLYN, only to revived
with the hilariously outrageous THE NUTTY PROFESSOR.  It seemed as
though Eddie was back and out for revenge.  Then he followed it up
with METRO, and the whole slide happened again.  We got films like the
despicable HOLY MAN and the subject of this review, DOCTOR DOLITTLE.
DOCTOR DOLITTLE is a remake of the 1967 Rex Harrison musical in which
Dr. John Dolittle has the uncanny ability to talk to the animals.  In
this 1998 version, Eddie Murphy plays the title character, this time a
family man and general medical practitioner in San Francisco,
California.  His life, unlike that of the 1967 Dr. Dolittle, is
anything but fanciful.  His children are giving him the stresses that
young children do, and his practice is about to be acquired by a big
HMO.  One evening, while driving home, he nearly runs over a dog and
ends up crashing into a concrete trash can.  As the canine walks away,
however, it yells an insult at Dolittle in what appears to be perfect
English.  So resurfaces Dolittle's ability to speak to and understand
the language of animals, which he repressed for decades following a
traumatic event with his childhood pet dog.
A main difference between this version and the one from 1967 is that
the communication between the Murphy Dolittle and the animals is in
English, whereas the Harrison Dolittle communicated in animal noises.
This allows the animals to be quite a bit more humanized as we hear
what they are saying, but it also degenerates the film into a one-joke
prospect, as nearly all the humor comes from listening to a dog talk
about the way the vet takes his temperature or a horse talk about his
bad eyesight, for example.  It also upstages Murphy, who is
comedically relegated to facilitating the appearance of one animal to
the next.  At least that's the way it seems, since his contributions
are not all that funny.  The rest of the humor in the film revolves
around Dolittle's attempts to reconcile the fact that his ability to
understand animals as a child was not just a fantasy after all, and
his equally daunting task of convincing others that he's not crazy.
Unfortunately, Murphy's reactions to hearing animals talk largely
consists of him screaming in surprise, and the strange looks he gets
from people around him aren't new enough to elicit many viewer laughs.
One thing I wasn't sure of when it came to talking to the animals was
whether or not Dolittle were actually speaking to them in English or
if we were listening to a translation of his barking at dogs and
hooting at owls.  The confusion arises when his wife (Kristen Wilson)
catches him talking to his dog Lucky (voiced by Norm Macdonald), and
says, "You were barking," even though we only hear him talking.  At
other times, however, Dolittle is caught talking to an animal, and a
passerby obviously hears what he's saying.  This might be a little
nitpicky, but it's enough to distract.
Both real and fake animals were used in filming this movie, the latter
provided by Jim Hensen's Creature Studio, the same award-winning folks
who gave us the animatronic characters in BABE and it's less-acclaimed
sequel.  The Hensen legacy lives on in the wonderfully lifelike
appearance of the talking creatures, but if you've seen BABE, you've
pretty much seen the effects already.  There's nothing new here except
for a few different types of animals, really, and at this point it's
only enough to serve a function, not contribute substantially to the
movie as a whole.
Screenwriters Nat Mauldin and Larry Levin fashioned an uninspired
screenplay which works by the numbers.  We've got a daughter who
doesn't fit in (Kyla Pratt), a grandfather who is wiser than his son
(Ossie Davis), a greedy medical partner (Oliver Platt), a timid
medical partner (Richard Schiff), an overbearing big business guy
(Peter Boyle)....it's like a form where all you have to do is fill in
the blanks.  Everything you think is going to happen happens, and
that's all there is to it.  I wish I could say there were more, but
there just isn't.
There are a lot of cases where the comedy in DOCTOR DOLITTLE comes
close to hitting the mark, but in almost no case is it dead-on.  As a
result, we only get a steady stream of mediocre jokes and not the kind
of side-splitting humor we're used to from Eddie Murphy.  Well, I
suppose these days we're not even really used to that anymore, only
hoping for it once again.

Title
Review for Castle, The (1997/I)
Let's say you live at the end of an airport runway.  Large jetliners
continuously pass over your house, rattling your windows and allowing
few moments of peace.  Let's say the ground beneath your feet is also
contaminated with toxic substances, and high voltage power lines run
across steel towers only yards from your home.  Now let's say an
airport conglomerate wants to buy your property in order to lengthen
the runway, and offers you more than it's worth.  Wouldn't you jump in
the air and have your bags packed before you landed?  Of course you
would.
But what if this bit of land was your idea of paradise, and the house
your castle?  That's what they are to Darryl Kerrigan (Michael Caton),
and although he's happy that a multi-national corporation would like
to buy his home, sorry, it's not for sale.  Unfortunately, the
corporation wields quite a bit of influence over the Australian
government, which serves Darryl and his family with what amounts to an
eviction notice.  Not about to take this lying down, Darryl enlists
the help of his inept attorney friend Dennis Denuto (Tiriel Mora) and
makes a determined, albeit pathetic, attempt to fight back.
THE CASTLE, an Australian comedy by Rob Sitch, is perhaps one of the
simplest movies I've seen in recent memory, yet also one of the
funniest.  In fact, it is this film's reliance on simplicity which
makes it so successful.  The good guys and the bad guys are clear, the
humor is straightforward, and the storyline is as uncomplicated as it
gets.  It's the perfect setup for a relaxing, hilarious good time, and
as much as I hate to admit it, I liked the fact that I didn't have to
think all that much while watching this film.  I just sat back and
enjoyed myself.
The situation is one we've seen before:  Regular Joe fights back
against the government, or big business, or whatever.  What makes this
film different is its characters.  Darryl thinks he's got the best
life in the world - he tells his family that living next to power
lines is a constant reminder of the success of mankind, he asks who
would ever want to go out and eat in a fancy restaurant when he's got
the meat loaf feast prepared by his wife Sal (Anne Tenny), and he
swells with pride when his son Dale (Stephen Curry) digs a hole in the
yard.  Steve Kerrigan (Anthony Simcoe) constantly combs the buy and
sell ads looking for "investments" like jousting sticks and overhead
projectors, while Wayne Kerrigan is in jail, as a result of Dennis
Denuto's incompetent courtroom maneuvers.  The great thing about the
Kerrigans is that they aren't so stupid that they get annoying.
They're just a group of simpletons whose naive nature is perfectly
harmless and even endearing.  We look upon them with a little bit of
pity, but a whole lot of affection.  
Screenwriters Sitch, Santo Cilauro, Tom Gleisner, and Jane Kennedy pit
this lovable bunch of unlikely crusaders against a stoic court system
and a condescending business conglomerate, further polarizing the
extremes and deepening our feelings for the Kerrigans.  Sympathy for
their situation, the laughter they bring us, and the family's
wonderful characterization, simple as it may be, leaves us with a
degree of emotional investment that causes us to actually care about
what happens to them.  I suppose one might wonder how deep
characterization can go when your characters are as inane as the
Kerrigans, but trust me, it works.
I particularly noted that the writers did not have to use slapstick in
order to get laughs.  Don't get me wrong - slapstick, when executed
well, can be genius.  It's just that too often, a film will resort to
it's use as a shortcut to amusing the audience, not always
successfully.  Instead, the jokes in THE CASTLE are all hinged upon
the dialog uttered by these people who have no idea that they are
totally skewed to the rest of the world.  When they are by themselves,
the are funny, and when they are with normal people, they are
hilarious.
One of the few problems I saw with this film was a detour taken about
midway though.  The Kerrigans go out to a vacation spot for seemingly
no reason other than to pack in a few more jokes and increase the
film's running time.  Luckily, it's a funny little detour that, while
slightly distracting from the film's main drive, is still quite
enjoyable.
With all the levity abound in THE CASTLE, the film still manages to
take on a pretty heavy concept, that of the innate right of a citizen
to keep his property, an issue which has been bandied about in courts
across the civilized world with differing outcomes.  I'm not certain
the courtroom monologue near the end of the film would actually hold
up in real life, but it brings to the forefront the essence of the
constitution (of Australia) and certainly sounds impressive at any
rate.  And, for that matter, it's more than I would have expected out
of a light hearted film like this.

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
The opening crawl tells us that the galaxy is in turmoil over the
taxation of trade routes, and the greedy Trade Federation has used
it's armada of powerful space battleships to blockade the planet
Naboo.  We soon find that the Federation plans to invade the planet
with an enormous army of warrior robots and force Naboo's ruler, the
young Queen Amidala (Natalie Portman) to sign a treaty giving the
Federation control.  However, the galactic Republic has sent Jedi
Knights Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson) and Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor)
as emissaries to the Federation in order to negotiate for the ending
of the blockade.  No sooner do they arrive than the Federation leaders
are instructed via holographic transmission by a mysterious cloaked
figure to destroy the Jedi, and the first battle begins.
It seems that for me and thousands of people like me, the love for
George Lucas's trilogy of  STAR WARS movies has only grown over time.
We're the fans, not the freaks.  We won't go dressing up like Darth
Vader (although you have to admit those Imperial uniforms are pretty
darn cool), and we won't incorporate lines from the script in our
everyday conversations (not all the time, anyway), but if someone
wants to challenge us to a little trivia contest, we're throwing down.
All right, stop looking at me like that.
We have been faithfully and patiently waiting.  Waiting for this movie
ever since the end credits of RETURN OF THE JEDI started to roll.  You
see, The Trilogy is not just a set of movies, but a religion of sorts
to we, the faithful disciples, and THE PHANTOM MENACE is tantamount to
the second coming of the Messiah.
Unfortunately, it is not Our Savior.  For weeks beforehand, I was
going around telling people that this movie had better be damned good
- stupendously good - miraculously good.  Anything less and it'll be
the biggest disappointment of the century.  I didn't want the
doomsaying prophecy to come true, really I didn't, but this film
nevertheless fails to reach the pinnacles of filmmaking.
Character development is virtually nonexistent.  With the possible
exception of Qui-Gon, most of the film's characters seem left with
nothing to do but go through the motions.  None seem very affected by
their experiences, and few even show any passion at all.  Contrast
this with the horribly irritating comic relief we are nearly
continuously subjected to in the form of Jar Jar Binks, a creature
belonging to a race which lives in underwater cities on Naboo, in
precarious symbiosis with the land dwellers led by Amidala.  Jar Jar's
life is saved by Qui-Gon early in the film, and travels with our
heroes for the sole reason of making us laugh (or supposedly so).  His
speech mannerisms are so "cute-ified" that I couldn't understand a
third of what he was saying, and the slapstick he performed was just
distracting.  His head gets caught in an electronic field, his foot
gets caught in the stirrup of some large beast, he describes being in
trouble as "deep doo doo," and even manages to step in some of the
same while walking around in Mos Eisley Spaceport.  Therein lies a key
difference between this film and one of its predecessors.  In STAR
WARS, we had Obi-Wan telling us Mos Eisley was a "wretched hive of
scum and villainy."  In THE PHANTOM MENACE, we get doo doo.
The films of The Trilogy took me away from my everyday life and
immersed me in a story "A long time ago in a galaxy far, far away...."
This film, on the other hand, constantly reminds me that it's only a
movie by including situations and phrases that are so uniquely modern
American that they seem incredibly out of place and serve to jerk the
viewer from the experience.  Perhaps the most blatant offense occurs
during a scene where young Anakin Skywalker enters into a pod racing
competition (it's kind of like chariot racing with large engines
instead of horses), and there are a couple of commentators in a press
box delivering Indy 500-like play by play.  I liked the pod race; it
was really exciting and ratcheted the tension, but when the heck did
Lucas think up the idea of putting in the sportscasters?  The race
would have been even more exciting without the distraction.  This
aspect, coupled with the emphasis on humor simply baffled me.  I
suppose one may say that Lucas was trying to appeal to the younger
viewer, but would more intelligent scenes and dialog hurt this appeal
at all?  Didn't millions of youngsters still go back to see the
original STAR WARS in 1977 over and over again?  Didn't the action
figures still sell like hotcakes?  Of course they did, and it's only
poor judgment that allows the most-eagerly awaited film in history to
be marred by pandering to children who would still have enjoyed a film
with more appeal for adults.
One aspect that will appeal broadly, however, is the use of special
effects.  The people at Lucas's Industrial Light and Magic, the
world's premiere effects house, outdid themselves in providing
seamless integration of computer-generated images and real-life
footage.  Some of the scenes have to be seen to be believed,
especially the shots of a land battle between the Federation's robot
army and Jar Jar's countrymen.  The space battles are also impressive,
although improved over past efforts by only subtle margins to the
casual observer.  This, however, is a testament to the work which ILM
produced two decades ago and still holds up well today.
John Williams is back, of course, providing a score for the film as
only he can.  His music is pervasive throughout, as rousing and as
dramatic as ever, always serving to punctuate scenes noticeably and
appropriately.
Since this film is supposed to be the first installment in a
nine-episode story (STAR WARS, THE EMPIRE STRIKES BACK and RETURN OF
THE JEDI being episodes four, five and six, respectively), THE PHANTOM
MENACE has the daunting task of setting up the origins of several
characters we know already, in addition to those with whom we
unfamiliar.  As a result, attention to history and characterization
was spread a little thin.  It would have been nice to get more in
depth with Yoda and Obi-Wan, for example, but given the fact that
there were several new characters to cover, it is understandable that
some of the development has been left for the next two films.
One of the new characters is Darth Maul, hailed as the new villain
with as much hype as marketing forces could muster prior to this
film's release.  In spite of the hype, Darth Maul is a character which
almost didn't have to be in the film, his role is so insignificant.
He has maybe three spoken lines (believe it or not, a second actor
voices the character) and the rest of the time just scowls and looks
mean.  With that working against him, he never has a chance at being
interesting and instead ends up an utter disappointment.
Lucas seems to have wanted to develop the spiritual nature of the STAR
WARS universe, something which has been prominent throughout.
However, he does so largely by paralleling the STAR WARS spirituality
with the bible, offering an easy out for story-writing and once again
bringing the viewer back to planet Earth with a real-life connection.
Oddly, while trying to capitalize on spirituality, Lucas at the same
time introduces the fact that mastery of The Force is dependent upon
having little Force-loving parasites in your body's cells.  This only
serves to de-mystify the workings of The Force a few notches by
offering a scientific connection.
Don't let me mislead you too far.  THE PHANTOM MENACE, by most
standards, is a good film.  It contains a lot of visual treats, sets
the stage for an epic story, gives us a bit of excitement here and
there, and even allows us to revisit some of our old friends.  It's
just that when held up to it's predecessors (and to not do so would be
unrealistic), this film simply pales.

Title
Review for Dirty Work (1998)
Bob Saget's DIRTY WORK is no masterpiece of filmmaking, but it kept me
laughing at a rate more constant than anything I've seen lately.  Some
of the jokes had me nearly doubled over while others merely provoked
chuckles, but they kept coming one after the other.
The film is about Mitch (Norm Macdonald) and Sam (Artie Lange), two
childhood friends who have always had a particular knack for getting
even with those who've crossed them.  "Don't take any crap from
anybody" is their motto.  In grade school they framed the school bully
by hiding guns in his desk.  In high school they got back at the
ticket-happy meter maid by stuffing her car engine with popcorn.  Now
all grown up, but still not mature, reality hits them in the face when
Sam's father, Pops (Jack Warden), suffers a heart attack and is put in
the hospital.  The hospital's Dr. Farthing (Chevy Chase) tells the
boys that Pops will die unless he gets a heart transplant, but due to
Pops's old age, he's not a priority on the donor list.  However, Dr.
Farthing is deeply in debt to some bookies due to a history of failed
wagers including a bet on Mr. T to win in ROCKY III.  If Mitch and Sam
can come up with $50,000 in two weeks, the good doctor can pay off his
debts and will make sure Pops gets his heart.
Jobless, Mitch and Sam try to think of ways to earn the money quickly.
"We have to think of something no one has done before," says Mitch.
"Like the guy who first thought of delivering pizza to people's
houses.  Or the guy who invented crack."  After the employees of the
local movie theater pay the boys to pull a prank on their sadistic
boss (Don Rickles),  Mitch and Sam decide to take their hobby to the
next level and open a revenge-for-hire business.
Whether or not you will like this film is almost totally dependent
upon whether or not you like Norm Macdonald.  The former Saturday
Night Live newscaster delivers his lines with a sarcastic tone that
makes most of his humor of the one-joke variety, but for me it almost
never fails.  Then again, I also think Bob Saget is a funny guy.
Please forgive me.
Although Macdonald's demeanor and delivery doesn't really make him a
convincing actor, and he more or less stumbles his way from one scene
to the next (like a comedian trying to star in a movie), the stuff he
says is just hilarious.  I mean, you've got to love a guy who tries to
get away with saying this to his irate girlfriend:  "Maybe you'll feel
better after we have some dirty sex."
In going through the motions to make a movie rather than a series of
sketches, the filmmakers added a plot involving a love interest
(Traylor Howard) and an unscrupulous real estate mogul (Christopher
McDonald).  None of the storyline is standout, and you don't really
ever get involved in the emotional aspects of the forced romance.
There's no significant feel-good payoff in the end, and there's no
real message conveyed, but DIRTY WORK seems to be more a showcase for
Macdonald's comedic talent than anything else.  In this respect, the
movie clicks.  DIRTY WORK doesn't aim very high to begin with, and
ends up being right about where it wants to be.  There's got to be
something said about achieving your goals.

Title
Review for Practical Magic (1998)
I so much wanted to like this movie.  I so much wanted to love this movie.
I so much wanted to embrace this movie with both arms and once again be able
to hold my head up high when I say, "I just can't get enough of Sandra
Bullock."  These days, I have a difficult time convincing even myself of this.
Sandra, Sandra, Sandra.  What happened?  You used to be America's
sweetheart, now you can't make a truly good movie to save your life.  With
the possible exception of A TIME TO KILL, the last two and a half years have
not been kind.  If your next one is a critical as well as box office hit, it
will be called your comeback.  No Oscars, no Golden Globes, not even a
stupid Blockbuster Award look near in your future.  Excuse me while I shed a
tear.
It would be easier if I could say that you've just had a run of bad luck,
but I can't.  You've chosen the scripts yourself.  The last two movies were
even co-produced by Fortis Films, your very own production company.  Oh,
woe!  Oh woe!  Such is the man....who longs once more to be a fan!
Okay, I'll admit that was a tad melodramatic, but unfortunately, PRACTICAL
MAGIC really is only the latest in a string of mediocre movies for Sandra
Bullock.  This one finds her playing Sally Owens, a witch.  No, a real
witch.  Able to cast spells and all that stuff.  She and her sister, Gillian
(Nicole Kidman) were orphaned at a young age when their mortal father fell
victim to the Owens family curse.  You see, whoever falls in love with an
Owens woman (and they're all witches) is doomed to die.  Their mother died
soon afterwards of a broken heart (oh, please), and the girls are raised by
their aunts, who, besides eat chocolate for breakfast, don't care about
homework, and don't impose a bedtime, also openly practice  witchcraft.
Repulsed by the idea that love could cause such sorrow, Sally wishes for a
man who could never exist, so she could never be so enamored and therefore
never know such pain. Years later, however, Sally falls in love, gets
married, has two darling little daughters, and seems to live the ideal life.
But then, of course, the 'ol curse kicks in and the husband dies in one of
the most predictable surprises in a screenwriter's bag of tricks (if we
could figuratively see the truck coming, he should have seen it literally).
Sally learns that the impetus for her love was not natural, but rather a
spell cast by her aunts to give her that little "push."  Aghast that it was
magic that caused her such misery, she disavows witchcraft and attempts to
lead a normal life.
The scenes in the beginning with Sally and Gillian ("Gillybean," as Sally
insists on calling her throughout the movie) as little girls is kind of
cute, I'll admit, as are the scenes of Sally living the happy, married,
motherly life.  However, this stuff takes up about the first half hour, and
is interspersed with narrative exposition.  Ironically, the filmmakers
wanted to fast forward through adolescence and part of adulthood, but took
so much time doing so that it seems as if we're waiting forever to get on
with the rest of the film.  Not a good start.
The film seems to lose, regain, then lose focus throughout the course of
it's two-hour running time.  I wasn't sure whether the film was supposed to
be about love, about the supernatural, or a combination of the two.  I would
take a stab and say a combination, but it's a pretty poor one, not being
able to effectively intertwine the two motifs.  "Bewitched" was even better
than this.  Is witchcraft and love supposed to go together?  Are they
supposed to exist separately?  Is love a certain witchcraft of its own?
These are the kinds of questions which are alluded to, but never explored
and never answered.  The screenplay by Robin Swicord, Akiva Goldsman and
Adam Brooks seems content to throw things out and then never get around to
tending to them.  At one point, for example, one of the aunts takes money
from a woman desperate to get a man to love her.  The aunt says, "Be careful
what you wish for," and proceeds to cast a spell.  Yes, it's trite, but if
this isn't made into a theme for the movie, why even include the line in the
first place?
Did I go to see a movie, or a two-hour music video?  This was a question I
asked myself somewhere around the halfway mark after seeing the start of
just about every other scene punctuated by an obtrusively loud pop song.
What's worse, the movie includes the obligatory set piece where the
soundtrack is actually a part of the scene.  Oh, you've seen it before.
Think Tom Cruise dancing around in his underwear in RISKY BUSINESS.  Think
Tom Cruise swinging a cue stick around in THE COLOR OF MONEY.  Think Tom
Cruise slinging drinks in COCKTAIL.  Hey, isn't Nicole Kidman married to Tom
Cruise?  Bet they've got a serious stereo in the living room to score their
home life.
For most of the movie, magic is very low-key.  So low-key in fact, that one
wonders if the magic is actually supposed to be real, or just David
Copperfield illusions that the Owens women have learned.  Well, maybe more
like Doug Henning.  About the biggest trick we see is a coffee spoon
stirring by itself.  Oh, wow.  Okay, I guess more like that magician that
goes from table to table at T.G.I. Fridays.  You know, the one you want to
ask, "If I give you a dollar, will you go away?"  Anyway, the magic is so
unimpressive and so seldom in occurrence that you quickly forget that the
word "magic" is actually in the title of the film.  Then something really
big and laden with special effects happens, and it seems totally out of
place because we're so unprepared for it.  Don't even get me started on the
ending, which is resolved with so little explanation that it seems it was
thought up by someone in the last hours of a term paper all-niter who made
his mandatory word count and just wants to finish it up and turn it in.  He
knows he's going to get a D anyway.
There are a couple of things that save this film from the level of drivel.
First is the acting.  For all their differences, Bullock and Kidman actually
have some pretty decent sisterly chemistry.  Aidan Quinn, who appears upon
the scene as Sally's second love interest, is good as usual, and Dianne
Wiest and Stockard Channing are particularly delightful as the Owens aunts.
Secondly, for all its plodding pace and nonsensical scenes, the film manages
to pull off some entertaining moments and give us a few nice visuals.  It's
just too bad they're too few are far between.
As for you, Sandra, please pick some better scripts.  I've promised to wait
for you to come back to the world of the watchable, but a man can only be so
patient.

Title
Review for House of Yes, The (1997)
I must admit that I've never understood the fixation that many people have
with the Kennedys.  Sure, one can point out a number of positive things JFK
achieved during his presidency, but if you study history, you'll also find
that he was quite an opportunist, pumping the nation full of such rhetoric
as to fuel the Cold War and send the country's young men down a path that
led deep into the jungles of Vietnam and Cambodia, all in the name of going
anywhere and fighting any fight, apparently with little regard to the real
elements of national security, or the real meaning of honor.  The man took
risks like approving the poorly-planned and disaster-ridden Bay of Pigs
invasion (Kennedy served in the South Pacific as a PT Boat commander during
World War II, yet consented to an amphibious landing that benefited from no
air support).  He took the nation to the brink of nuclear holocaust one
October in the biggest gamble this nation has ever waged.  I therefore found
it very difficult to get into a movie where the main character is
preoccupied with the lives of John F. and Jacqueline Kennedy.  However, it
was somewhat comforting to know that this character is also supposed to be
insane.
THE HOUSE OF YES is a comedy which starts out with that television special
from the early 60's where Jackie Kennedy takes the nation on a tour of the
White House, intercut with a home movie from the early 70's with a young
girl dressed up as the first lady, taking the viewer on a tour of her own
mansion.  We are then brought to the present day, and are introduced to that
young girl, now grown up, and we find that she has gotten her family to call
her Jackie-O.  We are also told by her narrative voice that at the age of
14, she went to a costume party in a replication of the famous pink dress
Mrs. Kennedy wore on that fateful day in Dallas, covered with ketchup for
blood and macaroni for brains.  Very disturbing.
Jackie-O (Parker Posey) is indeed certifiable.  She has spent time in a
mental institution and is on a string of medications.  When her twin brother
Marty (Josh Hamilton), now living in New York, comes home to the family's
Washington D.C. mansion for Thanksgiving dinner and brings his new fiancee,
Lesly (Tori Spelling), Jackie-O goes absolutely ballistic.  Within minutes,
it seems that Jackie-O, her mother (Genevieve Bujold), and her younger
brother Anthony (Freddie Prinze, Jr.) are all trying to break up the happy
couple.  Why?  And why is Jackie-O so enamored with Jackie O.?  The answer
lies in more than one family secret.
One of the first mental notes I took upon viewing THE HOUSE OF YES was that
the dialogue is hilarious, but sounds like it was meant for the stage.
Delivery, wordplay; it's all much like musical theater in between the songs,
or perhaps Shakespearean comedy.  I later found out that this film is, in
fact, based upon a play by Wendy McLeod.  Where it was performed or how well
it did, I have no idea.  Director Mark Waters clearly wanted to translate
that feel directly to film, and it's a bit off-putting at first.  However,
you quickly get used to it and can enjoy the rest of the film, which is
actually quite funny.
The problem is that the movie is also very predictable.  Inside of the first
ten minutes, you're able to put in a good guess as to what both the primary
and secondary family secrets are.  Sure, the dialogue still makes the film
enjoyable, but mostly you're just watching the mechanics as it gets to where
you know it's going in the first place.  As the movie progresses, precious
little additional information is revealed about each of the characters.  A
little more character development would also have really helped.  There are
also moments in this film that are so done up with music and slow motion
that you get the feeling that Waters wants to make you believe you're
witness to something profound.  It is at these times that the film simply
takes itself too seriously.
One of the things this film does well is depict alienation.  Anthony is the
little brother who seems to get kicked around and has spent most of his life
trying to keep up with his siblings.  He gets told what to do by everyone in
the house, and try as he might to rectify the situation, he's still low man
on the totem pole.  Lesly, trying to make a good impression, is only
rejected by Jackie-O and her mother for reasons obscure to her until the
very end.  Even Marty, mindful at first of her feelings, soon becomes party
to her persecution as an outsider.  A scene where Lesly terribly plays a
chopsticks piano duet with Marty, and is then "shown how it's done" by
Jackie-O as she sidles up next to her brother on the piano bench, is
heart-wrenching.
Ultimately, however, it's the acting in THE HOUSE OF YES that really stands
out.  The cast is admittedly small, but all five actors deliver exceptional
performances.  Parker Posey is being hailed as the queen of independent
films, and it's no wonder.  She's acted in nearly two dozen of them, and has
effectively portrayed a wide variety of characters, displaying an impressive
range and competence not found in the majority of Hollywood newcomers (or
big names, for that matter).  In this film, she's really got the polish on,
doing an incredible job as the always-on-the-edge Jackie-O.  One minute she
seems sweet as sugar, the next she's being caustically sarcastic, and then
she's suddenly flipping out like a nutcase - and it's all totally convincing
as well as a pleasure to watch.
Freddie Prinze, Jr. does a nice job playing the little brother who seems to
get kicked around and has spent most of his life trying to keep up with his
siblings.  Genevieve Bujold is also apt at playing the mother who is
disapproving of anything outside of her own family.  Josh Hamilton as Marty
interacts well with all the characters, perhaps since his is the most normal
in the film, and is the one with which we most identify.  Most surprising,
however, is Tori Spelling.  I've never really liked her in anything, largely
because it seems she plays the same character so often (or maybe it's the
same character I keep seeing - how long was she on 90210, anyway?), but here
she actually impressed me with her performance as a girl from humble roots
who, in spite of her vacuous persona, still has more substance than everyone
in Jackie-O's household combined.  My opinion of her improved considerably
after viewing this film.
Although THE HOUSE OF YES is laden with an imbalance between its acting
talent on the one hand, and it's direction and scripting on the other, it's
still an enjoyable film, as the former kind of makes up for the latter.
However, I kept getting the feeling that with a more fleshed-out screenplay,
this film could have been something really great.

Title
Review for Hamlet (1996)
Shakespeare.  You hardly understood it in high school.  Why would you want
more of it now that your English grade doesn't count on it?  If this is your
attitude, then I'll say right off the bat that Kenneth Branagh's HAMLET is
probably not for you, and you might as well stop reading right now.  If,
however, you are a lover of The Bard, or at the very least are open-minded
about a challenging script, read on, for there is something rotten in the
state of Denmark.
Namely, the king has died, and his widow the queen has wed the king's
brother, Claudius, but prince Hamlet suspects foul play.  His suspicions are
confirmed when the ghost of his father appears and relates the story of his
murder at his own brother's hands.  Hamlet, enlisting the help of his friend
Horatio, conspires to capture the conscience of the new king to expose his
treachery....and the game is afoot....
The first things you notice about this production are the sets and costumes.
With external scenes filmed at Blemheim Palace in England (also the one of
the sites for the recent THE AVENGERS), the grandiose quality of the setting
is immediately established.  Interior scenes are similarly graced with
intricate and flamboyant rooms and chambers.  The Hamlet Castle's grand
throne room is an impressive piece of work incorporating high ceilings,
mirror-panel doors, and bridges which connect opposite sides of a
second-story loft.  Costuming is equally grand, drawing upon both history
and imagination..  Not quite the Denmark of the 1600's, the characters'
attire is something of a cross between that era and turn of the century
Russia, very effectively giving the film more of a timeless feel.  It is not
surprising that Tim Harvey and Alexandra Byrne were nominated for Best Art
Direction and Best Costume Design Oscars, respectively.
In addition to directing, Kenneth Branagh also plays the title character.
As the revenge-driven royal heir, Branagh provides a riveting performance of
emotional highs and lows.  From the anticipation of seeing his father's
ghost, to the melancholy of finding the burial site of his childhood jester,
to his eventual wrath, Branagh delivers in spades.  Every scene truly
revolves around Hamlet, as much a tribute to Branagh's acting and directing
as to Shakespeare's manuscript.
HAMLET seems to be a who's who of Shakespearean-trained actors, so watching
them perform the craft for which they have much love is a delight in itself.
Julie Christie, as Hamlet's mother Gertrude, and Derek Jacobi as his
murderous uncle Claudius both fill the classic roles superbly, as do many of
the supporting players.  Kate Winslet as Hamlet's lover Ophelia, does an
outstanding job demonstrating the character's plummet to the depths of
dispair and madness.  Richard Briers as Ophelia's father, Polonius, and
Michael Moloney as her brother, Laertes, are equally convincing.  Nicholas
Farrell as Hamlet's trusted friend Horatio, and Timothy Spall and Reece
Dinsdale as the two-timing Rosencrantz and Guildenstern round out the
excellent core cast.
HAMLET also seems to be a film in which someone tried to stuff as many well
known actors as possible.  In some cases, this made for interesting scenes.
Billy Crystal is surprisingly good as the gravedigger who unearths the skull
of Yorick, whom Hamlet knew quite well.  Crystal proves himself able to
deliver the lines with both the timing of a classic actor and the verbal
countenance of a comedian, and the result is a very funny scene.  However,
Charleton Heston, whom many might think would butcher Shakespeare, is the
biggest surprise of all.  As the Player King, the leader of a troupe of
traveling actors, he is absolutely breathtaking when narrating the story of
Priam and Hecuba.  Part of his monologue is overlaid with a visual enactment
of the story (with Sir John Gielgud and Judi Dench), but this is most
unfortunate, for it robs Heston of some of the attention which he deserves
at this time.  His off-camera speaking, while gripping, sort of downplays
the scene to a narration done by any other well-voiced actor.  I wish
Branagh had chosen to allow us to envision in our own minds the scene which
Heston lays out, and let the venerable actor have the attention.
Unfortunately, there were some casting choices which led to poor
distractions.  Jack Lemmon, an excellent actor, just can't do Shakespeare.
As Marcellus, the guard who sees the elder Hamlet's ghost, Lemmon sadly
underperforms and is shown up left and right by those around him.  Gerard
Depardieu, another talented actor, is wasted when given little more than the
utterances of "yes, my lord" and "no, my lord" in the role of Reynaldo.
Richard Attenborough has a (literally) walk-on role, showing up at the
eleventh hour as the English Ambassador.  I think he had two lines.  Then
there is Rufus Sewell as Fortinbras of Norway.  When I went to see DANGEROUS
BEAUTY earlier this year, two ladies behind me kept commenting about how
handsome he was.  If bulging eyes are your idea of handsome, well I guess
comic actor Marty Feldman was some kind of sex symbol to you.
HAMLET is a complicated tale of treachery and revenge in which triumph and
defeat become one.  Branagh attempts to help us out with some of the
intricacies by visually representing some of the more elusive stretches of
dialogue by presenting them as flashback-type images.  This only works about
half the time, and I wonder if it would have been just as well to do without
them.  You don't have to be some kind of genius to appreciate Shakespeare,
but it is quite difficult to understand unless you have the time to read or
hear it carefully and repeatedly.  The alternate method of comprehension is
that with which most of us are familiar, the high school English course.  In
it, you are hopefully fortunate enough to have an educator willing to help
you with the plot points and nuances essential to understanding a play
written in the rigmarole known as the King's English.  Or I suppose you
could just read the Cliff Notes.

Title
Review for Jackie Brown (1997)
JACKIE BROWN entered theaters with little fanfare and a lot of
expectation.  Even though advance publicity on this one was fairly
limited, the audiences waited for the showings with heightened
anticipation.  This is, after all, the first movie Quentin Tarantino
has directed since the highly touted PULP FICTION.  To say he has been
inactive in between would be to tell a falsehood, since he has been
involved in such projects as DESTINY TURNS ON THE RADIO, DESPERADO,
FOUR ROOMS, and FROM DUSK 'TIL DAWN.  He was also called in at the
last minute to help punch up the screenplay for CRIMSON TIDE.  (I'm
willing to wager the debate over which Silver Surfer is the only true
Silver Surfer was penned by him.)  Tarantino contributed on and off
screen to these films, but never took the director's helm.  Nearly
four years since gaining notoriety on the Hollywood scene and making
John Travolta a star once more, Tarantino returns with a film he can
call his own.
The film opens up with an homage to THE GRADUATE, with Jackie Brown
(Pam Grier) on one of those airport people movers as the credits are
displayed in front of her.  Jackie is a flight attendant for Air Cabo,
which flies back and fourth between Los Angeles and Cabo San Lucas.
This makes Jackie a convenient cash courier for gun dealer Ordell
Robbi (Samuel L. Jackson) who is currently keeping his money stashed
in Mexico.  However, while bringing fifty thousand dollars back into
the U.S. for Ordell, Jackie is apprehended by FBI agent Mark Dargus
(Michael Bowen) and ATF agent Ray Nicolet (Michael Keaton), who catch
her not only with the money, but with a bonus of a couple of ounces of
illicit drugs.  Jackie didn't know they were in the package with the
cash, but that's of no consequence to the authorities, who threaten
Jackie with a couple of years hard time if convicted.  Of course,
Dargus and Nicolet are just using the sentence to get Jackie to turn
over the big fish, Ordell.
Ordell uses honest bail bondsman Max Cherry (Robert Forster) to get
Jackie out of jail, but while Max is immediately attracted to her,
Jackie is more concerned about her immediate safety, since Ordell
killed the last one of his operatives who got picked up by the police.
Sure enough, Ordell shows up at Jackie's apartment that evening and
tries to silence Jackie for good, but she "borrows" Max's pistol and
manages to turn the tables on Ordell.  Instead of closing the irony
circle and relocating a bullet from the pistol's chamber to Ordell's
head, Jackie proposes a deal.  Since Ordell wants to get his money out
of Mexico, Jackie will get back up to her old tricks and be a courier
for him once more, but this time for a more substantial fee:  Fifteen
percent of Ordell's half million dollars.  With a gun in his face, how
can Ordell not agree?
By itself, this premise might have been interesting enough to carry
the film.  However, we are also introduced to a number of double
crosses which make us pay attention and think.  Jackie claims to be
bringing the money in for Ordell, but she's also making a deal with
the feds as well as with Max.  The film throws us off every once in a
while by leading us to believe the deal we thought was authentic is
actually a sham, but it is in no way done to the extent that we feel
jerked around.  Instead, it's actually a nice departure from the
predictability which is prevalent in so many of today's movies.  At
least this film has a little imagination.
Most of the performances in JACKIE BROWN are above par.  Pam Grier, of
whom I had never taken notice before, plays Jackie with a mix of
confidence and vulnerability which makes her character believable.
Samuel L. Jackson has a kind of mesmerizing quality about him as he
handles himself in situations where you know he is in total control.
Robert Forster is thoroughly likable because he comes across as such
an honest guy, trying to do his best..  Never mind that he belongs to
a profession where sneaking into a guy's apartment to zap him with a
stun gun is simply a matter of course.  He's just so down-to-earth,
the nature of his job really doesn't occur to us, even when we're
shown him bringing a handcuffed woman to prison, or when we see the
tools of his trade.
In supporting roles are Robert De Niro as Louis Gara, a recently
paroled friend of Ordell's, and Bridget Fonda as Melanie, one of the
girls Ordell keeps around town.  Unfortunately, De Niro is basically
wasted as his lines are few and far between, and then they are mostly
clipped sentences.  In this film, he's not really De Niro, but
STEREOTYPICAL De Niro, uttering things like, "Little bit," and "Pretty
much."  Fonda, on the other hand, plays the slightly spaced-out
Melanie with satisfactory relish and cuteness, such that even when she
is annoying Louis, we are taking her side.
As is characteristic of any film in which Tarantino has had a hand,
the dialog is quick and snappy.  It grabs our attention and is
actually interesting, and in many respects, this makes JACKIE BROWN a
film which needs few visuals; the lines are a form of art in and
amongst themselves.  Don't count Tarantino out when it comes to using
the camera, however.  There's a scene where Max is unwittingly
watching a dry run of a money exchange, and he's not really sure
what's happening, but by composing the scene just so, his realization
of what's going on is felt simultaneously by the audience.  We look at
the screen and think, "Gee, that's clever," and then think the same
thing about how the film induced us into that wonderful feeling of
catching on.
Although Tarantino isn't afraid to drag out a shot for dramatic
effect, it unfortunately works to varying degrees in this film.  There
are shots where a character is simply driving, and we watch this
person and somehow get an idea of what is going on in his or her head.
This is a tribute to both direction and acting.  However, there is at
least one other scene where we follow Jackie through a mall, and she
is looking for something; desperately looking for something.  We get
the idea of the frantic nature of her search, but we follow her for so
long that we end up not really caring about what she's looking for,
but instead hoping she'll just stop.
Overall, viewing JACKIE BROWN is time spent well.  Some flap has
already been made about the language used in the film, but it's really
not much worse than many of the other movies out there today.  In
fact, one might even be able to say that the way in which these
"offensive" words are employed almost cause them to parody themselves
and therefore transcend their own offensiveness.  Go see the film and
see what I mean.

Title
Review for Tarzan (1999)
"You'll go ape over TARZAN because it's more fun than a barrel of
monkeys!"  Okay, there's the quote in case Disney wants to put
something in their ads for the movie.
Disney's latest animated feature throws us right into the action from
the very beginning, skipping the usual main title sequence and putting
us on pitching waves as a small family attempts to escape from a
sinking ship.  Father, mother, and infant somehow make it to shore
amidst a rousing song by Phil Collins, and have soon built a treehouse
which would impress the Swiss Family Robinson.  It's amazing, the
kinds of things you can do when you work to a soundtrack.  Before you
know it, an unfortunate set of circumstances put the baby in the hands
of Kala (Glenn Close), a mother ape who recently lost her own baby to
a predatory leopard.  Against the wishes of her mate and family
leader, Kerchak (Lance Henricksen), she takes on the infant boy as her
own.
TARZAN is not so much a story about a human boy surviving in the
African jungles as it is about one who does not really fit in either
humanity or the wild. Much of Tarzan's young life is spent trying to
become one of the apes in the eyes of his peers and his "father,"
which occasionally gets him into trouble no matter how well-meant his
attempts.  All he's looking for is acceptance, perhaps a goal easily
identifiable by young viewers, but one which will ring true with a lot
of adults.  When you really think about it, this story fits right into
the Disney formula of the outcast that triumphs in the end.  Look back
on past Disney animated features and you'll see the trend.
Growing up, Tarzan (voiced by Alex D. Linz as a child, and by Tony
Goldwyn as an adult) has a couple of friends.  One is an ape named
Terk (Rosie O'Donnell), and the other is a paranoid hypochondriac of
an elephant named Tantor (Wayne Knight).  Both provide the requisite
comic relief (Timon and Poombah from THE LION KING immediately come to
mind) and perform the usual hijinks as prescribed by the Disney mold.
I'm beginning to think anyone can write the screenplay for one of
these films.  Just fill in the blanks!  Can you see it?  "Now we have
to have a couple of zany friends for out hero who might get him into
mischief, but cover for him or come to his rescue when he needs it.
We've already had a fish and a crab, and we've had a candle and a
teapot, a genie and a dog, a few stone statues....have we had an ape
and an elephant yet?  Well, there we go!"
Of course, there's gotta be romance somewhere along the line, so Jane
(Minnie Driver) gets introduced about halfway through.  Together with
her father Dr. Porter (Nigel Hawthorne) and the big game hunter
Clayton (Brian Blessed), Jane is on an expedition to find and study
the wild gorillas of Africa.  She discovers the man raised by apes and
is enchanted almost immediately, and soon shares an amusing version of
the compulsory "You Tarzan, Me Jane" scene.  Thankfully, those aren't
the exact words.  However, I found it distracting that Tarzan is going
"ohh ohh ee ee" one second and then tells Jane his name in this manly
voice with perfect diction.  How does he tell his name to another ape?
"Ohh ohh ee - Tarzan - ee ee ohh?"  Well, regardless of my picky
nature, the romance actually works as only Disney romance can:  Purely
contrived, but for some reason rather believable.  But hey, Tarzan's a
young adult.  Do you think he dated a few of the female apes before
meeting Jane?  Isn't that illegal in most countries?  Oh, well.  I
don't think Disney will be using my quote anymore.
TARZAN departs from the usual Disney feature in that this one is not a
musical.  There's lots of music to be sure, but not a single character
song in the whole hour and a half of running time.  We instead get
more of a Phil Collins concert, as no less than five of his original
songs are used as interlude material.  This isn't really a bad thing,
as the songs are very high-energy and catchy (I found myself singing
one to myself for most of the following day); it's just different.  Do
yourself a favor and see this film in a theater with a good sound
system, because the music will come through astonishingly well and
really enhance the movie.
With each new feature, Disney animation gets even better.  Not
necessarily by leaps and bounds, but since they put out a new film
each year, a steady rate of improvement is apparent, and this
definitely shows in TARZAN.  There are a couple of scenes where the
animation achieves a near 3-D effect, and a number of scenes which
feature Tarzan moving through the trees are absolutely dizzying.  The
way he slides down tree limbs and trunks is very reminiscent of
skateboarding and rollerblading maneuvers, and had me thinking this
isn't just Tarzan, it's "Extreme Tarzan."  However, TARZAN does not
seem to have what I call its "chandelier scene," which is the one
scene to which the animators have chosen to devote an inordinate
amount of effort, utilizing a computer-assisted process that makes the
animation absolutely breathtaking.  Lasting but a few seconds at most,
it's been the signature of nearly every Disney animated feature since
BEAUTY AND THE BEAST, in which the castle ballroom chandelier was
rendered in stunning detail.
As usual, the voice talent is up to snuff, convincingly make you
believe in the convictions of animated characters.  The one poor
choice in casting, however, was Rosie O'Donnell.  Going into the film,
I didn't know she was even a part of it, but when Terk started
talking, I recognized her voice immediately.  Her performance was
fine, but through the rest of the film I kept thinking, "That's no boy
ape, that Rosie O'Donnell."  Distracting to say the least.
I'll admit I've never read the Edgar Rice Burroughs story "Tarzan of
the Apes," so I couldn't tell you how true this film stays to the
book.  But unless you're a purist, you should have few objections to
this film.  With solid performances, action, adventure, a bit of
romance, and great music and animation, TARZAN should appeal to the
kids and to the kid in all of us.
Note:  When I wrote my review of MULAN a year ago, I went off on the
promotional and merchandising tie-ins prevalent with the release of a
Disney animated feature.  This time, I'll just say that I went to
McDonald's yesterday to treat myself to a McFlurry, and Tarzan was on
the cup.  'Nuff said.

Title
Review for There's Something About Mary (1998)
When I saw the trailer for this film, I laughed harder than I had in quite
some time.  While I was therefore pretty well psyched to see it, I was ever
mindful that a trailer can make even the most mediocre film look good.  I'm
happy to say that THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY is not one of those trailer
let-downs.  In fact, watching this film was quite a fine way to spend two hours.
The film opens up in flashback to 1985, at a high school in Cumberland,
Rhode Island.  Ted Stroehmann (Ben Stiller) is a social reject who can't
seem to get a date to the upcoming prom, until he comes to the defense of
the mentally retarded Warren (W. Earl Brown), who's being harassed by one of
the school jocks.  It seems Warren's sister is the campus queen, Mary Jensen
(Cameron Diaz), who is impressed with Ted's willingness to stand up for her
defenseless brother, despite a very real chance of getting beaten up.  Mary
takes an immediate liking to Ted and asks him to the prom.  Ted was just
flattered that she even knew his name.  Unfortunately, prom night is ruined
when Ted has an accident with his zipper (at which every man in the theater
will wince), and is sent to the hospital.
Fast forward to the present, where Ted has cleaned himself up, now writes
for a magazine, but has weekly therapy sessions in order to deal with his
obsession of the past 13 years:  Mary, whom he hasn't seen since that
fateful day.  With the help of his friend Dom (Chris Elliott), Ted hires
slimy private investigator Pat Healy (Matt Dillon) to track down his only
love.  However, when Pat finds Mary, he falls for her too, and soon the both
of them are competing for her affections.
THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY is directed by Bobby and Peter Farrelly, who
brought us DUMB AND DUMBER and KINGPIN.  Not exactly intelligent comedies,
they are of the guilty pleasure variety where you might not want your
friends or co-workers to think you had such a great time watching them.
With their current film, the Farrelly brothers have come up with something
you'll not only enjoy, but also won't mind talking about the next day at the
water cooler.
The film succeeds in employing a pretty wide range of comedic styles, from
the subtle to the ridiculous, and while a few of the gags might be offensive
to some (seeming like residuals from the Farrelly brothers' last two films)
they almost all work.  I have not seen many movies in the recent past that
shoot for the mark and so often hit it dead on.  One minute you'll be
laughing at something Ted says, and the next you'll be howling at the sight
of a dog dragging him across the floor of Mary's apartment. 
One of the great things this film has going for it is Ben Stiller.  He is
perfectly cast in the role of Ted, because he's a guy who just looks awkward
in almost every situation.  Ted's a nice fellow and tries to do his best,
but for some reason or another things just don't always work out.  It's
comical, but also has that kind of appeal where you really feel for the him
and want him to come out on top.  Actually, I've liked Stiller since he did
a short which aired on Saturday Night Live back in the mid-eighties.  The
film was like a theatrical trailer for a spoof on the Tom Cruise/Paul Newman
film THE COLOR OF MONEY, entitled THE HUSTLER OF MONEY.  In it, Stiller
played Wince (not Vince) who is taken under the wing of an older man (played
by John Mahoney) to become a big-time bowling hustler.  It was parody at its
finest, more of which showed up in the short-lived "The Ben Stiller Show" on
the Fox network in late '92/early '93.  Like "The Critic" (which aired on
ABC, then Fox), I still mourn that show's cancellation.
Cameron Diaz is absolutely enchanting for most of the film, although her
character seems obsessed with perfection in the men she dates, and some of
the qualities she looks for make Mary look paper-thin at times.  However,
Diaz pulls the role off with such panache and charm, that you can still see
why she's got guys just falling over each other to be with her.  Heck, I
even found her laugh to be cute, even though I thought it was annoying
during an appearance she made on The Tonight Show last week.
My girlfriend remarked that Matt Dillon doesn't change, and you know, it's
really true.  He and Ralph Macchio must hang out or something.  Maybe they
live in Dick Clark's pool house.  Anyway, here's another good piece of
casting, as Dillon slips beautifully into the role of the guy who tries to
worm his way into Mary's heart.
The supporting performances are also good.  Chris Elliott has a bigger part
than in THE ABYSS (yes, check it out next time), and less annoying than in
CABIN BOY.  Lin Shae, who plays Mary's neighbor Magda (and also appeared as
the landlady in KINGPIN), provides some good laughs, especially in scenes
with her Benji-like dog, which acts as the focal point for a few of the
funniest moments of the film.  Lee Evans, as Mary's friend Tucker, displays
a flexibility in acting and accents which surprises and contributes to an
interesting plot twist.
The Farrelly brothers and scriptwriters Ed Decter and John J. Strauss keep
the comedic pacing going so that there aren't any noticeable times where the
film drags.  The only problem I saw was their use of a couple of musicians
who provide segues between several key scenes.  They appear out of nowhere
and actually sing plot-relevant information right toward the camera.  It's a
device which was amusing for about three seconds when they opened the film.
After that it got a little annoying, and it's unfortunate that those spots
interrupt what would otherwise be a smooth flow.  Fortunately, filled with
sight gags, humorous lines, and solid comedic acting, THERE'S SOMETHING
ABOUT MARY will still have you laughing after you leave the theater.

Title
Review for Waiting for Guffman (1996)
"You know that saying about how if you don't like the weather, just
wait five minutes?  Well, with some hard work and determination, I
believe we can get that down to three or four."  So says the mayor of
the small town of Blaine, Missouri, the setting for Christopher
Guest's WAITING FOR GUFFMAN.  This line, delivered absolutely deadpan
by comedian/actor Larry Miller, sets the tone for the film:
Ridiculous lines delivered by characters who are totally serious.  The
film is presented as a documentary which opens up as the Blaine City
Council prepares for the town's sesquicentennial celebration.  They
stand around a sandtable mock-up of the town square and position
little figurines as one security-minded councilmember suggests putting
snipers on the rooftops just in case things get "out of hand".
Soon afterwards, we are introduced to Corky St. Claire (Christopher
Guest), a stereotypically effeminate musical theater director who,
after finding only limited success in The Big Apple, moved to Blaine
to produce community plays featuring local talent.  For Blaine's
celebration, Corky is putting together a production which depicts the
history of the town, from it's founding by westward-bound settlers who
thought the Missouri River was the Pacific Ocean, to its boomtown days
of footstool production (earning Blaine the title of "Stool Capitol of
the United States"), to its purported visit by aliens prior to
Roswell, New Mexico.
We are introduced to a number of remarkably funny characters through
the audition held for Corky's big musical.  There's Ron and Sheila
Albertson (Fred Willard and Catherine O'Hara), who run a local travel
agency, but have never been outside Blaine (well, except once when Ron
had to go to the next town for surgery).  They've caught the acting
bug and have appeared in Corky's previous efforts, including a musical
version of BACKDRAFT, where the audience had to be evacuated because
of the smoke.  There's also dentist Alan Pearl (Eugene Levy, who also
co-wrote the screenplay with Guest), whose singing audition is one of
the funniest moments in the film.  Finally, there's Libby Mae Brown
(Parker Posey), a Dairy Queen employee who is trying to create a soft
serve concoction to top the Blizzard.  Each displays a severe lack of
talent, but Corky sits there watching and smiling like Ed Wood,
believing that he's found diamonds in the rough.
Guest and Levy have created characters who are not outrageously
comical, but instead are just left of center.  They are normal enough
so that you might know these characters in real life, but odd enough
so that they make us laugh.  Indeed, their behavior is so regular-life
natural that it adds to the documentary feel, and it is exactly this
documentary style that makes WAITING FOR GUFFMAN so funny.  As an
audience, we're used to seeing documentaries made about serious or
interesting subjects, but we're not used to finding them humorous.
Additionally, what's played out for the camera is by all means
supposed to be serious; the documentary premise sets up a gritty view
of people who are basically living their lives.  The fact that their
actions are laughable is lost on them, but is totally our gain.  It's
as if we're in on some kind of joke that they're not privy to, and in
the crudest sense, we're laughing at them, not with them.  Sounds
terrible, but it's a wonderful vehicle for comedy.
There's no character development in this movie, and there really
doesn't need to be, since the paper-thin quality of the characters is
what makes their inclusion in a documentary so laughable.  We watch as
they try to learn the dance steps, lines, and lyrics and we can't help
but be amazed at how inept they are.  We watch open-mouthed as they
fantasize about taking the show to Broadway when they learn a talent
scout from a New York production company will be attending the
performance (his name is Guffman, and if you're familiar with Beckett,
you already know what will happen).  They end up pretty much on a
continuation of the paths they started before the entire Blaine
musical experience, not seeming to have learned a damn thing.  And we
love it.
Christopher Guest was one of the stars of Rob Reiner's THIS IS SPINAL
TAP, a hilariously innovative "documentary" about a fictional heavy
metal rock group, and there is no doubt where Guest learned the craft
for directing WAITING FOR GUFFMAN.  While Guest uses a tamer group of
subjects for his film, and stylistically differs somewhat by his
choices to utilize longer scenes and leave the film unnarrated, for
example, one can definitely see the influences from his experience
with Reiner 12 years previously (has it really been that long?).  It
is a credit to Guest that he learned well and used his knowledge to
produce a film that is as original as it is an homage to the film
which broke new ground for comedy.

Title
Review for Titanic (1997)
I was pleasantly surprised by this film.  With a budget topping $200
million, I was quite skeptical about whether throwing all that money
toward one of the twentieth century's greatest tragedies would make a
film exciting enough to see.  How much could you dress up the sets?
How many models and computer effects could you use?  How much more
action could you pack into a ship that sinks?  Oh, if I've just given
away part of the plot for you, go back to school.  After having viewed
TITANIC, however, I found it to be a well-paced, well-designed, and
overall well-made movie.  There have been many films made about the
maiden and final voyage of the ocean liner Titanic, but this latest
offering from director James Cameron is the best I've seen.
TITANIC tells its story in two time periods.  It starts out in the
present, when ocean explorer Brock Lovett (Bill Paxton) and his team
are exploring the wreckage of the Titanic on the floor of the
Atlantic, searching for a priceless diamond necklace which supposedly
went down with the ship.  What they find instead is a drawing of a
woman wearing the necklace, which is broadcast on the news.  The woman
in the picture recognizes herself and phones Lovett, who has her flown
out to his exploration vessel on the high seas.  There she tells her
story to Lovett and his team.
In 1912, Rose DeWitt Bukater (Kate Winslett), a young lady belonging
to society's upper class, boards the Titanic for the ship's first
Atlantic crossing, from Southampton, England to New York.  She is
engaged to Cal Hockley (Billy Zane), an heir to old money, and a snob
in every sense of the word.  On board, Rose feels the stifling
trappings of high-society's expectations, and resolves to escape from
it all by throwing herself off the Titanic's stern, but is saved from
her self-proclaimed fate by Jack Dawson (Leonardo DiCaprio), a
passenger in third-class ("steerage", as it's referred to), who talks
her out of jumping.  Although for Rose the attraction is not
immediate, a love affair soon develops between the two, which
endangers Rose's social standing as well as her engagement to the
jealous Cal.
The story sounds very simple, and perhaps even unexciting, but through
solid performances by the leads and good direction by Cameron, a good
movie comes through.  DiCaprio is marvelous as the young, but
worldly-wise Jack, playing the role with the confidence usually found
in older actors.  His is a character that is immediately likable, as
he knows what he wants out of life and is charmingly able to handle a
variety of situations.  Girls are going to swoon over him.  Winslet
also proves herself a good actress, delivering her lines convincingly,
and the quality of performances between Winslet and DiCaprio makes the
relationship believable.  The only problem with Winslet is that she
does not carry herself in accordance with her character's upbringing.
Simply by judgment of her gait, I was distracted from the fact that
she was supposed to be an upper-crust debutante.  Rather than
demonstrate the poise one would expect her character to possess, she
sometimes looks positively clumsy, and it unfortunately detracts from
her otherwise great acting.
Billy Zane is cast well as the aristocratic snob Cal, since he has a
certain look that immediately makes you want to hate him.  His
features are such that even when he smiles, there's something
mistrustful about him, and when he scowls, he is evil incarnate.  He's
something like a porcelain version of Peter Gallagher, but a cheaper
model.  Like DiCaprio and Winslet, Zane slips comfortably into his
role and plays it well.  Backing up Zane is David Warner as Lovejoy,
Cal's personal assistant (or "man" as they said at the turn of the
century).  No matter who else is in the cast, you can always count on
a good performance by Warner, who seems to be made to play the
distinguished gentleman with a gaze of steel and will to match.
Additionally, there are a number of smaller fictional and
non-fictional roles thrown in for color, such as Kathy Bates as "The
Unsinkable" Molly Brown, Danny Nucci as Jack's friend Fabrizio De
Rossi, Eric Braeden as John Jacob Astor, and even Bernard Fox as
Colonel Archibald Gracie.  Nice to see Dr. Bombay getting work.
Also scattered about are some of the other steerage passengers who are
basically in the movie so you can feel sorry for them when they die.
This by itself may have been largely compulsory in a film about the
Titanic, but it transcends this status by putting these characters in
direct conflict with the ship's crewmembers who strive to maintain
order and assure that the first-class passengers are placed aboard the
lifeboats before anyone else.  In this way, TITANIC possesses a depth
not usually found in action pictures.  You don't just get a love story
with a tragedy as a backdrop, but a very real account of class
struggle as well.
As I mentioned before, the budget for this film was tremendous, and it
certainly showed in the set dressing and special effects.  The
interiors of the Titanic are nearly breathtaking with their elaborate
trimmings and intricate detail, and one has very little doubt that the
layouts are authentic.  With regard to the exteriors, I would dare
anyone to point out a film in which a vessel has been recreated with
such meticulousness or on such a scale.  Cameron actually built a
scale model of the Titanic in a water tank, but only had room for 90%,
and therefore had to computer-generate the remaining 40 feet.
Could've fooled me and everyone else in the theater, as the splicing
is seamless.
Also of note in this film is the way the audience is presented with
the anatomy of the disaster right at the beginning.  We are told of
where the iceberg struck the ship, how the flooding occurred, the way
the ship sank, and why it did so in that manner.  These technical
details serve as a guide for later on when the action starts
happening, and allow us to view the sinking with informed analytic
detraction, in addition to the more conventional placement in the
midst of mayhem and confusion.
In all, James Cameron's TITANIC is a good blend of love story,
history, and action.  The fact that the film runs longer than most at
about three hours is almost unnoticed as the viewer's attention is
held alternately by those three main elements, from the movie's
intriguing beginning to it's satisfactory ending.  In box office
receipts, TITANIC the movie will undoubtedly live up to the unsinkable
expectations of Titanic the ship.

Title
Review for Tomorrow Never Dies (1997)
The world is faced with a new threat:  The media.  Elliot Carver is a
media mogul so powerful that he is able to manipulate events so that
"Tomorrow", his flagship paper, has first coverage.  Carver's latest
plot takes the form of provoking a war between China and England by
sinking a British warship in the South China Sea and making it look as
if the Chinese are responsible.  The end goal?  Install a puppet
government in Beijing which will grant Carver exclusive broadcasting
rights in the country for the next 100 years.  To combat this threat,
we've got the same old hero:  James Bond.
For the second time, Pierce Brosnan plays the unflappable operative
from Her Majesty's Secret Service, and you can tell he's already
comfortable with the role.  This is not necessarily a compliment, as
Brosnan's minimalistic performance in being the suave secret agent can
easily be mistaken for simply running through the motions.  It's okay,
though.  Brosnan seems to have been accepted into the Bond fandom, so
he probably won't be saddled with the same fate which befell George
Lazenby.
Opposite Brosnan are Michelle Yeoh as Wai Lin, a Chinese agent, and
Teri Hatcher as Paris Carver, the villain's wife.  Between these two
new Bond women, Yeoh wins hands down.  Hatcher may be attractive, but
her performance in this film is entirely subpar, giving way to the
acting and athletic abilities of Yeoh.  She has some moves which make
Bond look absolutely brutish.
It is often said that the villain makes the Bond film, and TOMORROW
NEVER DIES has a great one in Carver, played so wonderfully by
Jonathan Pryce.  Starting a war to get broadcasting rights.  You have
to admire such a delicious plan, which is not bent on world
domination, but rather opening up a new market.  Capitalism, not
communism, seems to be the enemy in this one, and Carver seems to
revel in the fact that wealth and power can be gained through control
of information.  Pryce plays the role with relish, chewing scenery
whenever the opportunity arises.
One of the things you can depend on about a Bond movie is the action.
In this film, the viewer is not disappointed, as we are treated to
fights, chases, and unique uses of the BMW 750i.  All of the action is
well choreographed, and the stunts are first rate.  The only problem
is that it is all mere eye candy and zero tension.  Bond has been
through this so many times, you know he's going to be all right.  I
mean, the man has not only defied death, he's defied AGE.
It seems to me that James Bond movies are often evaluated on a set of
criteria separate from the rest of cinema.  We consistently ignore the
fact that they are formulaic and usually full of ludicrous situations
and dialog.  While watching the film, we wait for the pre-credits
stunt, then the mission briefing and the little banter with
Moneypenny, then the visit with Q to get his toys, then the encounter
with the villain and the femme fatale, during which he introduces
himself as "Bond, James Bond," then his order of a "vodka martini,
shaken, not stirred," then his fight with some of the villain's
henchmen, then his capture by the villain and subsequent escape, then
his return to the villain's hideout to foil the evil plan to take over
the world.  Did I miss anything?  Oh, yes, his fight to the death with
the villain's chief thug, which occurs just prior to the villain's
island/airplane/space station/ship exploding in a ball of fire.
If this were to occur in a sequel for any other series of films, it
would be criticized to no end for its lack of originality.  The fact
that there have been 17 previous Bond movies, all of which pretty much
followed the same formula, says something.  It says that Bond has
become so much of a cultural icon that all we seem to want is more of
him, even if it's more of the same.  In fact, I would even go so far
as to say that we don't even want to see the formula changed.
Remember when they tried to make Bond monogamous in LIVING DAYLIGHTS?
It didn't work, because it just wasn't Bond.  The problem with the
Bond series is, because the formula has been used time and time again
to the point where we all know what's going to happen, what used to be
exciting is now merely amusing, and each Bond film can only strive to
make itself more amusing than the last.
So here we are with TOMORROW NEVER DIES, and the formula is followed
once again.  Rather than scoff at the repetition, however, we chuckle
with recognition at each of the milestones which must be part of the
Bond movie.  The familiarity is actually very comfortable, and an
experience which can actually be shared between generations, as the
first Bond film premiered in 1962.  What's new about this film is that
it's not trying to milk the last vestiges of the dying Soviet legacy
for plot.  This one fully recognizes that the Cold War is, in fact,
finally over, and doesn't try to raise the specter of reawakening
communism, as did two out of the last three films.  I believe this
film deserves applause, just for being a little different.

Title
Review for Holy Man (1998)
Did I do something bad?  I must have, because sitting through this movie was
sheer punishment.
Here's the plot.  Ricky (Jeff Goldblum) is producer of The Good-Buy Network,
one of those 24-hour home shopping channels.  The new boss (Robert Loggia)
plans to can Ricky's behind if he doesn't turn the previous months' flat
sales numbers around, and to add to his problems, Ricky also has to work
with Kate (Kelly Preston), the ivy league wunderkind whom the boss has
brought with him.  Kate and Ricky don't get along and don't have any great
ideas until they meet G (Eddie Murphy), a spiritualist who sees something
positive in everything.  His soothing voice and simple logic makes people
feel good, and it's this quality that will make G the new GBN television
star and the key to the network's success.
The first problem is a flaw in the plot.  Sure, G makes people feel good.
Sure, we're told that most people feel guilty after buying an impulse item,
no matter how wealthy they might be, and I'll even believe that G talks a
talk that allows people to feel good about what they've bought.  But, hey,
that's after they've bought it.  Why do sales skyrocket the first time G is
on camera?  Far from trying to sell the product, G instead blathers on about
how you don't even need the thing.  Someone please tell me how this is
supposed to move merchandise in the first place.  You might say that people
feel good about what they've bought, so they come back and by more, but due
to the simple fact that the first round of sales in inexplicable, I'm not
convinced this is what the filmmakers had in mind.  The whole movie is
therefore seriously undermined because the key point in the plot is never
credible.
Another problem is in the humor.  You know, if you see that Eddie Murphy is
in a movie, I think it is not unreasonable for you to expect that the film
is a comedy.  Whoa, partner, are you in for a surprise.  HOLY MAN is not
funny.  Murphy, the one asset you'd think this movie has (remember how they
brought him in at the last minute to save BEST DEFENSE? - then again, maybe
you don't) is seriously reigned in.  The script gives him almost nothing to
work with, and it seems as though director Stephen Herek kept him toned down
so that the other actors in the film wouldn't be left as window dressing.
There's only one moment in the film where Murphy is allowed to let loose,
and it lasts for three shouted words, which seem totally out of place as a
result.  Pathetic.  In all, there are about three jokes that work in the
entire picture, and they're not even that great.  As a side note, there are
some cameo appearances such as Dan Marino pitching a contraption which
allows you to cook off of your car engine, and James Brown introducing a
medic-alert device that shouts "help me!" just like the Hardest Working Man
in Show Business at the push of a button, but these never cause your
personal laugh-o-meter to rise above the level of mild bemusement.
"Well," you ask, "surely there must be some convincing performances to make
up for the lack of humor."  Think again, Buckwheat.  Jeff Goldblum
disappoints.  Kelly Preston is flat (but not like that).  Robert Loggia, in
the kind of role for which he has been virtually typecast, can't do anything
with it.  The script is part of the problem, but these actors don't even
look like they believe in the move they're making.  They look a lot like
they're bored.  Just like the audience.
So what do you have when the humor is absent from your comedy, and the
acting is like the Siberian steppes?  A film that drags more than a dropped
anchor.  But wait!  As if these problems don't make the film slow enough,
the screenplay's pacing makes the movie even slower!  It takes the entire
first half hour to establish the movie's premise, then more time as the film
wades through a tortuous (and seemingly mandatory) romance between Ricky and
Kate, and a sub-plot involving a conniving PR man (Eric McCormack) who wants
to discredit G and take over Ricky's job as producer.  When the PR guy's
plan is foiled, the film is climaxes, we're treated to that little epilogue,
and then we can all go home, right?  Wrong.  The movie goes on for another
half hour!  Continental drift is the Indy 500 compared to the pace of HOLY
MAN!  
The only thing holy about HOLY MAN will surely be the number of people
exclaiming "Holy !@#% that movie was awful!"  This one is for the truly pious.

Title
Review for Negotiator, The (1998)
The police negotiator is the person with the entirely unenviable job
of going into ground zero and attempting to talk a dangerous criminal
out of doing whatever he or she intends to do.  Lives are often at
stake, and the criminal is usually armed and most likely mentally
unstable, prone to turn on the negotiator at a moment's notice.  The
negotiator must therefore be something of an actor, psychologist, and
sham artist, in addition to being a police officer; he must be able to
think on his feet and either work toward the goal of ending the
confrontation without violence, or failing that, must be prepared to
facilitate the conclusion of the crisis through firepower.  Most of
all, the negotiator must be able to enter a situation with as little
intelligence about the scenario as possible, and quickly gain control
of the situation, dominate the conversation, and influence the
perpetrator into thinking that the end of the conflict is what he
really wants.  It takes a pretty smart person to do that.
But what if the hostage-holding criminal is just as smart?  What if
he's also able to think on his feet?  In fact, what if he also knows
all the tricks to turning the situation to his favor?  It is this
circumstance which forms the basis for F. Gary Gray's THE NEGOTIATOR.
In this film, police negotiator Danny Roman (Samuel L. Jackson) is
tipped off by his partner to corruption within the Chicago police
force.  When his partner turns up shot to death and Internal Affairs
finds incriminating evidence in Roman's home, Roman becomes the prime
suspect of both embezzling from the police disability fund and murder.
Faced with the scorn of most of the police department, and under close
scrutiny by the media, Roman is forced to turn in his badge in one of
those typical scenes in the captain's office.  I don't quite remember
if the captain actually said, "I hate to do this, but...", although it
wouldn't surprise me if he did.
Luckily, the film soon shakes off the conventionalism and concentrates
on the interesting premise mentioned above.  After being offered a
take-it-or-leave-it deal by the District Attorney, Roman resolves to
prove his innocence by walking into the office of Internal Affairs
Inspector Niebaum (J.T. Walsh), taking him and others hostage, and
proclaiming he has been framed.  Although Roman's actions seem forced
due to the compressed nature of his motivational build-up, Gray
redeems himself by involving us with the negotiations between Roman
and fellow police negotiator Chris Sabian (Kevin Spacey) which soon
ensue.
Jackson, while a superb actor, is miscast in the role of Roman.  The
actor has become so popular, and so often identified as a protagonist
(notable exceptions can be found, such as in JACKIE BROWN), that we as
an audience have a difficult time believing he will carry out his
threats.  The script also clearly sets him up as the good guy who is
only trying to prove his innocence.  How can we believe he's going to
shoot a hostage, no matter if the hostage tried to kill him earlier?
Unfortunately, this preconception saps the film of some of it's
would-be suspenseful moments, and anything good left in those scenes
is largely attributed to Jackson's acting ability.  Almost every time
he's in a scene, Jackson steals it without looking back.
When Spacey appears, the film has already run about a third of its
course.  His is an interesting character.  Made out to be some kind of
negotiating superman, our first look at him has him hopelessly trying
to get his family moving to set out on vacation.  "I can talk a man
out of blowing up the Sears Tower, but I can't talk my wife out of the
bedroom or my daughter off the phone," he says.  When he gets the call
to action, however, he quickly changes gears and becomes the man we
expect him to be.  Soon, his character has to negotiate not only with
Roman, but also with the SWAT commander (David Morse) who is itching
to send in a team to take Roman out, all the while keeping wary of the
FBI agents who are waiting to take over the operation, should
negotiations fail.  This complex set of pressures are reflected well
in Sabian the negotiator and Spacey the actor.  As the second
protagonist, Spacey measures up nicely.
Gray really lucked out with this cast.  David Morse as Commander Beck,
Ron Rifkin as Commander Frost, and John Spencer as Police Chief Al
Travis are all more than competent, and can hold their own in scenes
with Jackson and Spacey.  The only problem is the bit of typecasting
that results from these choices:  Morse played a similar role in THE
ROCK, Rifkin played the D.A. in L.A. CONFIDENTIAL, and Spencer played
a police detective in COP LAND.  With the level of acting, however,
this can be forgiven.
Also in the supporting cast, Paul Giamatti as Rudy, one of the
hostages, is notable for the comic relief he provides.  His character
is initially so slimy, and Giamatti himself just looks so shifty, that
you expect to laugh before he even says anything.  Fortunately, this
doesn't distract from the seriousness of the rest of the film, but
instead provides some nice breathers from the level of tension which
Gray manages to sustain throughout.
J.T. Walsh, as the suspicious Internal Affairs inspector, clocks in
with one of his final performances.  Sadly, the talented but
underrated actor passed away in late February of this year, and the
soon to be released PLEASANTVILLE will mark his last film.  Walsh
appeared in dozens of movies such as GOOD MORNING VIETNAM, BACKDRAFT,
and NIXON.  For one of his best performances, check out SLING BLADE,
in which he plays a mental patient sharing a ward with Billy Bob
Thornton.  When Jack Nicholson accepted his best actor Oscar in March,
Walsh was one of the men to whom he credited his success (the actors
performed together in A FEW GOOD MEN).  THE NEGOTIATOR is actually
dedicated to Walsh, and while Inspector Niebaum may not have been his
best role, it certainly characterizes the type of character for which
Walsh had become most famous for playing.
In the end, THE NEGOTIATOR has a plotline that parallels it's reality.
We're served with the premise that two equally deft negotiators are
battling each other to resolve the conflict in the manner which will
suit each of them best.  As an audience, we're also given a situation
where two wonderfully talented actors are thrown into a movie, and
we'd like to see if one will dominate the film.  Both provide some
pretty good entertainment.

Title
Review for Trekkies (1997)
I used to be able to say, "I love Star Trek."  Back then, you could
say that and everyone would know what you were talking about.  These
days, with the old series, the movies with the old cast, The Next
Generation, the movies with the Next Generation cast, Deep Space Nine,
and Voyager, I have to really qualify my statement.  I love the old
series and the movies with the old cast.  I like the Next Generation
and their movies.  I have almost no feeling toward Deep Space Nine and
Voyager.  To see the premiere of the new Star Trek film used to be
something really special.  Today, there's so much Star Trek, a new
movie is practically taken with a grain of salt.  What, I have to PAY
to see this?
Still, there is currently a larger fan base for the entertainment
enterprise than ever before, and it's even more diverse due to all the
different forms of Star Trek available.  They come from all walks of
life.  They are doctors, students, psychologists, housewives, radio
personalities.  They are from the upper class and the lower class and
everywhere in between.  Many may not even speak the same language, but
they all have one thing in common:  They like the message that Star
Trek delivers.  If we try hard enough, we will all survive and get
along with each other in the future.  But just what makes a person
devote more than a passing interest to a television show?  What kind
of a person attends conventions, or dresses up like his or her
favorite character when it isn't even Halloween?  It's these types of
questions Roger Nygard tries to answer in his documentary, TREKKIES.
After the first five minutes or so, I thought I was going to be sick.
The film immediately begins documenting the extreme in Star Trek
fandom; the ones that take the show way too seriously.  The freaks.
Sounds of laughter erupt from different pockets of the theater, and it
seems this film is taking cheap shots and making people laugh at the
expense of others.  I felt embarrassed.  Unfortunately, this trend
lasts a while until we spend more time with each of a number of fans
and their lives get a little more personal to us.
The documentary shows us a pretty wide range of people who are
associated with Star Trek, but the most time is spent with those who
have seemingly gone off the deep end.  After all, the normal people
are boring, right?  A few people we meet are a dentist whose practice
is one big Star Trek fantasy (his office is adorned with all kinds of
memorabilia and he and his assistants are dressed daily in costume), a
man who wears his costume to the supermarket and would get his ears
cut to points like Mr. Spock's if he could afford it, and young man
who is making his own Star Trek movie.
TREKKIES is narrated by Denise Crosby, who played Lieutenant Tasha Yar
for the first year and a half of the series, Star Trek:  The Next
Generation.  Crosby also serves as the interviewer in many of the
film's sequences, and it's nice that she seems to be going on the same
journey we are.  It's as though she is facing these people with the
same unjaded incredulity, and head-shaking amazement as the audience,
even though we know she must have faced some of this before.  However,
if it's an act, it's a good one.
Whereas we'd like to end up feeling a connection with the fans in
TREKKIES, the film doesn't go into sufficient depth so that we
understand why they do the things they do.  Is it insecurity?  The
need to feel like they "belong" to something?  Or is Star Trek just
something they think is really, really cool?  By staying on the
surface, we unfortunately never get far past the feeling of amusement
or even pity.  Take, for example, a woman who belongs to a Star Trek
fan club in which they assign ranks to members.  She insists that her
co-workers at Sir Speedy print shop refer to her as "The Commander,"
and although she may not wear her uniform every day, the communicator,
phaser, and rank insignia are usually found as accessories to her
apparel.  We might admire the fact that she is so devoted to her
passion and her club, but she likens the wearing of the uniform to
being part of a military organization.  The thing is, it's not like
that at all.  Her uniform is part of a television show and isn't meant
to be worn in public, save for the novelty.  By the way, this woman
was actually on the O.J. Simpson trial jury, and yes, she wore the
uniform to court every day.
Another woman we meet is obsessed with Brent Spiner, who plays the
android Lieutenant Commander Data on The Next Generation.  She calls
herself a "Spinerfem" and keeps her album of Brent Spiner photos in a
fireproof safe in her closet.  Since she lives relatively close to his
home, she goes out on her balcony and gazes toward it to cheer her up
when she feels depressed.  One fan talks about the informal backyard
gatherings he annually attends in the unofficial birthplace of James
T. Kirk, Riverside, Iowa.  He informs us that the previous year was
great.  They had a few more people, and even "had a girl come."  This
is not a film with a lot of sympathy toward its subjects.
One of the better elements of TREKKIES is its interviews with the cast
members, who share some truly interesting and touching anecdotes
involving their experiences with fans.  For example, James Doohan, who
played Scotty in the original series, literally saved a fan's life by
keeping in contact with the suicidal girl and telling her he wanted to
see her at the next convention.  However, a movie that is essentially
about the fans cannot be built upon pieces such as this, and must
revolve around the fans themselves.  It's a pity that Nygard's
documentary only gives us unfeeling looks at the extremes, as the gems
involving the actors contrast greatly to the bleak picture painted for
us by the fans about which they are supposed to be talking.
If this film had delved deeper into the "normal" folks who enjoy Star
Trek without having it run their lives, it would have provided a much
needed balance.  Would this have been less interesting than seeing
fans who live and breathe Star Trek?  On the contrary, I believe it
would have helped answer the original questions of who these people
are and why they like Star Trek.  We would have found that they aren't
just the people you'd cross the street to avoid, but are also you and
me.  Instead, we only learn that there are some pretty strange people
in the world.

Title
Review for 2 Days in the Valley (1996)
2 DAYS IN THE VALLEY starts out like most movies, and introduces you
to a couple of main characters.  Then it introduces you to a couple
more main characters.  But then it introduces you to a couple more
main characters.  Then a couple more.  Then....well, you get the
picture.  This film has a large playbill with no less than 11
significant roles; often a recipe for disaster.  Having too many
characters means less time spent with each, which means the audience
does not get to know them well, which means the audience doesn't care
about what happens to them.  There goes one of the first rules of any
kind of fiction:  People have to care about your characters.  Many
movies have a hard time achieving this with only a few main
characters.  The writers of 2 DAYS IN THE VALLEY should not have been
so ambitious.
See if you can follow me.  Lee and Dosmo are professional hit men who
kill Becky's husband Roy.  The murder is preceded by framing Roy in an
affair with Lee's fiancee, Helga.  Meanwhile, Teddy, a washed-up
director, is getting ready to end his dead-end life until he meets
Audrey.  Enter Allan, who is an obnoxious boss who constantly
mistreats his assistant Susan.  Back to Lee and Dosmo.  Lee tries to
frame Dosmo for the murder of Roy, but Roy gets away and stumbles upon
Allan and Susan.  Across town, Wes and Alvin are vice cops who are
going to raid a "massage" parlor, but en route find Becky, covered
with blood from the murder of Roy.  We later find out that Becky is
part of the plot to kill Roy, although she didn't know about the
affair with Helga.  Hard to follow?  You've just experienced the
second pitfall of the large cast:  Too many subplots in order to
involve all of the characters in the main plot.
Since the characters come from such disparate backgrounds, you know
that it's inevitable they're going meet each other in one way or
another.  The problem with this movie is, you wait a long time for
this to happen.  It isn't until about 45 minutes into the movie that
the first meet cute occurs, and even then some of the characters don't
join the merry band until the very end of the film.  In order to keep
track of everyone, you have to keep cutting back to those characters
who haven't yet met, and this slows the film down considerably.
The ensemble cast includes Danny Aiello, Greg Cruttwell, Jeff Daniels,
Teri Hatcher, Glenne Headly, Peter Horton, Marsha Mason, Paul
Mazursky, James Spader, Eric Stoltz and Charlize Theron.  Only the
character played by Daniels is anywhere near complete.  Daniels plays
Alvin, the hardened vice cop who's been assigned a new partner (Eric
Stoltz) who only transferred into vice as a way to get promoted into
homicide.  Alvin has been at the job a long time and truly believes in
what he's doing:  He's protecting his neighborhood.  However, the
years of fighting society's ills has gotten to him, and he's being
driven over the edge.  He's also a divorced father, and now lives in
an empty house.  We really feel for him because we know he's doing the
best he can.  He's also a guy you might know in real life.  Director
John Herzfeld does a nice job acquainting the viewer with Alvin and
why he is the way he is.  Unfortunately, we don't see him anymore
after the first half of the film.
There's another character worth mentioning, but this one's only
halfway complete.  Paul Mazursky plays Teddy, the washed-up director.
His plight is very moving in the first half of the film, as we see him
driven to the brink of suicide.  The scenes where he's got a gun
pointed to his own head (there are two such scenes) are quite
poignant, and adding his little dog watching him makes those moments
near tear-jerkers.  However, all that changes when he meets Audrey
(Marsha Mason).  His attitude changes, but inconsistently.  At some
points, you feel he has a new zest for life.  At others, he's the guy
who's got nothing left to live for and will take the ultimate risk.
The movie definitely loses something tangible in the second hour by
forgetting about Alvin and by not rounding out Teddy's life.
While not a great film, 2 DAYS IN THE VALLEY does have its moments.
My favorite line was when Dosmo (Danny Aiello) chastises Allan (Greg
Cruttwell) for being so mean to his assistant.  Allan responds with,
"I wasn't born with a silver spoon in my mouth.  I grew up in a
trailer park....I may be an ass, but I've worked hard to become one!"
Particularly moving was a scene of Alvin making out a birthday card to
his daughter from her "First Daddy", then reading a letter notifying
him of his suspension from the force.  There's a slow pull back
through his house's picture window which had been broken earlier that
day by a golf ball from the course across the street.  Framed in that
broken window, Alvin is the picture of a man who has had it with the
world.  Unfortunately, that near perfect scene is ruined by a shaky
camera.
One thing this movie does have is one hell of a cat fight.  Becky
(Teri Hatcher) and Helga (Charlize Theron) really go at it, perhaps
more enthusiastically than in any other movie I've ever seen.  Not the
usual pounding, pushing and scratching motions, but fists flying left
and right.  Being so original, it was too bad it had to end in the
unseen gunshot cliche.  You know how it goes:  They struggle with the
gun, and you know it's going to go off at any minute, but then the
camera cuts away to the outside of the room and >bang

I'm not sure what Herzfeld was going for with the camera work.  It
seemed as if the style changed with each scene.  In one scene, extreme
close-ups would be used.  In another scene, point of view shots.  In
the dialog exchange between Becky and Helga just before they come to
fisticuffs, the camera shifts between them with that fast pan with the
blur in between.  The kind that has a >whoosh

Finally, there's the music.  There are a lot of good tunes in this
film that will get you tapping your feet.  The problem is, almost none
of them fit the location.  Like any other place in the world, the San
Fernando Valley has a certain style, so to hear blues played over a
shot of a car pulling up in front a suburban home just doesn't click.
There are enough references to the environs that it's obvious Herzfeld
wants you to remember the setting throughout the film, so the music
should have been chosen to reflect this.  My advice would be to go out
and look for the soundtrack.  You'll be able to listen to it without
getting thrown off by watching the movie.

Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
Steven Spielberg has been a successful director for about 25 years.
Like anyone else, he's had his share of less-than stellar movies
during his career, but when he nails it, watch out. SAVING PRIVATE
RYAN reminds us all that Spielberg is still very much the master.
In Spielberg's latest film, Tom Hanks plays U.S. Army Ranger Captain
John Miller.  In June of 1944, three days after landing on the beach
at Normandy, Captain Miller and several of his men are charged with
finding and bringing back to safety Private James Francis Ryan (Matt
Damon), a paratrooper who dropped into France with the 101st Airborne
the night before the D-Day invasion.  Ryan's three older brothers, all
serving in the Army, were killed in action within days of each other,
and General George Marshall himself has ordered that Mrs. Ryan will
not lose another son.
Unlike many war movies, the characters in SAVING PRIVATE RYAN are not
sure how they feel about their mission for most of the film.  Getting
men killed in battle is justifiable because the death of one man
probably saves many others, but going to retrieve Ryan is inherently a
backwards idea because the lives of many are being risked to save one.
It is this dilemma which is a source of conflict not only within the
unit, but for each individual as he questions just what is worth
fighting for.
Miller is a character who is tactically proficient both on the
battlefield and when dealing with the personalities of his men.
There's a scene where the soldiers under his command turn on each
other, and the way he defuses the situation is unexpected and
ingenious.  He also proves himself to be very smart, at one point
musing about the Allied strategy of the Normady campaign, and Rommel's
probable avenue of counterattack.  This rises him above the level of
the average soldier (who usually doesn't see beyond his immediate
situation), and therefore makes him very likable.  While he often
plays the part of the infallible leader, we also see him in moments of
catharsis, which give his character a surprising depth.  Portraying
Miller, Hanks delivers what is perhaps his finest performance to date,
running the emotional gamut and being consistently convincing.  You
really believe him when he says he's on this mission to earn the right
to go home.
As is usually the case, Miller's men are a cross-section of
backgrounds, but rather than focus on their differences as a source of
conflict, screenwriter Robert Rodat has instead chosen to show how
their common experiences have homogenized them.  More impressive is
that none of the characters are throwaways; each is given appropriate
screen time to be featured and developed.  A few notables include
Sergeant Horvath (Tom Sizemore), Miller's right-hand man, Corporal
Upham (Jeremy Davies), a young innocent who has no combat experience
but comes along as a French and German translator, and Private Reiben
(Edward Burns), the soldier who most vocally questions the mission.
Through good writing by Rodat, clear direction by Spielberg, and solid
performances by the actors, Miller's unit is one of sympathetic
characters whom we fear for in the dangerous moments and laugh with in
lighter times.
Credit must be given to Spielberg for showing restraint in several
areas.  Symbolism such as literal metaphor and religious imagery are
abound in the film, but are often so subtle, you'll miss it if you're
not paying attention.  A lesser director might have pounded us over
the head with obvious sights and close-ups of particular objects, but
Spielberg is instead content to use character actions and dialog to
convey messages.  Additionally, John Williams's score is an almost
latent enhancement to the film, not the majestic composition we would
expect from the oft Spielberg-collaborator.  To do any more would have
been too intrusive.
Much of the quality of SAVING PRIVATE RYAN is found in the details.  A
soldier taps a rifle magazine against his helmet before shoving it
home into his carbine.  Another remarks that "tracers point both
ways."  When reporting what they've seen, Miller's men are specific,
using "Panzers, Tigers, and MG-42's" instead of merely "tanks and
machineguns."  The research done in making this film is pervasive, and
it pays off.
Be warned:  This film is not for children, nor the squeamish.  The
first 25 minutes or so concentrates on the amphibious landing at Easy
Green Sector of Omaha Beach, and is some of the bloodiest footage I
have ever seen.  However, Spielberg does not include the images of
soldiers with lost limbs and open wounds simply for the sake of making
a battle scene.  Rather, he immerses the viewer in the chaotic and
horrible nature of battle by portraying the violence as close to
reality as possible.  This is enhanced by employing a handheld camera
whenever combat occurs throughout the film, and there is scarcely an
angle that is not from the soldier's point of view.  To further the
effect, these scenes are also photographed with a look resembling
footage from the era, with off-tinted colors and a certain degree of
graininess.  There are also moments where dialog is nearly
unintelligible, either drowned out by the sounds of war, or lost in
the overlapping shouts of confusion.  Odd for a movie, where the
audience must usually hear everything, this technique greatly
contributes to the realism.
"Unforgettable" would be a good word to describe this film, although a
million more could still not do it justice.  Sounds, dialog, and
sights (including an incredible one of the ships, men, and barrage
balloons at Omaha Beach on D-Plus-Three) make seeing this film an
experience.  The stark realism takes such a toll on the viewer, and
leaves in his or her mind such indelible images that it will pervade
one's conscience for a long time.  The portrayal of heroism,
confusion, and fear is so thought-provoking, you will want to discuss
many of the film's points the next day.  Immediately after leaving the
theater, however, the impact will be so great, you may not be able to
talk at all.  Quite simply, SAVING PRIVATE RYAN is one of the best
films of all time.

Title
Review for Anaconda (1997)
Well, what are you going to expect?  It's a movie about a big snake
that eats people.  That's what I should have been thinking when I
viewed this film, because maybe then I would have enjoyed myself more.
Instead, I ended up wishing a giant snake would come along and eat me,
too.
ANACONDA is about a documentary film crew sailing down a South
American river.  Led by anthropologists Dr. Steven Cale (Eric Stolz)
and Terri Flores (Jennifer Lopez), the crew is attempting to locate a
lost tribe of natives.  Along the way, they find poacher Paul Sarone
(Jon Voight), and become unwillingly embroiled in his quest to capture
the elusive anaconda.  To simply say that this is the world's largest
snake wouldn't be doing it justice, since the anaconda in this movie
is at least two feet wide.  If this isn't a good reason to avoid
picking up hitchhikers, I don't know what is.
At the beginning of ANACONDA, we find that Flores and Cale have had
some kind of relationship in the past, but that seems to be more or
less over now.  I expected that fact to play a key part somewhere down
the line, but it ended up being a set-up for nothing.  Cale chokes on
a deadly wasp (don't ask me how that happens - I don't know) and is
put out of action, relegated to being the person whom the rest of the
film crew must get back to civilization for medical help.  This
minimally helps to add a sense of urgency for the plot, since this
goal now comes in direct conflict with Sarone's plan to capture the
snake.  However, this is negated by the fact that Cale seems to get
better by himself about halfway through the film, and in any event
still results in zero payoff from the relationship angle.
Most bad characters are either annoying or stupid.  In this movie,
they're both.  Since this description applies to all the characters
except Sarone, it's hard to find someone to root for.  You're supposed
to back the good guys, but you really end up cheering for Sarone
because he's smarter than everyone else.  Or maybe he's just not as
dumb as everyone else.  At times, I almost found myself rooting for
the snake.
There are no standout performances here.  Everyone seems to be
reciting lines written for stock characters.  Even Voight appears to
be doing his best impression of Christopher Walken for some reason.
No matter, as in most monster movies, the snake is supposed to be the
real star anyway.  In most of the scenes, the snake is computer
generated, and the effects crew did a decent job of making it look
real.  However, the realism is thrown off by some pretty unrealistic
occurrences.  Sometimes, for example, the snake just moves too fast.
It catches a guy jumping off of a waterfall, for crying out loud.
Then there's another scene where the snake eats one of the characters,
and we see the snake's skin drawn so tightly over its prey that we can
see the victim's pained expression from within the snake's belly.
Absolutely ridiculous.
A testimony to the film's bad direction is the inclusion of a scene
early on the in the film, where we get to see just how dangerous the
mighty anaconda is.  In a scene totally unrelated to anything else, we
are witness to the big snake winning a showdown with a panther.  The
anaconda wraps itself around the powerful feline as if it were a
stuffed animal and squeezes it so hard, one of the panther's eyeballs
pops out.  Eeeewwwww.  Above and beyond the sick factor, however, this
scene surprised me because it actually showed the face of the snake
before a quarter of the movie had even passed.  In films like these, a
sense of mystery surrounding the monster must be maintained.  If the
characters are reacting to something they fear more than see, we as an
audience must experience that feeling along with them.  To show us the
monster early on is to let us in on something the characters don't
know about, and therefore allow us to get used to the danger before
the pivotal moment when man and beast have their climactic showdown.
In a case like that, the showdown just ends up being a letdown.  When
I saw the snake for the first time, I decided to give the film the
benefit of the doubt and assume that the snake I saw wasn't the REAL
danger.  This one was just a decoy, and there was actually a BIGGER
snake waiting to make its appearance just when everyone thought they
were safe.  No such luck.  Okay, maybe ANACONDA is actually a decoy,
and there's really a BETTER movie waiting to make its debut.

Title
Review for Cop Land (1997)
The local sheriff of a small town has turned a blind eye to its criminal
inhabitants for years.  The bad guys are bad, all right, but they've also
kept a certain kind of order.  The sheriff figures that as long as worse
criminal elements are kept at bay, and peace is the rule, there's no use
making waves.  Then one day, the sheriff's conscience begins to bother him,
and he remembers why he became sheriff in the first place.  Inspired by the
appearance of another law enforcement officer who has continued the fight
for justice in the midst of corruption, the sheriff resolves to persevere in
the face of overwhelming odds and fight for right once again, culminating in
a showdown at dawn.
Sound like a classic western?  Something with Gary Cooper?  John Wayne?
Actually, it's Sylvester Stallone, and the small town is in modern day New
Jersey.
Yes, you heard me right, and no, I'm not off my rocker.  The movie is James
Mangold's COP LAND, which plays itself out like a western for our time.  The
town is called Garrison, aptly named because it is populated by New York
City transit cops who have gotten out of the perilous Big Apple and built
themselves a suburban community across the river in New Jersey (so maybe the
movie is an "eastern").  Stallone plays Sheriff Freddy Heflin, a
slow-witted, overweight man with one bad ear that has prevented him from
becoming NYPD himself.  With cops all around, Heflin's biggest job is
finding out who's been dumping trash in front of other people's yards.  The
guy doesn't even give out parking tickets, since most of the cars belong to
cops.  "Real" cops.
It seems most of the NYPD living in Garrison has their hand in something,
and the cop who controls it all is Ray Donlan (Harvey Keitel).  Donlan is
something of a celebrity and power broker within the NYPD - everybody knows
him, and he gets what he wants.  Donlan's nephew Murray Babitch (Michael
Rappaport), also a cop, gets into trouble for shooting a couple of unarmed
black youths on the George Washington Bridge, and Donlan covers it up by
faking Babitch's suicide and hiding him out.  Internal affairs investigator
Moe Tilden (Robert De Niro) suspects Donlan's activities and asks Heflin for
help, but Donlan gets the investigation called off by one phone call to the
New York City mayor.  With Tilden's hands tied, Heflin alone must uncover
the plot and bring Babitch in.
As I'm sure other reviewers will note, this is easily Stallone's best
performance since ROCKY.  He plays a character who is understated because
the script calls for it, but is even more so because we don't expect it.
This is Sylvester Stallone, after all, and here he is backing down even
before a confrontation develops.  To watch him play this character is
somewhat shocking at first, but due to the merit of his performance, we
quickly accept him in the role and move on.  Even better, Stallone takes the
shy Heflin and gradually increases his assertiveness and alters his meek
complacency over the course of the film.  You want character development?
This is it.
Stallone is surrounded by a wealth of acting talent.  I mean, come on -
Keitel and De Niro (hey, I just realized that they were both in TAXI DRIVER)
should be enough said, but Ray Liotta, Annabella Sciorra, and even Robert
Patrick (that's right, the T-1000 from TERMINATOR 2:  JUDGMENT DAY) are no
slouches, either.  Liotta plays Gary Figgis, Heflin's friend and a cop who
happens to be fed up with Donlan and his flunkies.  Sciorra is Liz Randone,
whom Heflin saved from drowning years ago as a teenager.  His act of heroics
is the reason why he's partially deaf and can't live the life he's always
wanted to.  Patrick plays Jack Duffy, another cop and Donlan's right-hand
man.  All actors portray their characters well and contribute to the
advancement of the plot.
Unfortunately, with all this talent, you're left wanting more than what
you're given.  You want to see more screen time for some of the
actors/characters.  Most characters in the film are interesting, and at a
slightly clipped running time of 104 minutes, there could have been enough
leeway to give them the extra scenes.  It's too bad, since a couple of the
plot threads, like Heflin's relationship with Liz, and Tilden's
investigation into Donlan's mob connections, could have easily been explored
further.
Another problem is the film's closeness to a western.  Because we know what
happens in most westerns, once we recognize the pattern in COP LAND, we know
what the outcome will be.  At that point, almost all of the tension and
anticipation drops out the bottom, leaving only a curiosity regarding the
technicalities of how the inevitable conclusion will be played.
COP LAND may not be a masterpiece, but it does showcase some solid acting
that's worth seeing.  I just hope Stallone hangs on to the dramatic bug
again after such a long hiatus.  Given the right circumstances, he'll
surprise you with how good he is.
Note:  Stallone reportedly gained between 20 and 40 pounds for this role,
and he's been lauded for this.  How come when I gain a couple of pounds,
people just tell me I'm starting to look a little thick?  Oh, the injustices
of the world....

Title
Review for Sixth Sense, The (1999)
Imagine you are a little kid who could see ghosts.  These ghosts
torment you day and night, some merely frightening you, others causing
real bodily injury.  You need help, and who do you want to come to
your rescue?  Why, Bruce Willis, of course.
Willis plays Malcolm Crowe, a child psychologist who just received a
certificate from the city of Philadelphia for his work.  However, not
everyone shares the city's benevolent view.  One of his former
patients, now grown up, breaks into Crowe's house, berates him for not
being able to save him from his problems so many years ago, and
proceeds to shoot Crowe, then himself.  One year later, Crowe is a
shadow of his former self, with a flagging marriage and a washed-up
career.  However, his next assignment is to help young Cole Sear
(Haley Joel Osment), a boy with problems very similar to his failed
patient.  If Crowe can help little Cole, perhaps he may gain
redemption for his earlier mistake.
M. Night Shyamalan's THE SIXTH SENSE starts out on the wrong foot.
Crowe and his wife (Olivia Williams) have just gotten home from the
awards ceremony and are admiring the certificate's frame.  His wife
hugs him, looks into his eyes, and then spouts some of the most
expository dialog I've heard in a long time.  I'm paraphrasing, but
it's something like, "You're a successful child psychologist who has
pioneered revolutionary techniques in helping children overcome their
hidden problems."   Whoa, why don't we just have a STAR WARS-like
title crawl to fill us in on all the details?  Or how about a freeze
frame of Crowe, with his description subtitled underneath?  It'd be
kind of like what they used to do in those Road Runner cartoons:
Malcolm Crowe (Genius Childus Helperus).  The one saving grace about
this scene is it doesn't last very long, since Crowe's old patient
shows up and soon puts us out of our misery.
After the shooting and a jump ahead to the following year, it would
seem that the film's pace is doggedly slow, taking nearly 40 minutes
to get into gear.  Out of courtesy to the filmmakers, however, I blame
this on the movie's marketing.  Every trailer and commercial shows us
Cole saying, "I see dead people," and pumps us up for some kind of
horror extravaganza, when in reality, it's not until well into the
film that Cole confesses his unique ability.  All the build-up and
precursors would have been effective if we did not know this fact, but
as it is, we're just waiting around for over a half an hour, saying to
ourselves, "All right, where's the dead people?  I wanna see walking
corpses, dammit!"  Okay, maybe I'm overstating it a bit, but you get
the picture.
Luckily, once we start seeing Cole's apparitions, the film picks up a
lot of steam and we're taken along for the ride as Crowe must decide
whether or not this otherworldly manifestation is merely a product of
Cole's imagination, and how he can help the child in any case.  This
is not to say THE SIXTH SENSE turns into an effects-laden tour de
force, however.  Instead, our glimpses of the ghosts are separate and
isolated, satisfying our curiosity and giving us the occasional scare
while not turning the film into just another one of those horror
flicks the industry has been churning out so furiously.  It is simply
evident that writer/director Shyamalan has a good sense of pacing, not
allowing us to be overwhelmed with sensory overload.  Happily for us,
he puts the human story in the forefront, rather than relegating it to
the wings as computer generated images take center stage.
When the scares do come, they are wonderfully effective.  Some of them
catch you totally off guard, while in other cases they are the climax
to painfully suspenseful sequences.  It's nice to know that the art of
frightening is alive and well outside of the slasher movie, and you
don't have to rely on guts, blood, gore, or special effects to still
scare the heck out of an audience.  This film will do quite fine
without them, thank you very much.  Especially in a season where we've
had films like THE HAUNTING, which was 100% effects and constant
scares, and THE BLAIR WITCH PROJECT, which was a zero effects
production with a film's length of build-up to a two minute payoff,
it's refreshing to see a film that makes a compromise between the two
extremes and does so with proficiency.
Bruce Willis once again shows us that he's not to be lumped into the
same category of those image-only action heroes.  When called for,
this guy can really act.  He takes it a bit over the top at a couple
of points, but for the most part he does a fine job garnering our
sympathy for his character.  Toni Collette as Cole's mother, Lynn,
also deserves recognition.  Lynn truly loves her son, but must cope
with a problem she does not understand.  Piling on the pressure is the
fact that her husband ran out on her years ago, and she must hold two
jobs in order to pay rent and send Cole to a private school.  Taking
on this role, Collette performs admirably and perhaps only once allows
her Australian accent to slip in.  However, the real surprise in this
film is young Haley Joel Osment.  This kid performs with a level of
experience beyond his years, able to convey the genuine fear he
experiences on a daily basis as well as the suspicious apprehension he
feels toward Crowe.  By movie's end, this young actor has run the
gamut of emotions, all of which are completely convincing.
To be sure, THE SIXTH SENSE has its share of loose ends, but the
overall film is still quite solid.  Along with the suspense and
scares, you also get some really touching moments and even a bit of
humor.  I won't give away a whole lot, but something happens at the
end that will even make you look back on the whole film.  And when a
movie leaves me thinking about it after I've left the theater, that
scores points in my book.

Title
Review for Shall We Dansu? (1996)
The opening narration of SHALL WE DANCE? informs us that Japan is a
nation of people who shy away from public or sometimes even private
displays of emotion.  Holding hands or saying "I love you" is a
blatant and shameful deed.  It is therefore that dancing, a pastime of
holding hands, touching, and bodily expression is looked down upon
with disdain.  A regular man in the professional world should have no
such desires.
So it is for Mr. Sugiyama.  He is an accountant in his forties,
married, and a father.  What possible role could dance have in his
life?  However, one day, while traveling home on the train, he happens
to notice a beautiful woman gazing from the window of a dance studio.
He is captivated by her.  Over the next few days he sees her
repeatedly at the same time, gazing outward.  One evening, he works up
the courage to enter the studio and meet her.  Instead of finding the
woman of his dreams, he finds a wonderful new world, the world of
dance.
When I approach foreign films, I never quite know what to expect.  I
suppose the stigma is that they are deep or aloof, and you may not be
able to understand it all.  Even though I've seen my share of foreign
films, and know that this is not always the case, I was still stuck
with this preconception going into SHALL WE DANCE?.  Having seen
PILLOW BOOK a few weeks previously probably didn't help.  However,
much like Mr. Sugiyama, what I found was something I didn't
anticipate.
SHALL WE DANCE? is one of the funniest movies I have seen in quite
some time.  Not a lot of the humor is intelligent, and much of it is
sheer physical comedy, but you quickly realize that as a viewer, you
must give yourself to the feeling of the movie and not spend too much
time analyzing it - much like dancing.  Koji Yakusho, as Mr. Sugiyama,
plays the straight man in this movie, but just watching his mannerisms
and awkwardness in the dance studio is more than mildly amusing.  His
sincerity through otherwise strange situations reminded me a lot of
Jimmy Stewart's earlier performances.  More outrageous are the
characters Mr. Sugiyama meets in his dance class:  A pair of
mismatched dance beginners and an office worker with the alter ego as
the king of the Latin dance.
Although the plot of SHALL WE DANCE? follows a general formula from
beginning to its inevitable ending, the plot does take a few twists
along the way.  For example, Mr. Sugiyama's wife, unaware of her
husband's dance lessons, hires a private investigator to find out what
he's been doing with his Wednesday nights. Rather than taking the
wrong-conclusion-then-have-a-zany-confrontation route, this thread
went in a surprising and decidedly more enjoyable direction.
Director Masayuki Suo presents the viewer with some excellent imagery,
especially during musical interludes which feature classical, jazz,
Latin, and pop music.  One problem, however, is that at times too many
things are happening on the screen at once.  In long shots of the
dance floor, I sometimes noticed several hilarious actions happening
at the same time, but was not able to draw all of them in.  Actually,
I'm not sure I could label it a total drawback, as trying to see it
all was a little fun.
At a hair under two hours, the film is well paced enough that the time
seems to fly.  Although the film finishes with a satisfactory finale,
I had so thoroughly enjoyed the ride that I was sorry to see it end.

Title
Review for Starship Troopers (1997)
You really don't know how much of modern science fiction is based upon
Robert Heinlein's novel "Starship Troopers" until you read it for
yourself.  To many fans of the literary genre, Heinlein's novel has
become somewhat of a bible, setting the genesis of countless works
afterward.  It is therefore that a great responsibility comes with the
making of a movie version, and to deviate, even slightly, from the
original text would be to commit sacrilege.
If the fans of the novel had their druthers, I'm sure director Paul
Verhoeven would be nailed to a cross for his sins in making this film.
There are significant departures from both the storyline and the
technical aspects of the novel.  Minor characters are given major
roles, new characters are added, a subplot based upon psychic ability
is thrown in, the concept of power armor is taken out....the list goes
on and on.   I believe the worst thing I could have done before seeing
STARSHIP TROOPERS, the movie, was read "Starship Troopers," the novel.
Unfortunately, I did just that.  Twice, in fact, unaware that a few
years later, this movie would be made.  However, as difficult as it
is, one must maintain the objectivity necessary to review the film as
a film, and not as an adaptation.  I will therefore attempt to put my
loyalties to the novel aside for the moment.  Here goes.
STARSHIP TROOPERS is set in the human race's distant future and
follows a few graduating high school seniors who opt for federal
service rather then going on to college.  Basically, federal service
means a tour of duty in the military, the only way to gain
"citizenship", a prestigious status which puts you above regular
"civilians" in the ideological hierarchy of society.  What's so bad
about going into the military?  Aside from the lower-class stigma that
is sadly still attached, it also means you have a good chance of
getting maimed or killed.  You see, the humans are at war with a race
of arachnid alien creatures referred to simply as "bugs."  But these
are no ordinary household bugs, oh no.  These are ten foot tall
monsters that impale you with spearlike legs or cut you in half with
menacing pincers.  A can of Raid is not going to do.
At the center of the story is Johnny Rico.  Johnny's parents first
convince him not to enlist for federal service, but his girlfriend
Carmen convinces him otherwise.  Unfortunately, Carmen gets to join
the fleet and pilot one of the large transport cruisers while Johnny
gets sent to Mobile Infantry training to become one of the grunts.
There he is taught by drill instructor Sergeant Zim how to fight and
how to lead, but a training accident with live ammunition costs the
life of a cadet under Johnny's command.  Johnny is ready to wash out
of boot when the bugs send an asteroid to Earth and Johnny's hometown
of Buenos Aires is decimated.  Armed with a new resolve, he goes off
to fight.
Relative newcomer Casper van Dien puts in a pretty good performance as
the central character, whom we follow through his maturation into a
military leader.  Confident in himself, we know that with his first
combat experience, much of the toughness previously displayed will be
revealed as mere youthful bravado.  Denise Richards, as Carmen, is the
girl that every high school boy hates.  She's the pretty princess
who's supposed to be your girlfriend, but she will on a whim walk away
with some other guy, only to return saying, "Oh, he's just a friend."
Her character, unlike Johnny, is confident to the point of
obnoxiousness.  You really want her to bite it.  Big time.  Neil
Patrick Harris, as Carl Jenkins, portrays what is basically a
throwaway character who is of almost no value to the plot.  The only
thing remarkable about him is how he is leaps and bounds more
intelligent than his peers.  Dr. Doogie Howser, I presume.
A pleasant surprise was the character of Dizzy Flores, played by Dina
Meyer.  She is the other girl in Johnny's life, the one who is in
front of him the whole time, but doesn't get the attention she
deserves, try as she might to win his affections.  Whereas Johnny
follows Carmen, who quickly runs away from him once she can join the
fleet, Dizzy follows Johnny into the Mobile Infantry, and even
requests to be put into the same unit.  In combat, rather than be the
one to whose rescue Johnny must come, she is tough as nails toward
him, pushing him to be his best and to survive.  Hers is a strong
character who's caring goes beyond the conventional expressions to
which we're accustomed.
Another pleasant surprise is Michael Ironside's portrayal of Jean
Rasczak, a former soldier who teaches high school philosophy, but
later returns to military service as Johnny's platoon leader.  Rasczak
is the most thought-provoking character of the whole film, as he
explains the difference between a citizen and a civilian, and lives
the description.  It is also nice to see Ironside in a role where he's
not just a bad-assed heavy.  Instead, we find out he's a good actor
who can actually smile, and I hope to see him in a wider variety of
roles.
The special effects work to varying degrees.  The bugs are all done
superbly and look incredibly real.  When they appear, they intimidate
and scare quite effectively.  The humans' space vessels, however,
often appear like toys and seem outclassed by George Lucas's efforts
from 20 years ago.  Since at least 5 separate visual effects companies
were brought on board during the production of the film, it's no
wonder the quality varies so greatly.
Although the battle scenes are quite pitched and full of excitement,
the life and death struggle is often undermined by the campy quality
of many of the other parts of the film.  Since Verhoeven is also the
man who brought us Robocop, perhaps this is not surprising.  In one
exchange between "experts" debating whether or not the bugs could
pursue a policy of live and let live, I half expected one of them to
exclaim, "I'd buy THAT for a dollar!"  Also take the choice of
costuming, which makes the military look a lot like the Nazi's.  The
use of "Air Marshal" as the title for the supreme commander and a
giant bird symbol for the Earth government helps to reinforce this
image.  I asked myself what Verhoeven was trying to do:  Get the
audience behind the characters and involved in the story, or get us in
a bleak inside joke about the future?  Such a split is the kind of
reason why SWINGKIDS was such a poor choice for filmmaking.  Who cares
about kids who want to dance when there are Nazi atrocities being
committed all around them?  Maybe if we're all a bunch of Nazis in the
future, we should be eradicated by a bunch of bugs.  Verhoeven should
have shown less indulgence with the Nazi comparisons and the campiness
and more of Johnny and his journey learning about life and what it
means to live in the polis.  The love interest between Johnny and
Carmen and Carmen's subsequent story similarly should not have been
included, since they only distracting.  The movie should have stayed
truer to the novel in this case, not simply to be a purist film
version, but because it would have made a more compelling film.  The
novel is a story from the first person perspective of Johnny Rico, and
that is one of the reasons it is so effective.  The reader actually
gets into his mind and shows us how he has changed.  Verhoeven could
have done this by concentrating more on Johnny; giving his character
more scenes and generally spending more time with him.  The novel also
gives us something to think about:  What it means to live with the
human condition and the sacrifices we make to preserve it.  This film
could have been so much more than a Friday night movie filled with
action.  It's a shame it's not.
